CHAPTER I.
for he hoped to be back again in the course of the
succeeding
day. No time was to be lost, he knew, the return of the
Arabs being hourly expected, and the tranquillity of the open
sea being at all times a matter of the greatest uncertainty.
With the declared view of making quick work, and with the
secret apprehension of a struggle with the owners of the
country, the captain took with him every officer and man in
his ship that could possibly be spared, and as many of the
passengers as he thought might be useful. As numbers might
be important in the way of intimidation, he cared almost as
much for appearances as for any thing else, or certainly he
would not have deemed the presence of Mr. Dodge of any
great moment; for to own the truth, he expected the editor
of the Active Inquirer would prove the quality implied by
the first word of the title of his journal, as much in any
other way as in fighting.
Neither provisions nor water, beyond what might be
necessary in pulling to the wreck, nor ropes, nor blocks, nor
any thing but arms and ammunition, were taken in the
boats; for the examination of the morning had shown the
captain, that, notwithstanding so much had been plundered,
a sufficiency still remained in the stranded vessel. Indeed,
the fact that so much had been left was one of his reasons
for hastening off himself, as he deemed it certain that they
who had taken away what was gone, would soon return for
the remainder. The fowling-pieces and pistols, with all the
powder and ball in the ship, were taken: a light gun that
was on board, for the purpose of awaking sleepy pilots, being
left loaded, with the intention of serving for a signal of
alarm, should any material change occur in the situation of
the ship.
The party included thirty men, and as most had fire-arms
of one sort or another, they pulled out of the inlet with spirit
and great confidence in their eventual success. The boats
were crowded, it is true, but there was room to row, and the
launch had been left in its place on deck, because it was
known that two boats were to be found in the wreck, one of
which was large: in short, as Captain Truck had meditated
this expedient from the moment he ascertained the situation
of the Dane, he now set about carrying it into effect with
method and discrimination. We shall first accompany him
1*
on his way, leaving the small party in the Montauk for our
future attention in another chapter.
The distance between the two vessels was about four
leagues, and a headland intervening, those in the boats in
less than an hour lost sight of their own ship, as she lay
shorn of her pride anchored within the reef. At almost the
same moment, the wreck came into view, and Captain Truck
applied his glass with great interest, in order to ascertain the
state of things in that direction. All was tranquilno signs
of any one having visited the spot since morning being
visible
.
This intelligence was given to the people, who pulled
at their oars the more willingly under the stimulus of
probable
success, driving the boats ahead with increasing velocity.
The sun was still some distance above the horizon, when
the cutter and jolly-boat rowed through the narrow channel
astern of the wreck, and brought up, as before, by the side
of the rocks. Leaping ashore, Captain Truck led the way
to the vessel, and, in five minutes, he was seen in the forward
cross-trees, examining the plain with his glass. All was as
solitary and deserted as when before seen, and the order was
immediately given to commence operations without delay.
A gang of the best seamen got out the spare topmast and
lower-yard of the Dane, and set about fitting a pair of sheers,
a job that would be likely to occupy them several hours.
Mr. Leach led a party up forward, and the second mate went
up with another further aft, each proceeding to send down
its respective top-gallant-mast, top-sail-yard, and top-mast;
while Captain Truck, from the deck, superintended the same
work on the mizen-mast. As the men worked with spirit,
and a strong party remained below to give the drags, and to
come up the lanyards, spar came down after spar with
rapidity, and just as the sun dipped into the ocean to the
westward, everything but the lower-masts was lying on the
sands, alongside of the ship; nothing having been permitted
to touch the decks in descending. Previously, however, to
sending down the lower-yards, the launch had been lifted
from its bed and landed also by the side of the vessel.
All hands were now mustered on the sands, and the boat
was launched, an operation of some delicacy, as heavy
rollers were occasionally coming in. As soon as it floated,
this powerful auxiliary was swept up to the rocks, and then
the men began to load it with the standing rigging and the
sails, the latter having been unbent, as fast as each spar
came down. Two kedges were found, and a hawser was
bent to one, when the launch was carried outside of the bar
and anchored. Lines being brought in, the yards were
hauled out to the same place, and strongly lashed together
for the night. A great deal of running rigging, many
blocks, and divers other small articles, were put into the
boats of the Montauk, and the jolly-boat of the wreck,
which was still hanging at her stern, was also lowered and
got into the water. With these acquisitions, the party had
now four boats, one of which was heavy and capable of
carrying a considerable freight.
By this time it was so late and so dark, that Captain
Truck determined to suspend his labours until morning. In
the course of a few hours of active toil, he had secured all
the yards, the sails, the standing and running rigging, the
boats, and many of the minor articles of the Dane; and
nothing of essential importance remained, but the three
lower masts. These, it is true, were all in all to him, for
without them he would be but little better off than he was
before, since his own ship had spare canvas and spare
yards enough to make a respectable show above the
foundation
.
This foundation, however, was the great requisite, and
his principal motive in taking the other things, was to have
a better fit than could be obtained by using spars and sails
that were not intended to go together.
At eight o'clock, the people got their suppers, and
prepared
to turn in for the night. Some conversation passed
between Captain Truck and his mates, concerning the
manner
of disposing of the men while they slept, which resulted
in the former's keeping a well-armed party of ten with him
in the ship, while the remainder were put in the boats, all
of which were fastened to the launch, as she lay anchored
off the bar. Here they made beds of the sails, and, setting
a watch, the greater portion of both gangs were soon as
quietly asleep as if lying in their own berths on board the
Montauk. Not so with Captain Truck and his mates. They
walked the deck of the Dane fully an hour after the men
were silent, and for some time after Mr. Monday had finished
the bottle of wine he had taken the precaution to bring with
him from the packet, and had bestowed his person among
some old sails in the cabin. The night was a bright
starlight
,
but the moon was not to be expected until near
morning
.
The wind came off the sands of the interior in hot
puffs, but so lightly as to sound, that it breathed past them
like the sighings of the desert.
It is lucky, Mr. Leach, said the Captain, continuing
the discourse he had been holding with his mate in a low
voice, under the sense of the insecurity of their situation;
it is lucky, Mr. Leach, that we got out the stream anchor
astern, else we should have had the ship rubbing her copper
against the corners of the rocks. This air seems light, but
under all her canvas, the Montauk would soon flap her way
out from this coast, if all were ready.
Ay, ay, sir, if all were ready! repeated Mr. Leach, as
if he knew how much honest labour was to be expended
before
that happy moment could arrive.
If all were ready. I think we may be able to whip these
three sticks out of this fellow by breakfast-time in the
morning
,
and then a couple of hours will answer for the raft;
after which, a pull of six or eight more will take us back to
our own craft.
If all goes well, it may be done, sir.
Well or ill, it must be done. We are not in a situation
to play at jack-straws!
I hope it may be done, sir.
Mr. Leach!
Captain Truck!
We are in a dle category, sir, if the truth must be
spoken.
That is a word I am not much acquainted with, but we
have an awkward berth of it here, if that be what you
mean!
A long pause, during which these two seamen, one of
whom was old, the other young, paced the deck diligently.
Mr. Leach!
Captain Truck!
Do you ever pray?
I have done such a thing in my time, sir; but, since I
have sailed with you, I have been taught to work first and
pray afterwards; and when the difficulty has been gotten
over by the work, the prayers have commonly seemed surplusage.
You should take to your thanksgivings. I think your
grandfather was a parson, Leach.
Yes, he was, sir, and I have been told your father
followed
the same trade.
You have been told the truth, Mr. Leach. My father
was as meek, and pious, and humble a Christian as ever
thumped a pulpit. A poorman, and, if truth must be spoken,
a poor preacher too; but a zealous one, and thoroughly
devout
.
I ran away from him at twelve, and never passed a
week at a time under his roof afterwards. He could not do
much for me, for he had little education and no money, and,
I believe, carried on the business pretty much by faith. He
was a good man, Leach, notwithstanding there might be a
little of a take-in for such a person to set up as a teacher;
and, as for my mother, if there ever was a pure spirit on
earth it was in her body!
Ay, that is the way commonly with the mothers, sir.
She taught me to pray, added the captain, speaking a
little thick, but since I've been in this London line, to own
the truth, I find but little time for any thing but hard work,
until, for want of practice, praying has got to be among the
hardest things I can turn my hand to.
That is the way with all of us; it is my opinion,
Captain
Truck, these London and Liverpool liners will have a
good many lost souls to answer for.
Ay, ay, if we could put it on them, it would do well
enough; but my honest old father always maintained, that
every man must stand in the gap left by his own sins;
though he did assert, also, that we were all fore-ordained to
shape our courses starboard or port, even before we were
launched.
That doctrine makes an easy tide's-way of life; for I
see no great use in a man's carrying sail and jamming
himself up in the wind, to claw off immoralities, when he
knows he is to fetch up upon them after all his pains.
I have worked all sorts of traverses to get hold of this
matter, and never could make any thing of it. It is harder
than logarithms. If my father had been the only one to
teach it, I should have thought less about it, for he was no
scholar, and might have been paying it out just in the way
of business; but then my mother believed it, body and soul,
and she was too good a woman to stick long to a course that
had not truth to back it.
Why not believe it heartily, sir, and let the wheel fly?
One gets to the end of the v'y'ge on this tack as well as on
another.
There is no great difficulty in working up to or even
through the passage of death, Leach, but the great point is
to know the port we are to moor in finally. My mother
taught me to pray, and when I was ten I had underrun all
the Commandments, knew the Lord's Creed, and the
Apostles'
Prayer, and had made a handsome slant into the
Catechism
;
but, dear me, dear me, it has all oozed out of me,
like the warmth from a Greenlander.
Folks were better educated in your time, Captain Truck,
than they are now-a-days, by all I can learn.
No doubt of that in the world. In my time, younkers
were taught respect for their betters, and for age, and their
Catechism, and piety, and the Apostles' Prayer, and all
those sort of things. But America has fallen astern sadly
in manners within the last fifty years. I do not flatter
myself with being as good as I was when under my
excellent
dear mother's command, but there are worse men in the
world, and out of Newgate, too, than John Truck. Now,
in the way of vices, Leach, I never swear.
Not you, sir; and Mr. Monday
never
swear.
As the protestation of sobriety on the part of their
passenger
had got to be a joke with the officers and men of the
ship, Captain Truck had no difficulty in understanding his
mate, and though nettled at a retort that was like usurping
his own right to the exclusive quizzing of the vessel, he was
in a mood much too sentimental and reflecting to be angry.
After a moment's pause, he resumed the dialogue, as if
nothing
had been said to disturb its harmony.
No, I
never
swear; or, if I do, it is in a small
gentlemanly
way, and with none of your foul-mouthed oaths, such
as are used by the horse-jockeys that formerly sailed out of
the river.
Were they hard swearers?
Is a nor-wester a hard wind? Those fellows, after
they have been choked off and jammed by the religion
ashore for a month or two, would break out like a hurricane
when they had made an offing, and were once fairly out of
hearing of the parsons and deacons. It is said that old Joe
Bunk began an oath on the bar that he did not get to the end
of until his brig was off Montauk. I have my doubts, Leach,
if any thing be gained by screwing down religion and
morals
,
like a cotton bale, as is practised in and about the
river!
A good many begin to be of the same way of thinking;
for when our people
do
break out, it is like the small-pox!
I am an advocate for education; nor do I think I was
taught in my own case more than was reasonable. I think
even a prayer is of more use to a ship-master than Latin,
and I often have, even now, recourse to one, though it may
not be exactly in Scripture language. I seldom want a wind
without praying for it, mentally, as it might be; and as for
the rheumatis', I am always praying to be rid of it, when
I'm not cursing it starboard and larboard. Has it never
struck you that the world is less moral since steamboats
were introduced than formerly?
The boats date from before my birth, sir.
Very trueyou are but a boy. Mankind appear to be
hurried, and no one likes to stop to pray, or to foot up his
sins, as used to be the case. Life is like a passage at sea.
We feel our way cautiously until off soundings on our own
coast, and then we have an easy time of it in the deep
water
;
but when we get near the shoals again, we take out the
lead, and mind a little how we steer. It is the going off and
coming on the coast, that gives us all the trouble.
You had some object in view, Captain Truck, when you
asked me if I ever prayed!
Certain. If I were to set to work to pray myself just
now, it would be for smooth water to-morrow, that we may
have a good time in towing the raft to the shiphist! Leach;
did you hear nothing?
There was a sound different from what is common in
the air from the land! It is probably some savage beast,
for Africa is full of them.
I think we might manage a lion from this fortress.
Unless
the fellow found the stage, he could hardly board us;
and a plank or two thrown from that, would make a
draw-bridge
of it at once. Look yonder! there is something
moving on the bank, or my eyes are two jewel-blocks.
Mr. Leach looked in the required direction, and he, too,
fancied he saw something in motion on the margin of the
bank. At the point where the wreck lay, the beach was far
from wide, and her flying jib-boom, which was still out,
projected
so near the low acclivity, where the coast rose to the
level of the desert, as to come within ten feet of the bushes
by which the latter was fringed. Although the spar had
drooped a little in consequence of having lost the support of
the stays, its end was still sufficiently high to rise above the
leaves, and to permit one seated on it to overlook the plain,
as well as the starlight would allow. Believing the duty to
be important, Captain Truck, first giving his orders to Mr.
Leach, as to the mode of alarming the men, should it
become
necessary, went cautiously out on the bowsprit, and
thence by the foot-ropes, to the farther extremity of the
booms. As this was done with the steadiness of a seaman,
and with the utmost care to prevent discovery, he was soon
stretched on the spar, balancing his body by his legs
beneath
,
and casting eager glances about, though prevented by
the obscurity from seeing either far or very distinctly.
After lying in this position a minute, Captain Truck
discovered
an object on the plains, at the distance of a hundred
yards from the bushes, that was evidently in motion. He
was now all watchfulness, for, had he not seen the proofs
that the Arabs or Moors had already been at the wreck, he
knew that parties of them were constantly hovering along
the coast, especially after every heavy gale that blew from
the westward, in the hope of booty. As all his own people
were asleep, the mates excepted, and the boats could just be
discovered by himself, who knew their position, he was in
hopes that, should any of the barbarians be near, the
presence
of his own party could hardly be known. It is true,
the alteration in the appearance of the wreck, by the
removal
of the spars, must strike any one who had seen it
before; but this change might have been made by another
party of marauders, or those who had now come, if any
there were, might see the vessel for the first time.
While such thoughts were rapidly glancing through his
mind, the reader will readily imagine that the worthy
master
was not altogether at his ease. Still he was cool, and,
as he was resolved to fight his way off, even against an
army, he clung to the spar with a species of physical
resolution
that would have done credit to a tiger. The object on
the plain moved once more, and the clouds opening beyond,
he plainly made out the head and neck of a dromedary.
There was but one, however; nor could the most
scrupulous
examination show him a human being. After
remaining
a quarter of an hour on the boom, during all which time
the only sounds that were heard were the sighings of the
night-air, and the sullen and steady wash of the surf,
Captain
Truck came on deck again, where he found his mate
waiting his report with intense anxiety. The former was
fully aware of the importance of his discovery, but, being a
cool man, he had not magnified the danger to himself.
The Moors are down on the coast, he said, in an under
tone; but I do not think there can be more than two or
three of them at the most; probably spies or scouts; and,
could we seize them, we may gain a few hours on their
comrades
,
which will be all we want; after which they shall be
welcome to the salt and the other dunnage of the poor Dane.
Leach, are you the man to stand by me in this affair?
Have I ever failed you, Captain Truck, that you put the
question?
That you have never, my fine fellow; give me a squeeze
of your honest hand, and let there be a pledge of life or
death in it.
The mate met the iron grasp of his commander, and
each knew that he received an assurance on which he might
rely.
Shall I awake the men, sir? asked Mr. Leach.
Not one of them. Every hour of sleep the people get
will be a lower mast saved. These sticks that still remain
are our foundation, and even one of them is of more account
to us, just now, than a fleet of ships might be at another
time. Take your arms and follow me; but first we will
give a hint to the second-mate of what we are about.
This officer was asleep on the deck, for he had been so
much wearied with his great exertions that afternoon as to
catch a little rest as the sweetest of all gifts. It had been
Vol. II.  2
the intention of Captain Truck to dismiss him to the boats;
but, observing him to be overcome with drowsiness, he had
permitted him to catch a nap where he lay. The look-out,
too, was also slumbering under the same indulgence; but
both were now awakened, and made acquainted with the
state of things on shore.
Keep your eyes open, but keep a dead silence,
concluded
Captain Truck; for it is my wish to deceive these
scouts, and to keep them ignorant of our presence. When
I cry out `Alarm!' you will muster all hands, and clear
away for a brush, but not before. God bless you, my lads!
mind and keep your eyes open. Leach, I am ready.
The captain and his companion cautiously descended to
the sands, and passing astern of the ship, they first took
their way to the jolly-boat, which lay at the rocks in
readiness
to carry off the two officers to the launch. Here they
found the two men in charge so soundly asleep, that nothing
would have been easier than to bind them without giving the
alarm. After a little hesitation, it was determined to let
them dream away their sorrows, and to proceed to the spot
where the bank was ascended.
At this place it became necessary to use the greatest
precaution
,
for it was literally entering the enemy's country.
The steepness of the short ascent requiring them to mount
nearly on their hands and feet, this part of their progress
was made without much hazard, and the two adventurers
stood on the plain, sheltered by some bushes.
Yonder is the camel, whispered the captain: you see
his crooked neck, with the head tossing at moments. The
fellow is not fifty yards from the body of the poor German!
Now let us follow along this line of bushes, and keep a sharp
look-out for the rider.
They proceeded in the manner mentioned, until they came
to a point where the bushes ceased, and there was an opening
that overlooked the beach quite near the wreck.
Do you see the boats, Leach, here away, in a line with
the starboard davit of the Dane? They look like dark spots
on the water, and an ignorant Arab might be excused for
taking them for rocks.
Except that they rise and fall with the rollers; he must
be doubly a Turk who could make such a blunder!
Your wanderers of the desert are not so particular.
The wreck has certainly undergone some changes since
yesterday, and I should not wonder if even a Mussulman
found them out, but
The gripe of Mr. Leach, whose fingers almost entered the
flesh of his arm, and a hand pointed towards the bushes on
the other side of the opening, silenced the captain's whisper.
A human form was seen standing on the fringe of the bank,
directly opposite the jib-boom. It was swaddled in a sort of
cloak, and the long musket that was borne in a hollow of an
arm, was just discernible, diverging from the line of the
figure. The Arab, for such it could only be, was evidently
gazing on the wreck, and presently he ventured out more
boldly, and stood on the spot that was clear of bushes. The
death-like stillness on the beach deceived him, and he
advanced
with less caution towards the spot where the two
officers were in ambush, still keeping his own eye on the
ship. A few steps brought him within reach of Captain
Truck, who drew back his arm until the elbow reached his
own hip, when he darted it forward, and dealt the incautious
barbarian a severe blow between the eyes. The Arab fell
like a slaughtered ox, and before his senses were fairly
recovered
,
he was bound hands and feet, and rolled over the
bank down upon the beach, with little ceremony, his
fire-arms
remaining with his captors.
That lad is in a category, whispered the captain; it
now remains to be seen if there is another.
A long search was not rewarded with success, and it was
determined to lead the camel down the path, with a view
to prevent his being seen by any wanderer in the morning.
If we get the lower masts out betimes, continued the
captain, these land pirates will have no beacons in sight to
steer by, and, in a country in which one grain of sand is so
much like another, they might hunt a week before they made
a happy land-fall.
The approach of the two towards the camel was made
with less caution than usual, the success of their enterprise
throwing them off their guard, and exciting their spirits.
They believed, in short, that their captive was either a
solitary
wanderer, or that he had been sent ahead as a scout,
by some party that would be likely to follow in the
morning
.
We must be up and at work before the sun, Mr. Leach,
said the captain, speaking clearly, but in a low tone, as they
approached the camel. The head of the animal was tossed;
then it seemed to snuff the air, and it gave a shriek. In the
twinkling of an eye an Arab sprang from the sand, on
which he had been sleeping, and was on the creature's back.
He was seen to look around him, and before the startled
mariners had time to decide on their course, the beast,
which was a dromedary trained to speed, was out of sight
in the darkness. Captain Truck had thrown forward his
fowling-piece, but he did not fire.
We have no right to shoot the fellow, he said, and
our hope is now in the distance he will have to ride to join
his comrades. If we have got a chief, as I suspect, we will
make a hostage of him, and turn him to as much account
as he can possibly turn one of his own camels. Depend
on it we shall see no more of them for several hours, and
we will seize the opportunity to get a little sleep. A man
must have his watch below, or he gets to be as dull and as
obstinate as a top-maul.
The captain having made up his mind to this plan was
not slow in putting it in execution. Returning to the beach
they liberated the legs of their prisoner, whom they found
lying like a log on the sands, and made him mount the
staging to the deck of the ship. Leading the way into the
cabin, Mr. Truck examined the fellow by a light, turning
him round and commenting on his points very much as he
might have done had the captive been any other animal of
the desert.
The Arab was a swarthy, sinewy man of forty, with all
his fibres indurated and worked down to the whip-cord
meagreness
and rigidity of a racer, his frame presenting a
perfect
picture of the sort of being one would fancy suited to
the exhausting motion of a dromedary, and to the fare of
a desert. He carried a formidable knife, in addition to the
long musket of which he had been deprived, and his
principal
garment was the coarse mantle of camel's hair, that
served equally for cap, coat and robe. His wild dark eyes
gleamed, as Captain Truck passed the lamp before his face,
and it was sufficiently apparent that he fancied a very
serious misfortune had befallen him. As any verbal
communication
was out of the question, some abortive attempts
were essayed by the two mariners to make themselves
understood
by signs, which, like some men's reasoning,
produced
results exactly contrary to what had been expected.
Perhaps the poor fellow fancies we mean to eat him,
Leach, observed the captain, after trying his skill in
pantomime
for some time without success; and he has some
grounds for the idea, as he was felled like an ox that is
bound to the kitchen. Try and let the miserable wretch
understand, at least, that we are not cannibals.
Hereupon the mate commenced an expressive pantomime,
which described, with sufficient clearness, the process of
skinning, cutting up, cooking, and eating the carcass of the
Arab, with the humane intention of throwing a negative
over the whole proceeding, by a strong sign of dissent at
the close; but there are no proper substitutes for the little
monosyllables of yes and no, and the meaning of the
interpreter got to be so confounded that the captain himself
was mystified.
Dn it, Leach, he interrupted, the man fancies that
he is not good eating, you make so many wry and
out-of-the-way
contortions. A sign is a jury-mast for the tongue,
and every seaman ought to know how to practise them, in
case he should be wrecked on a savage and unknown coast.
Old Joe Bunk had a dictionary of them, and in calm
weather he used to go among his horses and horned cattle,
and talk with them by the hour. He made a diagram of
the language, and had it taught to all us younkers who
were exposed to the accidents of the sea. Now, I will try
my hand on this Arab, for I could never go to sleep while
the honest black imagined we intended to breakfast on
him.
The captain now recommenced his own explanations in
the language of nature. He too described the process of
cooking and eating the prisonerfor this he admitted was
indispensable by way of prefaceand then, to show his
horror of such an act, he gave a very good representation
of a process he had often witnessed among his sea-sick
passengers
,
by way of showing his loathing of cannibalism in
2*
general, and of eating this Arab in particular. By this time
the man was thoroughly alarmed, and by way of
commentary
on the captain's eloquence, he began to utter wailings
in his own language, and groans that were not to be
mistaken
.
To own the truth, Mr. Truck was a good deal
mortified
with this failure, which, like all other unsuccessful
persons, he was ready to ascribe to anybody but himself.
I begin to think, Mr. Leach, he said, that this fellow
is too stupid for a spy or a scout, and that, after all, he is no
more than a driveller who has strayed from his tribe, from
a want of sense to keep the road in a desert. A man of the
smallest information must have understood me, and yet you
perceive by his lamentations and outcries that he knows no
more what I said than if he were in another parallel of
latitude
.
The chap has quite mistaken my character; for if I
really did intend to make a beast of myself, and devour my
species, no one of the smallest knowledge of human nature
would think I'd begin on a nigger! What is your opinion
of the man's mistake, Mr. Leach?
It is very plain, sir, that he supposes you mean to broil
him, and then to eat so much of his steaks, that you will be
compelled to heave up like a marine two hours out; and, if
I must say the truth, I think most people would have inferred
the same thing from your signs, which are as plainly
cannibal
as any thing of the sort I ever witnessed.
And what the devil did he make of yours, Master
Cookery-Book? cried the captain with some heat. Did
he fancy you meant to mortify the flesh with a fortnight's
fast? No, no, sir; you are a very respectable first officer,
but are no more acquainted with Joe Bunk's principles of
signs, than this editor here knows of truth and propriety.
It is your blundering manner of soliloquizing that has set
the lad on a wrong traverse. He has just grafted your own
idea on my communication, and has got himself into a
category
that a book itself would not reason him out of, until
his fright is passed. Logic is thrown away on all `skeary
animals, said old Joe Bunk. Hearkee, Leach, I've a mind
to set the rascal adrift, condemning the gun and the knife
for the benefit of the captors. I think I should sleep better
for the certainty that he was trudging along the sand,
satisfied
he was not to be barbecued in the morning.
There is no use in detaining him, sir, for his messmate,
who went off on the dromedary, will sail a hundred feet to
his one, and if an alarm is really to be given to their party,
it will not come from this chap. He will be unarmed, and
by taking away his pouch we shall get some ammunition for
this gun of his, which will throw a shot as far as Queen
Anne's pocket-piece. For my part, sir, I think there is no
great use in keeping him, for I do not think he would
understand
us, if he stayed a month, and went to school the whole
time.
You are quite right, and as long as he is among us, we
shall be liable to unpleasant misconceptions; so cut his
lashings
,
and set him adrift, and be dd to him.
The mate, who by this time was drowsy, did as desired,
and in a moment the Arab was at liberty. At first the poor
creature did not know what to make of his freedom, but a
smart application,
posteriori
, from the foot of Captain
Truck, whose humanity was of the rough quality of the seas,
soon set him in motion up the cabin-ladder. When the
two mariners reached the deck, their prisoner was already
leaping down the staging, and in another minute his active
form was obscurely seen clambering up the bank, on
gaining
which he plunged into the desert, and was seen no
more.
None but men indurated in their feelings by long
exposure
would be likely to sleep under the circumstances in
which these two seamen were placed; but they were both
too cool, and too much accustomed to arouse themselves on
sudden alarms, to lose the precious moments in womanish
apprehensions, when they knew that all their physical
energies
would be needed on the morrow, whether the Arabs
arrived or not. They accordingly regulated the look-outs,
gave strong admonitions of caution to be passed from one
to another, and then the captain stretched himself in the
berth of the poor Dane who was now a captive in the
desert, while Mr. Leach got into the jolly-boat, and was
pulled off to the launch. Both were sound asleep in less
than five minutes after their heads touched their temporary
pillows.
CHAPTER II.
Ay, he does well enough, if he be disposed,
And so do I too; he does it with a better grace, but
I do it more natural.
Twelfth Night
.
The
sleep of the weary is sweet. Of all the party that
lay thus buried in sleep, on the verge of the Great Desert,
exposed at any moment to an assault from its ruthless and
predatory occupants, but one bethought him of the danger;
though
he
was, in truth, so little exposed as to have rendered
it of less moment to himself than to most of the others, had
he not been the possessor of a fancy that served oftener to
lead him astray than for any purposes that were useful or
pleasing. This person was in one of the boats, and as they
lay at a reasonable distance from the land, and the
barbarians
would not probably have known how to use any craft
had they even possessed one, he was consequently safe from
everything but a discharge from their long muskets. But
this remote risk sufficed to keep him awake, it being very
different things to foster malice, circulate gossip, write
scurrilous
paragraphs, and cant about the people, and to face a
volley of fire-arms. For the one employment, nature,
tradition
,
education, and habit, had expressly fitted Mr. Dodge;
while for the other, he had not the smallest vocation.
Although
Mr. Leach, in setting his look-outs on board the
boats, had entirely overlooked the editor of the Active
Inquirer, never before had that vigilant person's inquiries
been more active than they were throughout the whole of
that long night, and twenty times would he have aroused the
party on false alarms, but for the cool indifference of the
phlegmatic seamen, to whom the duty more properly
belonged
.
These brave fellows knew too well the precious
qualities of sleep to allow that of their shipmates to be
causelessly
disturbed by the nervous apprehensions of one who
carried with him an everlasting stimulant to fear in the
consciousness
of demerit. The night passed away undisturbed,
therefore, nor was the order of the regular watch broken
until the look-outs in the wreck, agreeably to their orders,
awoke Captain Truck and his mates.
It was now precisely at the moment when the first, and
as it might be the fugitive, rays of the sun glide into the
atmosphere, and, to use a quaint expression, dilute its
darkness. One no longer saw by starlight, or by moonlight,
though a little of both were still left; but objects, though
indistinct and dusky, had their true outlines, while every
moment rendered their surfaces more obvious.
When Captain Truck appeared on deck, his first glance
was at the ocean; for, were its tranquillity seriously
disturbed
,
it would be a death-blow to all his hopes.
Fortunately
,
in this particular, there was no change.
The winds seem to have put themselves out of breath
in the last gale, Mr. Leach, he said, and we are likely
to get the spars round as quietly as if they were so many
saw-logs floating in a mill-pond. Even the ground-swell
has lessened, and the breakers on the bar look like the
ripple of a wash-tub. Turn the people up, sir, and let us
have a drag at these sticks before breakfast, or we may
have to broil an Arab yet.
Mr. Leach hailed the boats, and ordered them to send
their gang of labourers on shore. He then gave the
accustomed
raps on the deck, and called all hands in the ship.
In a minute the men began to appear, yawning and
stretching
their armsfor no one had thrown aside his clothes
most of them launching their sea-jokes right and left, with
as much indifference as if they lay quietly in the port to
which they were bound. After some eight or ten minutes
to shake themselves, and to get aired, as Mr. Leach
expressed it, the whole party was again mustered on the
deck of the Dane, with the exception of a hand or two in
the launch, and Mr. Dodge. The latter had assumed the
office of sentinel over the jolly-boat, which, as usual, lay at
the rocks, to carry such articles off as might be wanted.
Send a hand up into the foretop, Mr. Leach, said the
captain, gaping like a greyhound; a fellow with sharp
eyes; none of your chaps who read with their noses down
in the cloudy weather of an almanack; and let him take a
look at the desert, in search of Arabs.
Although the lower rigging was down and safe in the
launch, a girt-line, or as Captain Truck in the true Doric of
his profession pronounced it, a
gunt
-line, was rove at
each mast, and a man was accordingly hauled up forward
as soon as possible. As it was still too dusky to distinguish
far with accuracy, the captain hailed him, and bade him
stay where he was until ordered down, and to keep a sharp
look-out.
We had a visit from one chap in the night, he added,
and as he was a hungry-looking rascal, he is a greater
fool than I think him, or he will be back before long, after
some of the beef and stock-fish of the wreck. Keep a bright
look-out.
The men, though accustomed to their commander's
manner
,
looked at each other more seriously, glanced around at
their arms, and then the information produced precisely the
effect that had been intended, that of inducing them to apply
to their work with threefold vigour.
Let the boys chew upon that, instead of their tobacco,
observed the captain to Mr. Leach, as he hunted for a good
coal in the galley to light his cigar with. I'll warrant you
the sheers go up none the slower for the information,
desperate
philosophers as some of these gentry are!
This prognostic was true enough, for instead of gaping
and stretching themselves about the deck, as had been the
case with most of them a minute before, the men now
commenced
their duty in good earnest, calling to each other to
come to the falls and the capstan-bars, and to stand by the
heels of the sheers.
Heave away! cried the mate, smiling to see how
quick the captain's hint had been taken; heave round
with a will, men, and let us set these legs on end, that they
may walk.
As the order was obeyed to the letter, the day had not
fairly opened when
t
he sheers were in their places and
secured. Every man was all activity, and as their work
was directed by those whose knowledge was never at fault,
a landsman would have been surprised at the readiness
with which the crew next raised a spar as heavy as the
mainmast, and had it suspended, top and all, in the air,
high enough to be borne over the side. The lowering was
a trifling affair, and the massive stick was soon lying at its
length on the sands. Captain Truck well knew the great
importance of this particular spar, for he might make out
with the part of the foremast that remained in the packet,
whereas, without this mast he could not possibly rig
anything
of much available use aft. He called out to the men,
therefore, as he sprang upon the staging, to follow him and
to launch the spar into the water before they breakfasted.
Let us make sure of this fellow, men, he added, for
it is our mainstay. With this stick fairly in our raft, we
may yet make a passage; no one must think of his teeth
till it is out of all risk. This stick we must have, if we
make war on the Emperor of Morocco for its possession.
The people knew the necessity for exertion, and they
worked accordingly. The top was knocked off, and
carried
down to the water; the spar was then cut round, and
rolled after it, not without trouble, however, as the trestle
trees were left on; but the descent of the sands favoured
the labour. When on the margin of the sea, by the aid of
hand-spikes, the head was got afloat, or so nearly so, as to
require but little force to move it, when a line from the
boats was fastened to the outer end, and the top was
secured alongside.
Now, clap your hand-spikes under it, boys, and heave
away! cried the captain. Heave together and keep the
stick straightheave, and his head is afloat!Haul, haul
away in the boat!heave all at once, and as if you were
giants!you gained three feet that tug, my heartiestry
him again, gentlemen, as you areand move together, like
girls in a
cotillion
Away with it!What the devil are
you staring at, in the fore-top there? Have you nothing
better to do than to amuse yourself in seeing us heave our
insides out?
The intense interest attached to the securing of this spar
had extended to the look-out in the top, and instead of
keeping his eye on the desert, as ordered, he was looking
down at the party on the beach, and betraying his
sympathy
in their efforts by bending his body, and appearing to
heave in common with his messmates. Admonished of
his neglect by this sharp rebuke, he turned round quickly
towards the desert, and gave the fearful alarm of The
Arabs!
Every man ceased his work, and the whole were on the
point of rushing in a body towards their arms, when the
greater steadiness of Captain Truck prevented it.
Whereaway? he demanded sternly.
On the most distant hillock of sand, may be a mile and
a half inland.
How do they head?
Dead down upon us, sir.
How do they travel?
They have camels, and horses: all are mounted, sir.
What is their number?
The man paused, as if to count, and then he called out,
They are strong-handed, sir; quite a hundred I think.
They have brought up, sir, and seem to be sounding about
them for an anchorage.
Captain Truck hesitated, and he looked wistfully at the
mast.
Boys! said he, shaking his hand over the bit of
massive
wood, with energy, this spar is of more importance to
us than our mother's milk in infancy. It is our victuals and
drink, life and hopes. Let us swear we will have it in spite
of a thousand Arabs. Stoop to your hand-spikes, and heave
at the wordheave as if you had a world to move,heave,
men, heave!
The people obeyed, and the mast advanced more than
half the necessary distance into the water. But the man
now called out that the Arabs were advancing swiftly
towards
the ship.
One more effort, men, said Captain Truck, reddening
in the face with anxiety, and throwing down his hat to set
the example in person,heave!
The men hove, and the spar floated.
Now to your arms, boys, and you, sir, in the top, keep
yourself hid behind the head of the mast. We must be
ready to show these gentry we are not afraid of them. A
sign of the hand told the men in the launch to haul away,
and the all-important spar floated slowly across the bar, to
join the raft.
The men now hurried up to the ship, a post that Captain
Truck declared he could maintain against a whole tribe,
while Mr. Dodge began incontinently to scull the jolly-boat,
in the best manner he could, off to the launch. All
remonstrance
was useless, as he had got as far as the bar
before
he was perceived. Both Sir George Templemore and
Mr. Monday loudly denounced him for deserting the party
on the shore in this scandalous manner, but quite without
effect. Mr. Dodge's skill, unfortunately for his success, did
not quite equal his zeal; and finding, when he got on the
bar, that he was unable to keep the boat's head to the sea,
or indeed to manage it at all, he fairly jumped into the
water and swam lustily towards the launch. As he was
expert
at this exercise, he arrived safely, cursing in his heart
all travelling, the desert, the Arabs, and mankind in general,
wishing himself quietly back in Dodgeopolis again, among
his beloved people. The boat drove upon the sands, of
course, and was eventually taken care of by two of the
Montauk's crew.
As soon as Captain Truck found himself on the deck of
the Dane, the arms were distributed among the people. It
was clearly his policy not to commence the war, for he had
nothing, in an affirmative sense, to gain by it, though,
without
making any professions, his mind was fully made up
not to be taken alive, as long as there was a possibility of
averting such a disaster. The man aloft gave constant
notice
of the movements of the Arabs, and he soon announced
that they had halted at a pistol's shot from the bank, where
they were securing their camels, and that his first estimate
of their force was true.
In the mean time, Captain Truck was far from satisfied
with his position. The bank was higher than the deck of
the ship, and so near it as to render the bulwarks of little
use, had those of the Dane been of any available thickness,
which they were not. Then, the position of the ship, lying
a little on one side, with her bows towards the land, exposed
her to being swept by a raking fire; a cunning enemy
having it in his power, by making a cover of the bank, to
pick off his men, with little or no exposure to himself. The
odds were too great to sally upon the plain, and although
Vol. II.  3
the rocks offered a tolerable cover towards the land, they
had none towards the ship. Divide his force he dared not
do,and by abandoning the ship, he would allow the Arabs
to seize her, thus commanding the other position, besides the
remainder of the stores, which he was desirous of securing.
Men think fast in trying circumstances, and although the
captain was in a situation so perfectly novel, his practical
knowledge and great coolness rendered him an invaluable
commander to those under his orders.
I do not know, gentlemen, he said, addressing his
passengers
and mates, that Vattel has laid down any rule to
govern this case. These Arabs, no doubt, are the lawful
owners of the country, in one sense; but it is a desertand
a desert, like a sea, is common property for the time being,
to all who find themselves in it. There are no
wreck-masters
in Africa, and probably no law concerning wrecks,
but the law of the strongest. We have been driven in here,
moreover, by stress of weatherand this is a category on
which Vattel has been very explicit. We have a
right
to
the hospitality of these Arabs, and if it be not freely
accorded, dn me, gentlemen, but I feel disposed to take
just as much of it as I find I shall have occasion for! Mr.
Monday, I should like to hear your sentiments on this
subject.
Why, sir, returned Mr. Monday, I have the greatest
confidence in your knowledge, Captain Truck, and am
equally ready for peace or war, although my calling is for
the first. I should try negotiation to begin with, sir, if it be
practicable, and you will allow me to express an opinion;
after which I would offer war.
I am quite of the same mind, sir; but in what way are
we to negotiate with a people we cannot make understand a
word we say? It is true, if they were versed in the science
of signs, one might do something with them; but I have
reason to know that they are as stupid as boobies on all such
subjects. We shall get ourselves into a category at the first
protocol
, as the writers say.
Now, Mr. Monday thought there was a language that any
man might understand, and he was strongly disposed to
profit by it. In rummaging the wreck, he had discovered a
case of liquor, besides a cask of Hollands, and he thought
an offering of these might have the effect to put the Arabs
in good humour at least.
I have known men, who, treated with dry, in matters
of trade, were as obstinate as mules, become reasonable and
pliable, sir, over a bottle, he said, after explaining where
the liquor was to be found; and I think, if we offer the
Arabs this, after they have been in possession a short time,
we shall find them better disposed towards us. If it should
not prove so, I confess, for one, I should feel less reluctance
in shooting them than before.
I have somewhere heard that the Mussulmans never
drink, observed Sir George; in which case we shall find
our offering despised. Then there is the difficulty of a first
possession; for, if these people are the same as those that
were here before, they may not thank us for giving them so
small a part of that, of which they may lay claim to all.
I'm very sure, were any one to offer me my patent pistols,
as a motive for letting him carry away my patent razors, or
the East India dressing-case, or any thing else I own, I
should not feel particularly obliged to him.
Capitally put, Sir George, and I should be quite of your
way of thinking, if I did not believe these Arabs might really
be mollified by a little drink. If I had a proper ambassador
to send with the offering, I would resort to the plan at once.
Mr. Monday, after a moment's hesitation, spiritedly offered
to be one of two, to go to the Arabs with the proposal, for
he had sufficient penetration to perceive that there was little
danger of his being seized, while an armed party of so
much strength remained to be overcomeand he had
sufficient
nerve to encounter the risk. All he asked was a
companion
,
and Captain Truck was so much struck with the
spirit of the volunteer, that he made up his mind to
accompany
him himself. To this plan, however, both the mates
and all the crew, stoutly but respectfully objected. They
felt his importance too much to consent to this exposure, and
neither of the mates, even, would be allowed to go on an
expedition of so much hazard, without a sufficient motive.
They might fight, if they pleased, but they should not run
into the mouth of the lion unarmed and unresisting.
It is of no moment, said Mr. Monday; I could have
liked a gentlemen for my companion; but no one of the
brave fellows will have any objection to passing an hour in
company with an Arab Sheik over a bottle. What say you,
my lads, will any one of you volunteer?
Ay, ay, sir! cried a dozen in a breath.
This will never do, interrupted the captain; I have
need of the men, for my heart is still set on these two sticks
that remain, and we have a head-sea and a stiff breeze to
struggle with in getting back to the ship. By George, I
have it! What do you say to Mr. Dodge for a companion,
Mr. Monday? He is used to committees, and likes the
service
:
and then he has need of some stimulant, after the
ducking he has received. Mr. Leach, take a couple of hands,
and go off in the jolly-boat and bring Mr. Dodge on shore.
My compliments to him, and tell him he has been
unanimously
chosen to a most honourable and lucrativeay, and
a popular employment.
As this was an order, the mate did not scruple about
obeying it. He was soon afloat, and on his way towards
the launch. Captain Truck now hailed the top, and
inquired
what the Arabs were about. The answer was
satisfactory
,
as they were still busy with their camels and in
pitching their tents. This did not look much like an
immediate
war, and bidding the man aloft to give timely notice
of their approach, Mr. Truck fancied he might still have
time to shift his sheers, and to whip out the mizzen-mast, and
he accordingly set about it without further delay.
As every one worked, as it might be for life, in fifteen
minutes this light spar was suspended in the falls. In ten
more its heel was clear of the bulwarks, and it was lowered
on the sands almost by the run. To knock off the top and
roll it down to the water took but a few minutes longer, and
then the people were called to their breakfast; the sentinel
aloft reporting that the Arabs were employed in the same
manner, and in milking their camels. This was a fortunate
relief, and every body ate in peace, and in the full assurance
that those whom they so much distrusted were equally
engaged
in the same pacific manner.
Neither the Arabs nor the seamen, however, lost any
unnecessary time at the meal. The former were soon
reported
to be coming and going in parties of fifteen or twenty,
arriving and departing in an eastern direction.
Occasionally
a single runner went or came alone, on a fleet
dromedary
,
as if communications were held with other bodies
which lay deeper in the desert. All this intelligence
rendered
Captain Truck very uneasy, and he thought it time
seriously to take some decided measures to bring this
matter to an issue. Still, as time gained was all in his
favour if improved, he first ordered the men to begin to
shift the sheers forward, in hopes of being yet able to
carry off the foremast; a spar that would be exceedingly
useful, as it would save the necessity of fishing a new head
to the one which still stood in the packet. He then went
aside with his two ambassadors, with a view to give his
instructions
.
Mr. Dodge had no sooner found himself safe in the launch
than he felt his courage revive, and with his courage, his
ingenuity, self-love and assurance. While in the water, a
meeker man there was not on earth; he had even some
doubts as to the truth of all his favourite notions of liberty
and equality, for men think fast in danger, and there was
an instant when he might have been easily persuaded to
acknowledge
himself a demagogue and a hypocrite in his
ordinary
practices; one whose chief motive was self, and whose
besetting passions were envy, distrust and malice; or, in
other words, very much the creature he was. Shame came
next, and he eagerly sought an excuse for the want of
manliness
he had betrayed; but, passing over the language he
had held in the launch, and the means Mr. Leach found to
persuade him to land again, we shall give his apology in his
own words, as he now somewhat hurriedly delivered it, to
Captain Truck, in his own person.
I must have misunderstood your arrangement, captain,
he said; for somehow, though
how
I do not exactly know
but
somehow
the alarm of the Arabs was no sooner given
than I felt as if I
ought
to be in the launch to be at my post;
but I suppose it was because I knew that the sails and spars
that brought us here are mostly there, and that this was the
spot to be most resolutely defended. I
do
think, if they
had waded off to us, I should have fought like a tiger!
No doubt you would, my dear sir, and like a wild cat
too! We all make mistakes in judgment, in war, and in
3*
politics, and no fact is better known than that the best
soldiers
in the end are they who give a little ground at the
first attack. But Mr. Leach has explained to you the plan
of Mr. Monday, and I rely on your spirit and zeal, which
there is now an excellent opportunity to prove, as before it
was only demonstrated.
If it were only an opportunity of meeting the Arabs
sword in hand, captain.
Pooh! pooh! my dear friend, take
two
swords if you
choose. One who is full of fight can never get the battle
on his own terms. Fill the Arabs with the
schnaps
of the
poor Dane, and if they should make the smallest symptom
of moving down towards us, I rely on you to give the
alarm, in order that we may be ready for them. Trust to
us for the
overture
of the
piece
, as I trust to you for the
overtures of peace.
In what way can we possibly do this, Mr. Monday?
How
can
we give the alarm in season?
Why, interposed the unmoved captain, you may
just shoot the sheik, and that will be killing two birds with
one stone; you will take your pistols, of course, and blaze
away upon them, starboard and larboard; rely on it, we
shall hear you.
Of that I make no doubt, but I rather distrust the
prudence
of the step. That is, I declare, Mr. Monday, it looks
awfully like tempting Providence! I begin to have
conscientious
scruples. I hope you are quite certain, captain,
there is nothing in all this against the laws of Africa? Good
moral and religious influences are not to be overlooked. My
mind is quite exercised in the premises!
You are much too conscientious for a diplomatic man,
said Mr. Truck, between the puffs at a fresh cigar. You
need not shoot any of the women, and what more does a
man want? Come, no more words, but to the duty heartily.
Every one expects it of you, since no one can do it half
so well; and if you ever get back to Dodgeopolis, there
will be matter for a paragraph every day of the year for
the next six months. If any thing serious happen to you,
trust to me to do your memory justice.
Captain, captain, this trifling with the future is
blasphemous
!
Men seldom talk of death with impunity, and
it really hurts my feelings to touch on such awful subjects
so lightly. I will go, for I do not well see how the matter
is to be helped; but let us go amicably, and with such
presents
as will secure a good reception and a safe return.
Mr. Monday takes the liquor-case of the Dane, and you
are welcome to any thing that is left, but the foremast.
That
I shall fight for, even if lions come out of the desert
to help the Arabs.
Mr. Dodge had many more objections, some of which he
urged openly, and more of which he felt in his inmost spirit.
But for the unfortunate dive into the water, he certainly
would have pleaded his immunities as a passenger, and
plumply refused to be put forward on such an occasion; but
he felt that he was a disgraced man, and that some decided
act of spirit was necessary to redeem his character. The
neutrality observed by the Arabs, moreover, greatly
encouraged
him; for he leaned to an opinion Captain Truck
had expressed, that so long as a strong-armed party
remained
in the wreck, the sheik, if a man of any moderation
and policy, would not proceed to violence.
You may tell him, gentlemen, continued Mr. Truck,
that as soon as I have whipped the foremast out of the
Dane, I will evacuate, and leave him the wreck, and all it
contains. The stick can do him no good, and I want it in
my heart's core. Put this matter before him plainly, and
there is no doubt we shall part the best friends in the world.
Remember one thing, however, we shall set about lifting the
spar the moment you quit us, and should there be any signs
of an attack, give us notice in season, that we may take to
our arms.
By this reasoning Mr. Dodge suffered himself to be
persuaded
to go on the mission, though his ingenuity and fears
supplied an additional motive that he took very good care
not to betray. Should there be a battle, he knew he would
be expected to fight, if he remained with his own party, and
if with the other, he might plausibly secrete himself until the
affair was over; for, with a man of his temperament,
eventual slavery had less horrors than immediate death.
When Mr. Monday and his co-commissioner ascended the
bank, bearing the case of liquors and a few light offerings,
that the latter had found in the wreck, it was just as the
crew, assured that the Arabs still remained tranquil, had
seriously set about pursuing their great object. On the
margin of the plain, Captain Truck took his leave of the
ambassadors, though he remained some time to reconnoitre
the appearance of things in the wild-looking camp, which
was placed within two hundred yards of the spot on which
he stood. The number of the Arabs had not certainly been
exaggerated, and what gave him the most uneasiness was
the fact that parties appeared to be constantly
communicating
with more, who probably lay behind a ridge of sand
that bounded the view less than a mile distant inland, as
they all went and came in that direction. After waiting to
see his two
envoys
in the very camp, he stationed a
look-out
on the bank, and returned to the wreck, to hurry on the
all-important work.
Mr. Monday was the efficient man of the two
commissioners
,
so soon as they were fairly embarked in their
enterprise
.
He was strong of nerves, and without imagination to
fancy dangers where they were not very obvious, and had a
great faith in the pacific virtues of the liquor-case. An
Arab advanced to meet them, when near the tents; and
although conversation was quite out of the question, by pure
force of gesticulations, aided by the single word sheik,
they succeeded in obtaining an introduction to that personage.
The inhabitants of the desert have been so often described
that we shall assume they are known to our readers, and
proceed with our narrative the same as if we had to do with
Christians. Much of what has been written of the
hospitality
of the Arabs, if true of any portion of them, is hardly
true of those tribes which frequent the Atlantic coast, where
the practice of wrecking would seem to have produced the
same effect on their habits and morals that it is known to
produce elsewhere. But a ship protected by a few
weather-worn
and stranded mariners, and a ship defended by a strong
and an armed party, like that headed by Captain Truck,
presented very different objects to the cupidity of these
barbarians
.
They knew the great advantage they possessed
by being on their own ground, and were content to await
events, in preference to risking a doubtful contest. Several
of the party had been at Mogadore, and other parts, and had
acquired tolerably accurate ideas of the power of vessels;
and as they were confident the men now at work at the
wreck had not the means of carrying away the cargo, their
own principal object, curiosity and caution, connected with
certain plans that were already laid among their leaders,
kept them quiet, for the moment at least.
These people were not so ignorant as to require to be
told that some other vessel was at no great distance, and
their scouts had been out in all directions to ascertain the
fact, previously to taking their ultimate measures; for the
sheik himself had some pretty just notions of the force of a
vessel of war, and of the danger of contending with one.
The result of his policy, therefore, will better appear in the
course of the narrative.
The reception of the two envoys of Captain Truck was
masked by that smiling and courteous politeness which
seems to diminish as one travels west, and to increase as
he goes eastward; though it was certainly less elaborate
than would have been found in the palace of an Indian
rajah. The sheik was not properly a sheik, nor was the
party composed of genuine Arabs, though we have thus
styled them from usage. The first, however, was a man in
authority, and he and his followers possessed enough of the
origin and characteristics of the tribes east of the Red Sea,
to be sufficiently described by the appellation we have
adopted.
Mr. Monday and Mr. Dodge were invited by signs to be
seated, and refreshments were offered. As the last were
not particularly inviting, Mr. Monday was not slow in
producing
his own offering, and in recommending its quality,
by setting an example of the way in which it ought to be
treated. Although Mussulmans, the hosts did not scruple
about tasting the cup, and ten minutes of pantomime,
potations
,
and grimaces, brought about a species of intimacy
between the parties.
The man who had been so unceremoniously captured
the previous night by Captain Truck, was now introduced,
and much curiosity was manifested to know whether his
account of the disposition in the strangers to eat their
fellow-creatures
was true. The inhabitants of the desert, in the
course of ages, had gleaned certain accounts of mariners
eating their shipmates, from their different captives, and
vague traditions to that effect existed among them, which
the tale of this man had revived. Had the sheik kept a
journal, like Mr. Dodge, the result of these inquiries would
probably have been some entries concerning the customs
and characters of the Americans, that were quite as
original
as those of the editor of the Active Inquirer
concerning
the different nations he had visited.
Mr. Monday paid great attention to the pantomime of
the Arab, in which that worthy endeavoured to explain the
disposition of Captain Truck to make a barbecue of him:
when it was ended, he gravely informed his companions
that the sheik had invited them to stay for dinner,a
proposition
that he was disposed to accept; but the
sensitiveness
of Mr. Dodge viewed the matter otherwise, for, with a
conformity of opinion that really said something in favour
of the science of signs, he arrived at the same conclusion
as the poor Arab himselfwith the material difference,
that he fancied that the Arabs were disposed to make a
meal of himself. Mr. Monday, who was a hearty beef and
brandy personage, scouted the idea, and thought the matter
settled, by pointing to two or three young camels and
asking
the editor if he thought any man, Turk or Christian,
would think of eating one so lank, meagre, and uninviting,
as himself, when they had so much capital food of another
sort at their elbow. Take your share of the liquor while
it is passing, man, and set your heart at ease as to the
dinner, which I make no doubt will be substantial and
decent. Had I known of the favour intended us, I should
have brought out the sheik a service of knives and forks
from Birmingham; for he really seems a well-disposed and
gentleman-like man. A very capital fellow, I dare say,
we shall find him, after he has had a few camel's steaks,
and a proper allowance of
schnaps
. Mr. Sheik, I drink
your health with all my heart.
The accidents of life could scarcely have brought
together
,
in circumstances so peculiar, men whose characters
were more completely the converse of each other than Mr.
Monday and Mr. Dodge. They were perfect epitomes of
two large classes in their respective nations, and so
diametrically
opposed to each other, that one could hardly recognise
in them scions from a common stock. The first was dull,
obstinate, straight-forward, hearty in his manners, and not
without sincerity, though wily in a bargain, with all his
seeming frankness; the last, distrustful, cunning rather than
quick of comprehension, insincere, fawning when he thought
his interests concerned, and jealous and detracting at all
other times, with a coldness of exterior that had at least the
merit of appearing to avoid deception. Both were violently
prejudiced, though in Mr. Monday, it was the prejudice of
old dogmas, in religion, politics, and morals; and in the
other, it was the vice of provincialism, and an education that
was not entirely free from the fanaticism of the seventeenth
century. One consequence of this discrepancy of character
was a perfectly opposite manner of viewing matters in this
interview. While Mr. Monday was disposed to take things
amicably, Mr. Dodge was all suspicion; and had they then
returned to the wreck, the last would have called to arms,
while the first would have advised Captain Truck to go out
and visit the sheik, in the manner one would visit a
respectable
and agreeable neighbour.
CHAPTER III.
'Tis of more worth than kingdoms! far more precious
'Than all the crimson treasures of life's fountain!
Oh let it not elude thy grasp!
Cotton
.
Things
were in this state, the sheik and his guests
communicating
by signs, in such a way as completely to
mystify each other; Mr. Monday drinking, Mr. Dodge
conjecturing
,
and parties quitting the camp and arriving every
ten minutes, when an Arab pointed eagerly with his finger
in the direction of the wreck. The head of the foremast
was slowly rising, and the look-out in the top was clinging
to the spar, which began to cant, in order to keep himself
from falling. The sheik affected to smile; but he was
evidently
disturbed, and two or three messengers were sent out
into the camp. In the meanwhile, the spar began to lower,
and was soon entirely concealed beneath the bank.
It was now apparent that the Arabs thought the moment
had arrived when it was their policy to interfere. The sheik,
therefore, left his guests to be entertained by two or three
others who had joined in the potations, and making the best
assurances he could by means of signs, of his continued
amity, he left the tent. Laying aside all his arms, attended
by two or three old men like himself, he went boldly to the
plank, and descended quietly to the sands, where he found
Captain Truck busied in endeavouring to get the spar into
the water. The top was already afloat, and the stick itself
was cut round in the right position for rolling, when the foul
but grave-looking barbarians appeared among the workmen.
As the latter had been apprised of their approach, and of
the fact of their being unarmed, no one left his employment
to receive them, with the exception of Captain Truck
himself
.
Bear a hand with the spar, Mr. Leach, he said, while
I entertain these gentlemen. It is a good sign that they
come to us without arms, and it shall never be said that we
are behind them in civility. Half an hour will settle our
affairs, when these gentry are welcome to what will be left
of the Dane.Your servant, gentlemen; I'm glad to see
you, and beg the honour to shake hands with all of you,
from the oldest to the youngest.
Although the Arabs understood nothing that was said,
they permitted Captain Truck to give each of them a hearty
shake of the hand, smiling and muttering their own
compliments
with as much apparent good will as was manifested
by the old seaman himself.
God help the Danes, if they have fallen into servitude
among these blackguards! said the captain, aloud, while he
was shaking the sheik a second time most cordially by the
hand, for a fouler set of thieves I never laid eyes on,
Leach. Mr. Monday had tried the virtue of the
schnaps
on
them, notwithstanding, for the odour of gin is mingled with
that of grease, about the old scoundrel.Roll away at the
spar, boys! half-a-dozen more such heaves, and you will
have him in his native element, as the newspapers call it.
I'm glad to see you, gentlemen; we are badly off as to
chairs, on this beach, but to such as we have you are
heartily
welcome.Mr. Leach, the Arab sheik;Arab sheik,
Mr. Leach.On the bank there?
Sir.
Any movement among the Arabs?
About thirty have just ridden back into the desert,
mounted on camels, sir; nothing more.
No signs of our passengers?
Ay, ay, sir. Here comes Mr. Dodge under full sail,
heading for the bank, as straight as he can lay his course!
Ha!Is he pursued?
The men ceased their work, and glanced aside at their
arms.
Not at all, sir. Mr. Monday is calling after him, and
the Arabs seem to be laughing. Mr. Monday is just
splicing
the main-brace with one of the rascals.
Let the Atlantic ocean, then, look out for itself, for Mr.
Dodge will be certain to run over it. Heave away, my
hearties, and the stick will be afloat yet before that
gentleman
is fairly docked.
The men worked with good will, but their zeal was far
less efficient than that of the editor of the Active Inquirer,
who now broke through the bushes, and plunged down the
bank with a velocity which, if continued, would have
carried
him to Dodgeopolis itself within the month. The Arabs
started at this sudden apparition, but perceiving that those
around them laughed, they were disposed to take the
interruption
in good part. The look-out now announced the
approach
of Mr. Monday, followed by fifty Arabs; the latter,
however, being without arms, and the former without his
hat. The moment was critical, but the steadiness of
Captain
Truck did not desert him. Issuing a rapid order to the
second mate, with a small party previously selected for that
duty, to stand by the arms, he urged the rest of the people
to renewed exertions. Just as this was done, Mr. Monday
appeared on the bank, with a bottle in one hand and a glass
in the other, calling aloud to Mr. Dodge to return and drink
with the Arabs.
Do not disgrace Christianity in this unmannerly way,
he said; but show these gentlemen of the desert that we
know what propriety is. Captain Truck, I beg of you to
Vol. II.  4
urge Mr. Dodge to return. I was about to sing the Arabs,
`God save the King,' and in a few more minutes we should
have had `Rule Britannia,' when we should have been the
best friends and companions in the world. Captain Truck,
I've the honour to drink your health.
But Captain Truck viewed the matter differently. Both
his ambassadors were now safely back, for Mr. Monday
came down upon the beach, followed, it is true, by all the
Arabs, and the mast was afloat. He thought it better,
therefore, that Mr. Dodge should remain, and that the two
parties should be as quietly, but as speedily as possible,
separated
.
He ordered the hauling line to be fastened to the
mast, and as the stick was slowly going out through the surf,
he issued the order for the men to collect their implements,
take their arms, and to assemble in a body at the rocks,
where the jolly-boat still lay.
Be quick, men, but be steady; for there are a hundred
of these rascals on the beach already, and all the last-comers
are armed. We might pick up a few more useful things
from the wreck, but the wind is coming in from the
westward
,
and our principal concern now will be to save what
we have got. Lead Mr. Monday along with you, Leach, for
he is so full of diplomacy and
schnaps
just now that he
forgets
his safety. As for Mr. Dodge, I see he is stowed away
in the boat already, as snug as the ground-tier in a ship
loaded with molasses. Count the men off, sir, and see that
no one is missing.
By this time, the state of things on the beach had
undergone
material changes. The wreck was full of Arabs, some
of whom were armed and some not; while mauls, crows,
hand-spikes, purchases, coils of rigging, and marling-spikes
were scattered about on the sands, just where they had been
dropped by the seamen. A party of fifty Arabs had collected
around the rocks, where, by this time, all the mariners
were assembled, intermingling with the latter, and
apparently
endeavouring to maintain the friendly relations which
had been established by Mr. Monday. As a portion of
these men were also armed, Captain Truck disliked their
proceedings; but the inferiority of his numbers, and the
disadvantage under which he was placed, compelled him to
resort to management rather than force, in order to extricate
himself.
The Arabs now crowded around and intermingled with
the seamen, thronged the ship, and lined the bank, to the
number of more than two hundred. It became evident that
their true force had been underrated, and that additions
were constantly making to it, from those who lay behind
the ridges of sand. All those who appeared last, had arms
of one kind or another, and several brought fire-arms,
which they gave to the sheik, and to those who had first
descended to the beach. Still, every face seemed amicable,
and the men were scarcely permitted to execute their orders,
from the frequent interruptions to exchange tokens of
friendship
.
But Captain Truck fully believed that hostilities were
intended
,
and although he had suffered himself in some
measure
to be surprised, he set about repairing his error with
great judgment and admirable steadiness. His first step
was to extricate his own people from those who pressed
upon them, a thing that was effected by causing a few to
take a position, that might be defended, higher among the
rocks, as they afforded a good deal of cover, and which
communicated directly with the place where they had
landed; and then ordering the remainder of the men to fall
back singly. To prevent an alarm, each man was called
off by name, and in this manner the whole party had got
within the prescribed limits, before the Arabs, who were
vociferating
and talking altogether, seemed to be aware of the
movement. When some of the latter attempted to follow,
they were gently repulsed by the sentinels. All this time
Captain Truck maintained the utmost cordiality towards the
sheik, keeping near him, and amongst the Arabs himself.
The work of plunder, in the meantime, had begun in earnest
in the wreck, and this he thought a favourable symptom, as
men thus employed would be less likely to make a hostile
attack. Still he knew that prisoners were of great account
among these barbarians, and that an attempt to tow the raft
off from the land, in open boats, where his people would be
exposed to every shot from the wreck, would subject them to
the greatest danger of defeat, were the former disposed to
prevent it.
Having reflected a few minutes on his situation, Captain
Truck issued his final orders. The jolly-boat might carry
a dozen men at need, though they would be crowded and
much exposed to fire; and he, therefore, caused eight to get
into her, and to pull out to the launch. Mr. Leach went
with this party, for the double purpose of directing its
movements
,
and of being separated from his commander, in
order that one of those who were of so much importance
to the packet, might at least stand a chance of being saved.
This separation also was effected without alarming the
Arabs, though Captain Truck observed that the sheik
watched the proceeding narrowly.
As soon as Mr. Leach had reached the launch, he caused
a light kedge to be put into the jolly-boat, and coils of the
lightest rigging he had were laid on the top of it, or were
made on the bows of the launch. As soon as this was
done, the boat was pulled a long distance off from the land,
paying out the ropes first from the launch, and then from
the boat itself, until no more of the latter remained. The
kedge was then dropped, and the men in the launch began
to haul in upon the ropes that were attached to it. As the
jolly-boat returned immediately, and her crew joined in
the work, the line of boats, the kedge by which they had
previously ridden having been first raised, began slowly to
recede from the shore.
Captain Truck had rightly conjectured the effect of this
movement. It was so unusual and so gradual, that the
launch and the raft were warped up to the kedge, before
the Arabs fully comprehended its nature. The boats were
now more than a quarter of a mile from the wreck, for Mr.
Leach had run out quite two hundred fathoms of small
rope, and of course, so distant as greatly to diminish the
danger from the muskets of the Arabs, though still within
reach of their range. Near an hour was passed in
effecting
this point, which, as the sea and wind were both rising,
could not probably have been effected in any other manner,
half as soon, if at all.
The state of the weather, and the increasing turbulence
of the barbarians, now rendered it extremely desirable to
all on the rocks to be in their boats again. A very
moderate
blow would compel them to abandon their hard-earned
advantages, and it began to be pretty evident, from the
manners of those around them, that amity could not much
longer be maintained. Even the old sheik retired, and,
instead
of going to the wreck, he joined the party on the
beach, where he was seen in earnest conversation with
several other old men, all of whom gesticulated vehemently,
as they pointed towards the boats and to the party on the
rocks.
Mr. Leach now pulled in towards the bar, with both the
jolly-boats and the cutter, having only two oars each, half
his men being left in the launch. This was done that the
people might not be crowded at the critical moment, and
that, at need, there might be room to fight as well as to row;
all these precautions having been taken in consequence of
Captain Truck's previous orders. When the boats reached
the rocks, the people did not hurry into them; but a quarter
of an hour was passed in preparations, as if they were
indifferent
about proceeding, and even then the jolly-boat
alone took in a portion, and pulled leisurely without the
bar. Here she lay on her oars, in order to cover the
passage
of the other boats, if necessary, with her fire. The
cutter imitated this manuvre, and the boat of the wreck
went last. Captain Truck quitted the rock after all the
others, though his embarkation was made rapidly by a
prompt and sudden movement.
Not a shot was fired, however, and, contrary to his own
most ardent hopes, the captain found himself at the launch,
with all his people unhurt, and with all the spars he had so
much desired to obtain. The forbearance of the Arabs
was a mystery to him, for he had fully expected hostilities
would commence, every moment, for the last two hours.
Nor was he yet absolutely out of danger, though there was
time to pause and look about him, and to take his
succeeding
measures more deliberately. The first report was a
scarcity of both food and water. For both these essentials
the men had depended on the wreck, and, in the eagerness
to secure the foremast, and subsequently to take care of
themselves, these important requisites had been overlooked,
quite probably, too, as much from a knowledge that the
Montauk was so near, as from hurry. Still both were
extremely
desirable, if not indispensable, to men who had the
4*
prospect of many hours' hard work before them; and
Captain
Truck's first impulse was to despatch a boat to the
ship for supplies. This intention was reluctantly
abandoned
,
however, on account of the threatening appearance
of the weather.
There was no danger of a gale, but a smart sea breeze
was beginning to set in, and the surface of the ocean was,
as usual, getting to be agitated. Changing all his plans,
therefore, the Captain turned his immediate attention to the
safety of the all-important spars.
We can eat to-morrow, men, he said; but if we
lose these sticks, our chance for getting any more will
indeed be small. Take a gang on the raft, Mr. Leach,
and double all the lashings, while I see that we get an
offing. If the wind rises any more, we shall need it, and
even then be worse off than we could wish.
The mate passed upon the raft, and set about securing
all the spars by additional fastenings; for the working,
occasioned by the sea, already rendered them loose, and
liable to separate. While this was in train, the two
jolly-boats
took in lines and kedges, of which, luckily, they had
one that was brought from the packet, besides two found in
the wreck, and pulled off into the ocean. As soon as one
kedge was dropped, that by which the launch rode was
tripped, and the boats were hauled up to it, the other
jolly-boat
proceeding on to renew the process. In this manner,
in the course of two more hours, the whole, raft and all,
were warped broad off from the land, and to windward,
quite two miles, when the water became so deep that
Captain
Truck reluctantly gave the order to cease.
I would gladly work our way into the offing in this
mode, three or four leagues, he said, by which means
we might make a fair wind of it. As it is, we must get all
clear, and do as well as we can. Rig the masts in the
launch, Mr. Leach, and we will see what can be done with
this dull craft we have in tow.
While this order was in course of execution, the glass
was used to ascertain the manner in which the Arabs were
occupied. To the surprise of all in the boats, every soul
of them had disappeared. The closest scrutiny could not
detect one near the wreek, on the beach, nor even at the
spot where the tents had so lately stood.
They are all off, by George! cried Captain Truck,
when fully satisfied of the fact. Camels, tents, and Arabs!
The rascals have loaded their beasts already, and most
probably have gone to hide their plunder, that they may be
back and make sure of a second haul, before any of their
precious brother vultures, up in the sands, get a scent
of the carrion. Dn the rogues; I thought at one
time they had me in a category! Well, joy be with them!
Mr. Monday, I return you my hearty thanks for the manly,
frank, and diplomatic manner in which you have discharged
the duties of your mission. Without you, we might not
have succeeded in getting the foremast. Mr. Dodge, you
have the high consolation of knowing that, throughout this
trying occasion, you have conducted yourself in a way no
other man of the party could have done.
Mr. Monday was sleeping off the fumes of the
schnaps
,
but Mr. Dodge bowed to the compliment, and foresaw many
capital things for the journal, and for the columns of the
Active Inquirer. He even began to meditate a book.
Now commenced much the most laborious and critical
part of the service that Captain Truck had undertaken, if
we except the collision with the Arabsthat of towing all
the heavy spars of a large ship, in one raft, in the open sea,
near a coast, and with the wind blowing on shore. It is true
he was strong-handed, being able to put ten oars in the
launch, and four in all the other boats; but, after making
sail, and pulling steadily for an hour, it was discovered that
all their exertions would not enable them to reach the ship,
if the wind stood, before the succeeding day. The drift to
leeward, or towards the beach, was seriously great, every
heave of the sea setting them bodily down before it; and by
the time they were half a mile to the southward, they were
obliged to anchor, in order to keep clear of the breakers,
which by this time extended fully a mile from shore.
Decision was fortunately Captain Truck's leading quality.
He foresaw the length and severity of the struggle that was
before them, and the men had not been pulling ten minutes,
before he ordered Mr. Leach, who was in the cutter, to cast
off his line and to come alongside the launch.
Pull back to the wreck, sir, he said, and bring off all
you can lay hands on, in the way of bread, water, and
other comforts. We shall make a night of it, I see. We
will keep a look-out for you, and if any Arabs heave in
sight on the plain, a musket will be fired; if so many as to
render a hint to abscond necessary, two muskets will be
fired, and the mainsail of the launch will be furled for two
minutes; more time than that we cannot spare you.
Mr. Leach obeyed this order, and with great success.
Luckily the cook had left the coppers full of food, enough
to last twenty-four hours, and this had escaped the Arabs,
who were ignorant where to look for it. In addition, there
was plenty of bread and water, and a bull of Jamaica
had been discovered, by the instinct of one of the hands,
which served admirably to keep the people in good humour.
This timely supply had arrived just as the launch anchored,
and Mr. Truck welcomed it with all his heart; for without
it, he foresaw he should soon be obliged to abandon his
precious prize.
When the people were refreshed, the long and laborious
process of warping off the land was resumed, and, in the
course of two hours more, the raft was got fully a league
into the offing, a shoal permitting the kedges to be used
farther out this time than before. Then sail was again
made, and the oars were once more plied. But the sea still
proved their enemy, though they had struck the current
which began to set them south. Had there been no wind
and sea, the progress of the boats would now have been
comparatively easy and quick; but these two adverse
powers drove them in towards the beach so fast, that they
had scarcely made two miles from the wreck when they
were compelled a second time to anchor.
No alternative remained but to keep warping off in this
manner, and then to profit by the offing they had made as
well as they could, the result bringing them at sunset nearly
up with the headland that shut out the view of their own
vessel, from which Captain Truck now calculated that he
was distant a little less than two leagues. The wind had
freshened, and though it was not by any means so strong as
to render the sea dangerous, it increased the toil of the men
to such a degree, that he reluctantly determined to seek out
a proper anchorage, and to give his wearied people some
rest.
It was not in the power of the seamen to carry their raft
into any haven, for to the northward of the head-land, or on
the side on which they were, there was no reef, nor any bay
to afford them shelter. The coast was one continued
waving
line of sand-banks, and in most places, when there was
a wind, the water broke at the distance of a mile from the
beach; the precise spot where the Dane had stranded his
vessel, having most probably been chosen for that purpose,
with a view to save the lives of the people. Under these
circumstances nothing remained but to warp off again to a
safe distance, and to secure the boats as well as they could
for the night. This was effected by eight o'clock, and
Captain
Truck gave the order to let go two additional kedges,
being determined not to strike adrift in the darkness, if it
was in his power to prevent it. When this was done, the
people had their suppers, a watch was set, and the
remainder
went to sleep.
As the three passengers had been exempted from the toil,
they volunteered to look out for the safety of the boats until
midnight, in order that the men might obtain as much rest
as possible; and half an hour after the crew were lost in the
deep slumber of seamen, Captain Truck and these gentlemen
were seated in the launch, holding a dialogue on the events
of the day.
You found the Arabs conversable and ready at the cup,
Mr. Monday? observed the captain, lighting a cigar, which
with him was a never-failing sign for a gossip. Men that,
if they had been sent to school young, taught to dance, and
were otherwise civilized, might make reasonably good
shipmates
,
in this roving world of ours?
Upon my word, sir, I look upon the sheik as uncommon
gentlemanlike, and altogether as a good fellow. He took
his glass without any grimaces, smiled whenever he said any
thing, though I could not understand a word he said, and
answered all my remarks quite as civilly as if he spoke
English. I must say, I think Mr. Dodge manifested a want
of consideration in quitting his company with so little
ceremony
.
The gentleman was hurt, I'll answer for it, and he
would say as much if he could only make out to explain
himself on the subject. Sir George, I regret we had not the
honour of your company on the occasion, for I have been
told these Arabs have a proper respect for the nobility and
gentry. Mr. Dodge and myself were but poor substitutes
for a gentleman like yourself.
The trained humility of Mr. Monday was little to the liking
of Mr. Dodge, who by the sheer force of the workings of
envy had so long been endeavouring to persuade others that
he was the equal of any and every other mana delusion,
however, in which he could not succeed in persuading
himself
to fall intoand he was not slow in exhibiting the
feeling
it awakened.
Sir George Templemore has too just a sense of the rights
of nations to make this distinction, Mr. Monday, he said.
If I left the Arab sheik a little abruptly, it was because I
disliked his ways; for I take it Africa is a free country, and
that no man is obliged to remain longer in a tent than it suits
his own convenience. Captain Truck knows that I was
merely running down the beach to inform him that the sheik
intended to follow, and he no doubt appreciates my motive.
If not, Mr. Dodge, put in the captain, like other patriots,
you must trust to posterity to do you justice. The joints and
sinews are so differently constructed in different men, that
one never knows exactly how to calculate on speed; but this
much I will make affidavit to, if you wish it, on reaching
home, and that is, that a better messenger could not be found
than Mr. Steadfast Dodge, for a man in a hurry. Sir
George Templemore, we have had but a few of your
opinions since you came out on this expedition, and I should
be gratified to hear your sentiments concerning the Arabs,
and any thing else that may suggest itself at the moment.
Oh, captain! I think the wretches odiously dirty, and
judging from appearances, I should say sadly deficient in
comforts.
In the way of breeches in particular; for I am inclined
to think, Sir George, you are master of more than are to
be found in their whole nation. Well, gentlemen, one must
certainly travel who wishes to see the world; but for this
sheer down here upon the coast of Africa, neither of us
might have ever known how an Arab lives, and what a
nimble
wrecker he makes. For my own part, if the choice lay
between filling the office of Jemmy Ducks, on board the
Montauk, and that of sheik in this tribe, I should, as we say
in America, Mr. Dodge, leave it to the people, and do all in
my power to obtain the first situation. Sir George, I'm afraid
all these
county tongues
, as Mr. Dodge calls them, in the
way of wind and weather, will quite knock the buffalo hunt
on the Prairies in the head, for this fall at least.
I beg, Captain Truck, you will not discredit my French
in this way. I do not call a disappointment `
county tongues
,'
but `
contra toms;
' the phrase probably coming from some
person of the name of
tom
, who was
contra
, or opposed to
every one else.
Perfectly explained, and as clear as bilge-water. Sir
George, has Mr. Dodge mentioned to you the manner in
which these Arabs enjoy life? The gentlemen, by way of
saving dish-water, eat half-a-dozen at a time out of the same
plate. Quite republican, and altogether without pride, Mr.
Dodge, in their notions!
Why, sir, many of their habits struck me as being
simple
and praiseworthy, during the short time I remained in
their country; and I dare say, one who had leisure to study
them might find materials for admiration. I can readily
imagine situations in which a man has no right to
appropriate
a whole dish to himself.
No doubt, and he who wishes a thing so unreasonable
must be a great hog! What a thing is sleep! Here are
these fine fellows as much lost to their dangers and toils as
if at home, and tucked in by their careful and pious mothers.
Little did the good souls who nursed them, and sung pious
songs over their cradles, fancy the hardships they were
bringing them up to! But we never know our fates, or
miserable
dogs most of us would be. Is it not so, Sir George?
The baronet started at this appeal, which crossed the
quaint mind of the captain as a cloud darkens a sunny view,
and he muttered a hasty expression of hope that there was
now no particular reason to expect any more serious
obstacles
to their reaching the ship.
It is not an easy thing to tow a heavy raft in light boats
like these, exactly in the direction you wish it to go,
returned
the captain, gaping. He who trusts to the winds and
waves, trusts an uncertain friend, and one who may fail him
at the very moment when there is most need of their services.
Fair as things now seem, I would give a thousand dollars
of a small stock, in which no single dollar has been lightly
earned, to see these spars safely on board the Montauk, and
snugly fitted to their proper places. Sticks, gentlemen, are
to a ship what limbs are to a man. Without them she rolls
and tumbles about as winds, currents, and seas will; while
with them she walks, and dances, and jumps Jim Crow; ay,
almost talks. The standing rigging are the bones and
gristle; the running gear the veins in which her life
circulates
;
and the blocks the joints.
And which is the heart? asked Sir George.
Her heart is the master. With a sufficient commander
no stout ship is ever lost, so long as she has a foot of water
beneath her false keel, or a ropeyarn left to turn to account.
And yet the Dane had all these.
All but the water. The best craft that was ever
launched
,
is of less use than a single camel, if laid high and dry
on the sands of Africa. These poor wretches truly! And
yet their fate might have been ours, though I thought little
of the risk while we were in the midst of the Arabs. It is
still a mystery to me why they let us escape, especially as
they so soon deserted the wreck. They were strong-handed,
too; counting all who came and went, I think not less than
several hundreds.
The captain now became silent and thoughtful, and, as
the wind continued to rise, he began to feel uneasiness about
his ship. Once or twice he expressed a half-formed
determination
to pull to her in one of the light boats, in order to
look after her safety in person, and then he abandoned it, as
he witnessed the rising of the sea, and the manner in which
the massive raft caused the cordage by which it was held to
strain. At length he too fell asleep, and we shall leave him
and his party for awhile, and return to the Montauk, to give
an account of what occurred on board that ship.
CHAPTER IV.
Nothing beside remains! Round the decay
Of that colossal wreck, boundless and bare,
The lone and level sands stretch far away.
Shelley
.
As Captain Truck was so fully aware of the importance
of rapid movements to the success of his enterprise, it will
be remembered that he left in the ship no seaman, no
servant
,
except Saunders the steward, and, in short, no men but
the two Messrs. Effingham, Mr. Sharp, Mr. Blunt, and the
other person just mentioned. If to these be added, Eve
Effingham, Mademoiselle Viefville, Ann Sidley, and a French
femme de chambre
, the whole party will be enumerated. At
first, it had been the intention of the master to leave one of
his mates behind him, but, encouraged by the secure berth
he had found for his vessel, the great strength of his
moorings
,
the little hold the winds and waves could get of spars
so robbed of their proportions, and of a hull so protected by
the reef, and feeling a certain confidence in the knowledge
of Mr. Blunt, who, several times during the passage, had
betrayed a great familiarity with ships, he came to the
decision
named, and had formally placed the last named
gentleman
in full charge,
ad interim
, of the Montauk.
There was a solemn and exciting interest in the situation
of those who remained in the vessel, after the party of
bustling
seamen had left them. The night came in bland and
tranquil, and although there was no moon, they walked the
deck for hours with strange sensations of enjoyment, mingled
with those of loneliness and desertion. Mr. Effingham and
his cousin retired to their rooms long before the others, who
continued their exercise with a freedom and an absence of
restraint, that they had not before felt, since subjected to the
confinement of the ship.
Our situation is at least novel, Eve observed, for a
party of Parisians, Viennois, Romans, or by whatever name
we may be properly styled.
Vol. II.  5
Say Swiss, then, returned Mr. Blunt; for I believe
that even the cosmopolite has a claim to choose his favourite
residence.
Eve understood the allusion, which carried her back to
the weeks they had passed in company, among the grand
scenery of the Alps; but she would not betray the
consciousness
,
for, whatever may be the ingenuousness of a
female, she seldom loses her sensitiveness on the subject of
her more cherished feelings.
And do you prefer Switzerland to all the other
countries
of your acquaintance? asked Mr. Sharp: England
I leave out of the question, for, though we, who belong to
the island, see so many charms in it, it must be conceded
that strangers seldom join us very heartily in its praises.
I think most travellers would give the palm to Italy.
I am quite of the same opinion, returned the other;
and were I to be confined to a choice of a residence for
life, Italy should be my home. Still, I think, that we like
change in our residence, as well as in the seasons. Italy
is summer, and one, I fear, would weary of even an eternal
June.
Is not Italy rather autumn, a country in which the
harvest is gathered, and where one begins already to see
the fall of the leaf?
To me, said Eve, it would be an eternal summer; as
things are eternal with young ladies. My ignorance would
be always receiving instruction, and my tastes
improvement
.
But, if Italy be summer, or autumn, what is poor
America?
Spring of course, civilly answered Mr. Sharp.
And, do you, Mr. Blunt, who seem to know all parts
of the world equally well, agree in giving
our
country,
my
country at least, this encouraging title?
It is merited in many respects, though there are others
in which the term winter would, perhaps, be better applied.
America is a country not easily understood; for, in some
particulars, like Minerva, it has been born full-grown;
while, in others, it is certainly still an infant.
In what particulars do you especially class it with the
latter? inquired Mr. Sharp.
In strength, to commence, answered the other, slightly
smiling; in opinions, too, and in tastes, and perhaps in
knowledge. As to the latter essential, however, and
practical
things as well as in the commoner comforts, America
may well claim to be in midsummer, when compared with
other nations. I do not think you Americans, Miss
Effingham
,
at the head of civilisation, certainly, as so many of
your own people fancy; nor yet at the bottom, as so many
of those of Mademoiselle Viefville and Mr. Sharp so piously
believe.
And what are the notions of the countrymen of Mr.
Blunt, on the subject?
As far from the truth, perhaps, as any other. I
perceive
there exist some doubts as to the place of my
nativity
,
he added, after a pause that denoted a hesitation,
which all hoped was to end in his setting the matter at rest,
by a simple statement of the fact; and I believe I shall
profit by the circumstance, to praise and condemn at
pleasure
,
since no one can impeach my candour, or impute
either to partialities or prejudices.
That must depend on the justice of your judgments.
In one thing, however, you will have me on your side, and
that is in giving the
pas
to delicious, dreamy Italy! Though
Mademoiselle Viefville will set this down as
lse majest
against
cher Paris;
and I fear, Mr. Sharp will think even
London injured.
Do you really hold London so cheap? inquired the
latter gentleman, with more interest than he himself was
quite aware of betraying.
Indeed, no. This would be to discredit my own tastes
and knowledge. In a hundred things, I think London quite
the finest town of Christendom. It is not Rome, certainly,
and were it in ruins fifteen centuries, I question if people
would flock to the banks of the Thames to dream away
existence
among its crumbling walls; but, in conveniences,
beauty of verdure, a mixture of park-like scenery and
architecture
,
and in magnificence of a certain sort, one would
hardly know where to go to find the equal of London.
You say nothing of its society, Miss Effingham?
It would be presuming, in a girl of my limited experience
to speak of this. I hear so much of the good sense of the
nation, that I dare not say aught against its society, and it
would be affectation for me to pretend to commend it; but
as for your females, judging by my own poor means, they
strike me as being singularly well cultivated and
accomplished
;
and yet
Go on, I entreat you. Recollect we have solemnly
decided
in a general congress of states to be cosmopolites, until
safe within Sandy Hook, and that
la franchise
is the
mot
d'ordre
.
Well, then, I should not certainly describe you English
as a talking people, continued Eve, laughing. In the
way of society, you are quite as agreeable as a people, who
never laugh and seldom speak, can possibly make
themselves
.
Et les jeunes Americaines?
said Mademoiselle
Viefville
,
laconically.
My dear mademoiselle, your question is terrific! Mr.
Blunt has informed me that
they
actually giggle!
Quelle horreur!
It is bad enough, certainly; but I ascribe the report to
calumny. No; if I must speak, let me have Paris for its
society, and Naples for its nature. As respects New York,
Mr. Blunt, I suspend my judgment.
Whatever may be the particular merit which shall most
attract your admiration in favour of the great emporium, as
the grandiloquent writers term the capital of your own state,
I think I can venture to predict it will be neither of those
just mentioned. Of society, indeed, New York has
positively
none: like London, it has plenty of company, which
is disciplined something like a regiment of militia composed
of drafts from different brigades, and which sometimes
mistakes
the drum-major for the colonel.
I had fancied you a New Yorker, until now, observed
Mr. Sharp.
And why not now? Is a man to be blind to facts as
evident as the noon-day sun, because he was born here or
there? If I have told you an unpleasant truth, Miss
Effingham
,
you must accuse
la franchise
of the offence. I believe
you
are not a Manhattanese?
I am a mountaineer; having been born at my father's
country residence.
This gives me courage then, for no one here will have his
filial piety shocked.
Not even yourself?
As for myself, returned Paul Blunt, it is settled I
am a cosmopolite in fact, while you are only a cosmopolite
by convention. Indeed, I question if I might take the same
liberties with either Paris or London, that I am about to take
with palmy Manhattan. I should have little confidence in
the forbearance of my auditors: Mademoiselle Viefville
would hardly forgive me: were I to attempt a criticism on
the first, for instance.
C'est impossible!
you could not, Monsieur Blunt;
vous
parlez trop bien Franais
not to love
Paris
.
I
do
love
Paris
, mademoiselle; and, what is more, I love
Londres
, or even
la Nouvelle Yorck
. As a cosmopolite, I claim this privilege, at least, though I can see defects in all.
If you will recollect, Miss Effingham, that New York is a
social bivouac, a place in which families encamp instead of
troops, you will see the impossibility of its possessing a
graceful, well-ordered, and cultivated society. Then the
town is commercial; and no place of mere commerce can
well have a reputation for its society. Such an anomaly, I
believe, never existed. Whatever may be the usefulness of
trade, I fancy few will contend that it is very graceful.
Florence of old? said Eve.
Florence and her commerce were peculiar, and the
relations of things change with circumstances. When
Florence was great, trade was a monopoly, in a few hands,
and so conducted as to remove the principals from
immediate
contact with its affairs. The Medici traded in spices and
silks, as men traded in politics, through agents. They
probably
never saw their ships, or had any farther connexion
with their commerce, than to direct its spirit. They were
more like the legislator who enacts laws to regulate trade,
than the dealer who fingers a sample, smells at a wine, or
nibbles a grain. The Medici were merchants, a class of
men altogether different from the mere factors, who buy of
one to sell to another, at a stated advance in price, and all
of whose enterprise consists in extending the list of safe
customers, and of doing what is called a `regular business.'
Monopolies do harm on the whole, but they certainly elevate
5*
the favoured few. The Medici and the Strozzi were both
princes and merchants, while those around them were
principally
dependants. Competition, in our day, has let in
thousands to share in the benefits; and the pursuit, while it
is enlarged as a whole, has suffered in its parts by division.
You surely do not complain that a thousand are
comfortable
and respectable to-day, for one that was
il
magnifico
three hundred years since?
Certainly not. I rejoice in the change; but we must
not confound names with things. If we have a thousand
mere factors for one merchant, society, in the general
signification
of the word, is clearly a gainer; but if we had one
Medici for a thousand factors, society, in its particular
signification
,
might also be a gainer. All I mean is, that, in
lowering the pursuit, we have necessarily lowered its
qualifications
;
in other words, every man in trade in New York,
is no more a Lorenzo, than every printer's devil is a
Franklin.
Mr. Blunt cannot be an American! cried Mr. Sharp;
for these opinions would be heresy.
Jamais, jamais
, joined the governess.
You constantly forget the treaty of cosmopolitism. But
a capital error is abroad concerning America on this very
subject of commerce. In the way of merchandise alone,
there is not a Christian maritime nation of any extent, that
has a smaller portion of its population engaged in trade of
this sort than the United States of America. The nation, as
a nation, is agricultural, though the state of transition, in
which a country in the course of rapid settlement must
always exist, causes more buying and selling of real
property
than is usual. Apart from this peculiarity, the
Americans
,
as a whole people, have not the common European
proportions of ordinary dealers.
This is not the prevalent opinion, said Mr. Sharp.
It is not, and the reason is, that all American towns, or
nearly all that are at all known in other countries, are
purely commercial towns. The trading portion of a
community
is always the concentrated portion, too, and of
course, in the absence of a court, of a political, or of a
social capital, it has the greatest power to make itself heard
and felt, until there is a direct appeal to the other classes.
The elections commonly show quite as little sympathy
between the majority and the commercial class as is
consistent
with the public welfare. In point of fact, America
has but a very small class of real merchants, men who are
the cause and not a consequence of commerce, though she
has exceeding activity in the way of ordinary traffic. The
portion of her people who are engaged as factors,for this
is the true calling of the man who is a regular agent
between the common producer and the common consumer,
are of
a
high class as factors, but not of
the
high class of
merchants. The man who orders a piece of silk to be
manufactured at Lyons, at three francs a yard, to sell it in
the regular course of the season to the retailer at three
francs and a half, is no more a true merchant, than the
attorney, who goes through the prescribed forms of the
court in his pleadings, is a barrister.
I do not think these sentiments will be very popular at
home, as Mr. Dodge says, Eve laughingly remarked;
but when shall we reach that home! While we are
talking of these things, here are we, in an almost deserted
ship, within a mile of the great Desert of Sahara! How
beautiful are the stars, mademoiselle! we have never before
seen a vault so studded with brilliants.
That must be owing to the latitude, Mr. Sharp
observed
.
Certainly. Can any one say in what latitude we are
precisely? As Eve asked this question, she unconsciously
turned towards Mr. Blunt; for the whole party had silently
come to the conclusion that he knew more of ships and
navigation than all of them united.
I believe we are not far from twenty-four, which is
bringing us near the tropics, and places us quite sixteen
degrees to the southward of our port. These two affairs
of the chase and of the gale have driven us fully twelve
hundred miles from the course we ought to have taken.
Fortunately, mademoiselle, there are none to feel
apprehensions
on our account, or, none whose interest will be
so keen as to create a very lively distress. I hope,
gentlemen
,
you are equally at ease on this score?
This was the first time Eve had ever trusted herself to
put an interrogatory that might draw from Paul Blunt any
communication that would directly touch upon his
connexions
.
She repented of the speech as soon as made, but
causelessly, as it drew from the young man no answer.
Mr. Sharp observed that his friends in England could
scarcely know of their situation, until his own letters would
arrive to relieve their minds. As for Mademoiselle
Viefville
,
the hard fortune which reduced her to the office of a
governess, had almost left her without natural ties.
I believe we are to have watch and ward to-night,
resumed Eve, after the general pause had continued some
little time. Is it not possible for the elements to put us
in the same predicament as that in which we found the
poor Dane?
Possible, certainly, but scarcely probable, returned
Mr. Blunt. The ship is well moored, and this narrow
ledge of rocks, between us and the ocean, serves admirably
for a break-water. One would not like to be stranded,
helpless as we are, at this moment, on a coast like this!
Why so particularly helpless? You allude to the
absence of our crew?
To that, and to the fact that, I believe, we could not
muster as much as a pocket-pistol to defend ourselves
with, everything in the shape of fire-arms having been
sent with the party in the boats.
Might we not lie on the beach, here, for days, even
weeks, inquired Mr. Sharp, without being discovered by
the Arabs?
I fear not. Mariners have told me that the barbarians
hover along the shores, especially after gales, in the hope
of meeting with wrecks, and that it is surprising how soon
they gain intelligence of any disaster. It is seldom there is
even an opportunity to escape in a boat.
I hope here, at least, we are safe? cried Eve, in a
little terror, and shuddering, as much in playfulness as in
real alarm.
I see no grounds of concern where we are, so long as
we can keep the ship off the shore. The Arabs have no
boats, and if they had, they would not dare to attack a
vessel
that floated, in one, unless aware of her being as truly
helpless as we happen at this moment to be.
This is a chilling consolation, but I shall trust in your
good care, gentlemen. Mademoiselle, it is drawing near
midnight, I believe.
Eve and her companion then courteously wished the two
young men good night, and retired to their state-rooms; Mr.
Sharp remained an hour longer with Mr. Blunt, who had
undertaken
to watch the first few hours, conversing with a light
heart, and gaily; for, though there was a secret
consciousness
of rivalry between these two young men on the subject
of Eve's favour, it was a generous and manly competition,
in which each did the other ample justice. They talked of
their travels, their views of customs and nations, their
adventures
in different countries, and of the pleasure each had
felt in visiting spots renowned by association or the arts;
but not a word was hazarded by either concerning the young
creature who had just left them, and whom each still saw
in his mind's eye, long after her light and graceful form had
disappeared. At length Mr. Sharp went below, his
companion
insisting on being left alone, under the penalty of
remaining
up himself during the second watch. From this
time, for several hours, there was no other noise in the ship
than the tread of the solitary watchman. At the appointed
period of the night, a change took place, and he who had
watched, slept; while he who had slept, watched. Just as
day dawned, however, Paul Blunt, who was in a deep sleep,
felt a shake at his shoulder.
Pardon me, cautiously whispered Mr. Sharp: I fear
we are about to have a most unpleasant interruption to our
solitude.
Heavenly powers!Not the Arabs?
I fear no less: but it is still too dark to be certain of the
fact. If you will rise, we can consult on the situation in
which we are placed. I beg you to be quick.
Paul Blunt had hastily risen on an arm, and he now
passed a hand over his brow, as if to make certain that he
was awake. He had not undressed himself, and in
another
moment he stood on his feet in the middle of the
state-room
.
This is too serious to allow of mistake. We will not
alarm her, then; we will not give any alarm, sir, until
certain
of the calamity.
In that I entirely agree with you, returned Mr. Sharp,
who was perfectly calm, though evidently distressed. I
may be mistaken, and wish your opinion. All on board but
us two are in a profound sleep.
The other drew on his coat, and in a minute both were
on deck. The day had not yet dawned, and the light was
scarce sufficient to distinguish objects even near as those on
the reef, particularly when they were stationary. The rocks,
themselves, however, were visible in places, for the tide was
out, and most of the upper portion of the ledge was bare.
The two gentlemen moved cautiously to the bows of the
vessel, and, concealed by the bulwarks, Mr. Sharp pointed
out to his companion the objects that had given him the
alarm.
Do you see the pointed rock a little to the right of the
spot where the kedge is placed? he said, pointing in the
direction that he meant. It is now naked, and I am quite
certain there was an object on it, when I went below, that
has since moved away.
It may have been a sea-bird; for we are so near
the day, some of them are probably in motion. Was it
large?
Of the size of a man's head, apparently; but this is by
no means all. Here, farther to the north, I distinguished
three objects in motion, wading in the water, near the point
where the rocks are never bare.
They may have been herons; the bird is often found in
these low latitudes, I believe. I can discover nothing.
I would to God, I may have been mistaken, though I do
not think I could be so much deceived.
Paul Blunt caught his arm, and held it like one who
listened
intently.
Heard you that? he whispered hurriedly.
It sounded like the clanking of iron.
Looking around, the other found a handspike, and passing
swiftly up the heel of the bowsprit, he stood between the
knight-heads. Here he bent forward, and looked intently
towards the lines of chains which lay over the bulwarks, as
bow-fasts. Of these chains the parts led quite near each
other, in parallel lines, and as the ship's moorings were taut,
they were hanging in merely a slight curve. From the rocks,
or the place where the kedges were laid to a point within
thirty feet of the ship, these chains were dotted with living
beings crawling cautiously upward. It was even easy, at a
second look, to perceive that they were men stealthily
advancing
on their hands and feet.
Raising the handspike, Mr. Blunt struck the chains
several
violent blows. The effect was to cause the whole of the
Arabsfor it could be no otherssuddenly to cease
advancing
,
and to seat themselves astride the chains.
This is fearful, said Mr. Sharp; but we must die,
rather than permit them to reach the ship.
We must. Stand you here, and if they advance, strike
the chains. There is not an instant to lose.
Paul Blunt spoke hurriedly, and, giving the other the
handspike, he ran down to the bitts, and commenced
loosening
the chains from their fastenings. The Arabs heard the
clanking of the iron-rings, as he threw coil after coil on the
deck, and they did not advance. Presently two parts yielded
together beneath them, and then two more. These were the
signals for a common retreat, and Mr. Sharp now plainly
counted fifteen human forms as they scrambled back towards
the reef, some hanging by their arms, some half in the
water
,
and others lying along the chains, as best they might.
Mr. Blunt having loosened the chains, so as to let their bights
fall into the sea, the ship slowly drifted astern, and rode by
her cables. When this was done, the two young men stood
together in silence on the forecastle, as if each felt that all
which had just occurred was some illusion.
This is indeed terrible, exclaimed Paul Blunt. We
have not even a pistol left! No means of defencenothing
but this narrow belt of water between us and these
barbarians
!
No doubt, too, they have fire-arms; and, as soon as
it is light, they will render it unsafe to remain on deck.
Mr. Sharp took the hand of his companion and pressed it
fervently. God bless you! he said in a stifled voice.
God bless you, for even this brief delay. But for this
happy thought of yours, Miss Effinghamthe otherswe
should
all
have been, by this time, at the mercy of these
remorseless wretches. This is not a moment for false pride
or pitiful deceptions. I think either of us would willingly
die to rescue that beautiful and innocent creature from a fate
like this which threatens her in common with ourselves?
Cheerfully would I lay down my life to be assured that
she was, at this instant, safe in a civilized and Christian
country.
These generous young men squeezed each other's hands,
and at that moment no feeling of rivalry, or of competition
even, entered the heart of either. Both were influenced by
a pure and ardent desire to serve the woman they loved, and
it would be true to say, that scarce a thought of any but Eve
was uppermost in their minds. Indeed so engrossig was
their common care in her behalf, so much more terrible than
that of any other person did her fate appear on being
captured
,
that they forgot, for the moment, there were others in
the ship, and others, too, who might be serviceable in
arresting
the very calamity they dreaded.
They may not be a strong party, said Paul Blunt,
after a little thought, in which case, failing of a surprise,
they may not be able to muster a force sufficient to hazard
an open attack until the return of the boats. We have,
God be praised! escaped being seized in our sleep, and
made unconscious victims of so cruel a fate. Fifteen or
twenty will scarcely dare attempt a ship of this size,
without
a perfect knowledge of our feebleness, and particularly
of our want of arms. There is a light gun on board, and
it is loaded; with this, too, we may hold them at bay, by
not betraying our weakness. Let us awake the others, for
this is not a moment for sleep. We are safe, at least, for
an hour or two; since, without boats, they cannot possibly
find the means to board us in less than that time.
The two young men went below, unconsciously treading
lightly, like those who moved about in the presence of an
impending danger. Paul Blunt was in advance, and to his
great surprise he met Eve at the door of the ladies' cabin,
apparently awaiting their approach. She was dressed, for
apprehension, and the novelty of their situation, had caused
her to sleep in most of her clothes, and a few moments had
sufficed for a hasty adjustment of the toilet. Miss
Effingham
was pale, but a concentration of all her energies
seemed to prevent the exhibition of any womanly terror.
Something is wrong! she said, trembling in spite of
herself, and laying her hand unwittingly on the arm of
Paul Blunt: I heard the heavy fall of iron on the deck.
Compose yourself, dearest Miss Effingham, compose
yourself, I entreat you. I mean, that we have come to
awaken the gentlemen.
Tell me the worst, Powis, I implore you. I am equal,
I think I am equal, to hearing it.
I fear your imagination has exaggerated the danger.
The coast?
Of that there is no cause for apprehension. The sea
is calm, and our fasts are perfectly good.
The boats?
Will doubtless be back in good time.
Surelysurely, said Eve, recoiling a step, as if she
saw a monster, not the Arabs?
They cannot enter the ship, though a few of them are
hovering about us. But for the vigilance of Mr. Sharp,
indeed, we might have all been captured in our sleep. As
it is, we have warning, and there is now little doubt of our
being able to intimidate the few barbarians who have shown
themselves, until Captain Truck shall return.
Then from my soul, I thank you, Sir George
Templemore
,
and for this good office will you receive the thanks
of a father, and the prayers of all whom you have so
signally
served.
Nay, Miss Effingham, although I find this interest in
me so grateful that I have hardly the heart to lessen your
gratitude, truth compels me to give it a juster direction.
But for the promptitude of Mr. Bluntor as I now find I
ought to address him, Mr. Powiswe should truly have all
been lost.
We will not dispute about your merits, gentlemen.
You have both deserved our most heartfelt thanks, and if
you will awaken my father and Mr. John Effingham, I will
arouse Mademoiselle Viefville and my own women. Surely,
surely, this is no time to sleep!
The summons was given at the state-room doors, and
the two young men returned to the deck, for they felt it was
not safe to leave it long at such a moment. All was quite
tranquil above, however, nor could the utmost scrutiny now
detect the presence of any person on the reef.
The rocks are cut off from the shore, farther to the
southward by deeper water, said Paul Bluntfor we shall
Vol. II.  6
continue to call both gentlemen, except on particular
occasions
,
by their
noms de guerre
and when the tide is up
the place cannot be forded. Of this the Arabs are
probably
aware; and having failed in their first attempt, they
will probably retire to the beach as the water is rising, for
they might not like to be left on the riband of rock that
will remain in face of the force that would be likely to be
found in such a vessel.
May they not be acquainted with the absence of most
of our people, and be bent upon seizing the vessel before
they can return?
That indeed is the gloomy side of the conjecture, and
it may possibly be too true; but as the day is beginning to
break, we shall soon learn the worst, and anything is
better than vague distrust.
For some time the two gentlemen paced the quarter-deck
together in silence. Mr. Sharp was the first to speak.
The emotions natural to such an alarm, he said,
have caused Miss Effingham to betray an incognito of
mine, that I fear you find sufficiently absurd. It was quite
accidental, I do assure you; as much so, perhaps, as it
was motiveless.
Except as you might distrust American democracy,
returned Paul, smiling, and feel disposed to propitiate it
by a temporary sacrifice of rank and title.
I declare you do me injustice. My man, whose name
is
Sharp, had taken the state-room, and, finding myself
addressed by his appellation, I had the weakness to adopt
it, under the impression it might be convenient in a packet.
Had I anticipated, in the least, meeting with the
Effinghams
,
I should not have been guilty of the folly, for Mr.
and Miss Effingham are old acquaintances.
While you are thus apologising for a venial offence,
you forget it is to a man guilty of the same error. I knew
your person, from having seen you on the Continent; and
finding you disposed to go by the homely name of Sharp,
in a moment of thoughtlessness, I took its counterpart,
Blunt. A travelling name is sometimes convenient, though
sooner or later I fancy all deceptions bring with them their
own punishments.
It is certain that falsehood requires to be supported by
falsehood. Having commenced in untruth, would it not be
expedient to persevere until we reach America? I, at least,
cannot now assert a right to my proper name, without
deposing an usurper!
It
will
be expedient for you, certainly, if it be only to
escape the homage of that double-distilled democrat, Mr.
Dodge. As for myself, few care enough about me to
render it a matter of moment how I am styled; though, on
the whole, I should prefer to let things stand as they are,
for reasons I cannot well explain.
No more was said on the subject, though both
understood
that the old appellations were to be temporarily
continued. Just as this brief dialogue ended, the rest of
the party appeared on deck. All preserved a forced
calmness
,
though the paleness of the ladies betrayed the intense
anxiety they felt. Eve struggled with her fears on account
of her father, who had trembled so violently, when the
truth was first told him, as to be quite unmanned, but who
now comported himself with dignity, though oppressed with
apprehension almost to anguish. John Effingham was
stern, and in the bitterness of his first sensations he had
muttered a few imprecations on his own folly, in suffering
himself to be thus caught without arms. Once the
terrible
idea of the necessity of sacrificing Eve, in the last
resort, as an expedient preferable to captivity, had flashed
across his mind; but the real tenderness he felt for her,
and his better nature, soon banished the unnatural thought.
Still, when he joined the party on deck, it was with a
general but vague impression, that the moment was at
hand when circumstances had required that they were all
to die together. No one was more seemingly collected
than Mademoiselle Viefville. Her life had been one of
sacrifices, and she had now made up her mind that it was
to pass away in a scene of violence; and, with a species of
heroism that is national, her feelings had been aroused to
a sort of Roman firmness, and she was prepared to meet
her fate with a composure equal to that of the men.
These were the first feelings and impressions of those who
had been awakened from the security of the night, to hear
the tale of their danger; but they lessened as the party
collected
in the open air, and began to examine into their
situation
by means of the steadily increasing light. As the day
advanced, Paul Blunt, in particular, carefully examined the
rocks near the ship, even ascending to the foretop, from
which elevation he overlooked the whole line of the reef; and
something like hope revived in every bosom, when he
proclaimed
the joyful intelligence that nothing having life was
visible in that direction.
God be praised! he said with fervour, as his foot
touched the deck again on descending; we have at least a
respite from the attacks of these barbarians. The tide has
risen so high that they dare not stay on the rocks, lest they
might be cut off; for they probably think us stronger than
we are, and armed. The light gun on the forecastle is
loaded, gentlemen, though not shotted; for there are no shot
in the vessel, Saunders tells me; and I would suggest the
propriety of firing it, both to alarm the Arabs, and as a
signal to our friends. The distance from the wreck is not
so great but it might be heard, and I think they would at
least send a boat to our relief. Sound flies fast, and a short
time may bring us succour. The water will not be low
enough for our enemies to venture on the reef again, under
six or eight hours, and all may yet be well.
This proposal was discussed, and it proving, on inquiry,
that all the powder in the ship, after loading the gun for this
very purpose of firing a signal, had been taken in the boats,
and that no second discharge could be made, it was decided
to lose no more time, but to let their danger be known to
their friends at once, if it were possible to send the sound so
far. When this decision was come to, Mr. Blunt, aided by
Mr. Sharp, made the necessary preparations without delay.
The latter, though doing all he could to assist, envied the
readiness, practical skill and intelligence, with which his
companion, a man of cultivated and polished mind in higher
things, performed every requisite act that was necessary to
effect their purpose. Instead of hastily discharging the piece,
an iron four-pound gun, Mr. Blunt first doubled the wad,
which he drove home with all his force, and then he greased
the muzzle, as he said, to increase the report.
I shall not attempt to explain the philosophy of this,
he added with a mournful smile, but all lovers of salutes
and salvos will maintain that it is useful; and be it so or
not, too much depends on our making ourselves heard, to
neglect any thing that has even a chance of aiding that one
great object. If you will now assist me, Sir George, we
will run the gun over to starboard, in order that it may be
fired on the side next the wreck.
Judging from the readiness you have shown on several
occasions, as well as your familiarity with the terms, I should
think you had served, returned the real baronet, as he
helped his companion to place the gun at a port on the
northern side of the vessel.
You have not mistaken my trade. I was certainly bred,
almost born, a seaman; and though as a traveller I have
now been many years severed from my early habits, little
of what I knew has been lost. Were there five others here,
who had as much familiarity as myself with vessels, I think
we could carry the ship outside the reef, crippled as she is,
and set the Arabs at defiance. Would to God our worthy
captain had never brought her inside.
He did all for the best, no doubt?
Beyond a question; and no more than a commendable
prudence required. Still he has left us in a most critical
position
.
This priming is a little damp, and I distrust it. The
coal, if you please.
Why do you not fire?
At the last moment, I almost repent of my own
expedient
.
Is it quite certain no pistols remain among any of
our effects?
I fear not. Saunders reports that all, even to those of
the smallest size, were put in requisition for the boats.
The charge in this gun might serve for many pistols, or
for several fowling-pieces. I might even sweep the reef, on
an emergency, by using old iron for shot! It appears like
parting with a last friend, to part with this single precious
charge of gunpowder.
Nay, you certainly know best; though I rather think
the Messrs. Effingham are of your first opinion.
It is puerile to waver on such a subject, and I will
hesitate no longer. There are moments when the air seems
to float in the direction of our friends; on the first return of
one of those currents, I will fire.
A minute brought the opportunity, and Paul Blunt, or Paul
6*
Powis, as his real name would now appear to be, applied the
coal. The report was sharp and lively; but as the smoke
floated away, he again expressed his doubts of the wisdom
of what had just been done. Had he then known that the
struggling sounds had diffused themselves in their radii,
without reaching the wreck, his regrets would have been
increased fourfold. This was a fact, however, that could
not be then ascertained, and those in the packet were
compelled
to wait two or three hours before they even got the
certainty of their failure.
As the light increased a view was obtained of the shore,
which seemed as silent and deserted as the reef. For half
an hour the whole party experienced the revulsion of feeling
that accompanies all great changes of emotion, and the
conversation
had even got to be again cheerful, and to turn into
its former channels, when suddenly a cry from Saunders
renewed
the alarm. The steward was preparing the breakfast
in the galley, from which he gave occasional glances
towards
the land, and his quick eye had been the first to detect
a new and still more serious danger that now menaced them.
A long train of camels was visible, travelling across the
desert, and holding its way towards the part of the reef
which touched the shore. At this point, too, were now to
be seen some twenty Arabs, waiting the arrival of their
friends; among whom it was fair to conclude were those
who had attempted to carry the ship by surprise. As the
events which next followed were closely connected with the
policy and forbearance of the party of barbarians near the
wreck, this will be a suitable occasion to explain the motives
of the latter, in not assailing Captain Truck, and the real
state of things among these children of the desert.
The Dane had been driven ashore, as conjectured, in the
last gale, and the crew had immediately been captured by a
small wandering party of the Arabs, with whom the coast
was then lined; as is usually the case immediately after
tempestuous weather. Unable to carry off much of the
cargo, this party had secured the prisoners, and hurried
inland
to an oasis, to give the important intelligence to their
friends; leaving scouts on the shore, however, that they
might be early apprised of any similar disaster, or of any
change in the situation of their present prize. These scouts
had discovered the Montauk, drifting along the coast,
dismasted
and crippled, and they had watched her to her
anchorage
within the reef. The departure of her boats had
been witnessed, and though unable to foresee the whole object
of this expedition, the direction taken pointed out the wreck
as the point of destination. All this, of course, had been
communicated to the chief men of the different parties on
the coast, of which there were several, who had agreed to
unite their forces to secure the second ship, and then to
divide the spoils.
When the Arabs reached the coast near the wreck, that
morning, the elders among them were not slow in
comprehending
the motives of the expedition; and having gained a
pretty accurate idea of the number of men employed about
the Dane, they had come to the just conclusion that few
were left in the vessel at anchor. They had carried off the
spy-glass of their prize too, and several among them knew
its use, from having seen similar things in other stranded
ships. By means of this glass, they discovered the number
and quality of those on board the Montauk, as soon as there
was sufficient light, and directed their own operations
accordingly
.
The parties that had appeared and disappeared
behind the sandy ridges of the desert, about the time at
which we have now arrived in the narrative, and those who
have been already mentioned in a previous chapter, were
those who came from the interior, and those who went in
the direction of the reef; the first of the latter of which
Saunders had just discovered. Owing to the rounded
formation of the coast, and to the intervention of a head-land,
the distance by water between the two ships was quite
double that by land between the two encampments, and
those who now arrived abreast of the packet, deliberately
pitched their tents, as if they depended more on a display
of their numbers for success than on concealment, and as if
they felt no apprehension of the return of the crew.
When the gentlemen had taken a survey of this strong
party, which numbered more than a hundred, they held a
consultation of the course it would be necessary to pursue.
To Paul Blunt, as an avowed seaman, and as one who had
already shown the promptitude and efficiency of his
resources
,
all eyes were turned in expectation of an opinion.
So long as the tide keeps in, this gentleman observed,
I see no cause for apprehensions. We are beyond the
reach of musketry, or at all events, any fire of the Arabs,
at this distance, must be uncertain and harmless; and we
have always the hope of the arrival of the boats. Should
this fail us, and the tide fall this afternoon as low as it fell
in the morning, our situation will indeed become critical.
The water around the ship may possibly serve as a
temporary
protection, but the distance to the reef is so small that
it might be passed by swimming.
Surely we could make good the vessel against men
raising
themselves out of the water, and clambering up a vessel's
side? said Mr. Sharp.
It is probable we might, if unmolested from the shore.
But, imagine twenty or thirty resolute swimmers to put off
together for different parts of the vessel, protected by the
long muskets these Arabs carry, and you will easily
conceive
the hopelessness of any defence. The first man
among us, who should show his person to meet the boarders,
would be shot down like a dog.
It was a cruel oversight to expose us to this horrible
fate! exclaimed the appalled father.
This is easier seen now than when the mistake was
committed, observed John Effingham. As a seaman, and
with his important object in view, Captain Truck acted for
the best, and we should acquit him of all blame, let the
result
be what it may. Regrets are useless, and it remains
for us to devise some means to arrest the danger by which
we are menanced, before it be too late. Mr. Blunt, you must
be our leader and counsellor: is it not possible for us to carry
the ship outside of the reef, and to anchor her beyond the
danger of our being boarded?
I have thought of this expedient, and if we had a boat
it might possibly be done, in this mild weather; without a
boat, it is impossible.
But we have a boat, glancing his eye towards the
launch that stood in the chocks or chucks.
One that would be too unwieldy for our purposes, could
it be got into the water; a thing in itself that would be
almost impracticable for us to achieve.
A long silence succeeded, during which the gentlemen
were occupied in the bootless effort of endeavouring to
devise expedients to escape the Arabs; bootless, because on
such occasions, the successful measure is commonly the
result of a sort of sudden inspiration, rather than of
continued
and laborious thought.
CHAPTER V.
With religious awe
Grief heard the voice of Virtue. No complaint
The solemn silence broke. Tears ceased to flow.
Glover
.
Hope
is the most treacherous of all human fancies. So
long as there is a plausible ground to expect relief from any
particular quarter, men will relax their exertions in the face
of the most imminent danger, and they cling to their
expectations long after reason has begun to place the chances
of success on the adverse side of the scale. Thus it was
with the party in the Montauk. Two or three precious hours
were lost in the idle belief that the gun would be heard by
Captain Truck, and that they might momentarily look for
the appearance of, at least, one of the boats.
Paul Blunt was the first to relinquish this delusion. He
knew that, if it reached their friends at all, the report must
have been heard in a few seconds, and he knew, also, that
it peculiarly belonged to the profession of a seaman to come
to quick decisions. An hour of smart rowing would bring
the cutter from the wreck to the headland, where it would
be visible, by means of a glass, from the foretop. Two
hours had now passed away and no signs of any boat were
to be discovered, and the young man felt reluctantly
compelled
to yield all the strong hopes of timely aid that he had
anticipated from this quarter. John Effingham, who had
much more energy of character than his kinsman, though
not more personal fortitude and firmness, was watching the
movements of their young leader, and he read the severe
disappointment in his face, as he descended the last time
from the top, where he had often been since the consultation,
to look out for the expected succour.
I see it in your countenance, said that gentleman;
we have nothing to look for from the boats. Our signal
has not been heard.
There is no hope, and we are now thrown altogether on
our own exertions, aided by the kind providence of God.
This calamity is so sudden and so dire, that I can
scarcely credit it! Are we then truly in danger of
becoming
prisoners to barbarians? Is Eve Effingham, the
beautiful
,
innocent, good, angelic daughter of my cousin, to be
their victim!perhaps the inmate of a seraglio!
There is the pang! Had I a thousand bodies, a
thousand
lives, I could give all of the first to unmitigated
suffering
,
lay down all the last to avert so shocking a calamity.
Do you think the ladies are sensible of their real situation?
They are uneasy rather than terrified. In common
with us all, they have strong hopes from the boats, though
the continued arrival of the barbarians, who are constantly
coming into their camp, has helped to render them a little
more conscious of the true nature of the danger.
Here Mr. Sharp, who stood on the hurricane-house, called
out for the glass, in order to ascertain what a party of the
Arabs, who were collected near the in-shore end of the
reef, were about. Paul Blunt went up to him, and made
the examination. His countenance fell as he gazed, and
an expression like that of hopelessness was again apparent
on his fine features, when he lowered the glass.
Here is some new cause of uneasiness!
The wretches have got a number of spars, and are
lashing them together to form a raft. They are bent on
our capture, and I see no means of preventing it.
Were we alone, men only, we might have the bitter
consolation of selling our lives dearly; but it is terrible to
have those with us whom we can neither save nor yet
devote
to a common destruction with our enemies!
It is indeed terrible, and the helplessness of our
situation
adds to its misery.
Can we not offer terms?Might not a promise of
ransom
,
with hostages, do something? I would cheerfully
remain
in the hands of the barbarians, in order to effect the
release of the rest of the party.
Mr. Blunt grasped his hand, and for a moment he envied
the other the generous thought. But smiling bitterly, he
shook his head, as if conscious of the futility of even this
desperate self-devotion.
Gladly would I be your companion; but the project is,
in every sense, impracticable. Ransom they might consent
to receive with us all in their power, but not on the
condition
of our being permitted to depart. Indeed, no means
of quitting them would be left; for, once in possession of
the ship, as in a few hours they must be, Captain Truck,
though having the boats, will be obliged to surrender for
want of food, or to run the frightful hazard of attempting
to reach the islands, on an allowance scarcely sufficient to
sustain life under the most favourable circumstances. These
flint-hearted monsters are surrounded by the desolation of
their desert, and they are aware of all their appalling
advantages
.
The real state of things ought to be communicated to
our friends, in order that they may be prepared for the
worst.
To this Mr. Blunt agreed, and they went together to
inform
John Effingham of the new discovery. This
stern-minded
man was, in a manner, prepared for the worst, and
he now agreed on the melancholy propriety of letting his
kinsman know the actual nature of the new danger that
threatened them.
I will undertake this unpleasant office, he said, though
I could, in my inmost soul, pray that the necessity for it
might pass away. Should the worst arrive, I have still
hopes of effecting something by means of a ransom; but
what will have been the fate of the youthful, and delicate,
and lovely, ere we can make ourselves even comprehended
by the barbarians? A journey in the desert, as these
journeys
have been described to me, would be almost certain
death to all but the strongest of our party, and even gold
may fail of its usual power, when weighed against the evil
nature of savages.
Is there no hope, then, really left us? demanded Mr.
Sharp, when the last speaker had left them to descend to
the cabins. Is it not possible to get the boat into the
water, and to make our escape in that?
That is an expedient of which I have thought, but it is
next to impracticable. As anything is better than capture,
however, I will make one more close examination of the
proceedings of the demons, and look nearer into our own
means.
Paul Blunt now got a lead and dropped it over the side of
the ship, in the almost forlorn hope that possibly she might
lie over some hole on the bottom. The soundings proved to
be, as indeed he expected, but a little more than three
fathoms.
I had no reason to expect otherwise, he said, as he
drew in the line, though he spoke like a disappointed man.
Had there been sufficient water the ship might have been
scuttled, and the launch would have floated off the deck;
but as it is, we should lose the vessel without a sufficient
object. It would appear heroic were you and I to contrive
to get on the reef, and to proceed to the shore with a view to
make terms with the Arabs; but there could be no real use
in it, as the treachery of their character is too well
established
to look for any benefit from such a step.
Might they not be kept in play, until our friends
returned
?
Providence may befriend us in some unexpected
manner in our uttermost peril.
We will examine them once more with the glass. By a
movement among the Arabs, there has probably been a new
accession to their numbers.
The two gentlemen now ascended to the top of the
hurricane-house
again, in feverish haste, and once more they
applied
the instrument. A minute of close study induced Mr.
Blunt to drop the glass, with an expression that denoted
increased concern.
Can any thing possibly make our prospects worse?
eagerly inquired his companion.
Do you not remember a flag that was on board the
Danethat by which we identified his nation?
Certainly: it was attached to the halyards, and lay on the
quarter-deck.
That flag is now flying in the camp of these
barbarians
!
You may see it, here, among the tents last pitched by
the party that arrived while we were conversing forward.
And from this, you infer
That our people are captives! That flag was in the
ship when we left it; had the Arabs returned before our
party got there, the captain would have been back long ere
this; and in order to obtain this ensign they must have
obtained
possession of the wreck, after the arrival of the boats;
an event that could scarcely occur without a struggle: I
fear the flag is a proof on which side the victory has fallen.
This then would seem to consummate our misfortunes!
It does indeed; for the faint hope that existed, of being
relieved by the boats, must now be entirely abandoned.
In the name of God, look again, and see in what
condition
the wretches have got their raft?
A long examination followed, for on this point did the fate
of all in the ship now truly seem to depend.
They work with spirit, said Mr. Blunt, when his
examination
had continued a long time; but it seems less
like a raft than beforethey are lashing spars together
lengthwisehere is a dawning of hope, or what would be
hope, rather, if the boats had escaped their fangs!
God bless you for the words!what is there
encouraging
?
It is not much, returned Paul Blunt, with a mournful
smile; but trifles become of account in moments of
extreme
jeopardy. They are making a floating stage,
doubtless
with the intention to pass from the reef to the ship, and
by veering on the chains we may possibly drop astern
sufficiently
to disappoint them in the length of their bridge. If
I saw a hope of the final return of the boats, this expedient
would not be without its use, particularly if delayed to the
last moment, as it might cause the Arabs to lose another
tide, and a reprieve of eight or ten hours is an age to men
in our situation.
Mr. Sharp caught eagerly at this suggestion and the
young men walked the deck together for half an hour,
discussing
its chances, and suggesting various means of
turning
it to the best account. Still, both felt convinced that
the trifling delay which might thus be obtained, would, in
the end, be perfectly useless, should Captain Truck and
Vol. II.7
his party have really fallen into the hands of the common
enemy. They were thus engaged, sometimes in deep
despondency, and sometimes buoyant with revived
expectations
,
when Saunders, on the part of Mr. Effingham,
summoned them below.
On reaching the cabin, whither both immediately
hastened
,
the two gentlemen found the family party in the
distress that the circumstances would naturally create.
Mr. Effingham was seated, his daughter's head resting on
a knee, for she had thrown herself on the carpet, by his
side. Mademoiselle Viefville paced the cabin, occasionally
stopping to utter a few words of consolation to her young
charge, and then again reverting in her mind to the true
dangers of their situation, with a force that completely
undid all she had said, by betraying the extent of her own
apprehensions. Ann Sidley knelt near her young
mistress
,
sometimes praying fervently, though in silence, and
at other moments folding her beloved in her arms, as if to
protect her from the ruffian grasp of the barbarians. The
femme de chambre
was sobbing in a state-room, while John
Effingham leaned, with his arms folded against a
bulk-head
,
a picture of stern submission rather than of despair.
The whole party was now assembled, with the exception of
the steward, whose lamentations throughout the morning
had not been noiseless, but who was left on deck to watch
the movements of the Arabs.
The moment was not one of idle forms, and Eve
Effingham
,
who would have recoiled, under other circumstances,
at being seen by her fellow travellers in her present
situation
,
scarce raised her head, in acknowledgement of their
melancholy salute, as they entered. She had been
weeping
,
and her hair had fallen in profusion around her
shoulders. The tears fell no longer, but a warm flushed
look, one which denoted that a struggle of the mind had
gotten the better of womanly emotions, had succeeded to
deadly paleness, and rendered her loveliness of feature and
expression bright and angelic. Both of the young men
thought she had never seemed so beautiful, and both felt a
secret pang, as the conviction forced itself on them, at the
same instant, that this surpassing beauty was now likely to
prove her most dangerous enemy.
Gentlemen, said Mr. Effingham, with apparent
clamness
,
and a dignity that no uneasiness could disturb, my
kinsman has acquainted us with the hopeless nature of our
condition, and I have begged the favour of this visit on
your own account.
We
cannot separate; the ties of
blood and affection unite us, and our fate must be common;
but, on
you
there is no such obligation. Young, bold, and
active, some plan may suggest itself, by which you may
possibly escape the barbarians, and at least save yourselves.
I know that generous temperaments like your will not be
disposed to listen, at first, to such a suggestion: but
reflection
will tell you that it is for the interest of us all. You
may let our fate be known, earlier than it otherwise would
be, to those who will take immediate measures to procure
our ransoms.
This is impossible! Mr. Sharp said firmly. We
can never quit you; could never enjoy a moment's peace
under the consciousness of having been guilty of an act so
selfish!
Mr. Blunt is silent, continued Mr. Effingham, after a
short pause, in which he looked from one of the young men
to the other. He thinks better of my proposition, and
will listen to his own best interests.
Eve raised her head quickly, but without being conscious
of the anxiety she betrayed, and gazed with melancholy
intentness
at the subject of this remark.
I do credit to the generous feelings of Mr. Sharp, Paul
Blunt now hurriedly answered, and should be sorry to
admit
that my own first impulses were less disinterested; but
I confess I have already thought of this, and have reflected
on all the chances of success or failure. It might be
practicable
for one who can swim easily to reach the reef; thence
to cross the inlet, and possibly to gain the shore under cover
of the opposite range of rocks, which are higher than those
near us; after which, by following the coast, one might
communicate with the boats by signal, or even go quite to
the wreck if necessary. All of this I have deliberated on,
and once I had determined to propose it; but
But what? demanded Eve quickly. Why not
execute
this plan, and save yourself? Is it a reason, because
our case is hopeless, that you should perish? Go, then, at
once, for the moments are precious; an hour hence, it may
be too late.
Were it merely to save myself, Miss Effingham, do you
really think me capable of this baseness?
I do not call it baseness. Why should we draw you
down with us in our misery? You have already served us,
Powis, in a situation of terrible trial, and it is not just
that you should always devote yourself in behalf of those
who seem fated never to do you good. My father will
tell you he thinks it your duty now to save yourself if
possible
.
I think it the duty of every man, mildly resumed Mr.
Effingham, when no imperious obligation requires
otherwise
,
to save the life and liberty which God has bestowed.
These gentlemen have doubtless ties and claims on them
that are independent of us, and why should they inflict a
pang on those who love them, in order to share in our
disaster
?
This is placing useless speculations before a miserable
certainty, observed John Effingham. As there can be no
hope of reaching the boats, it is vain to discuss the propriety
of the step.
Is this true, Powis? Is there truly no chance of your
escaping. You will not deceive usdeceive yourselfon a
vain point of empty pride!
I can say with truth, almost with joy, for I thank God
I am spared the conflict of judging between my duty and
my feelings, that there can no longer be any chance of
finding
the wreck in the possession of our friends, returned
Paul fervently. There were moments when I thought the
attempt should be made; and it would perhaps have
properly
fallen to my lot to be the adventure; but we have
now proof that the Arabs are masters, and if Captain
Truck has escaped at all, it is under circumstances that
scarcely admit the possibility of his being near the land.
The whole coast must be watched and in possession of the
barbarians, and one passing along it could hardly escape
being seen.
Might you not escape into the interior,
notwithstanding
?
asked Eve, impetuously.
With what motive? To separate myself from those
who have been my fellows in misfortune, only to die of
want, or to fall into the hands of another set of masters? It
is every way our interest to keep together, and to let those
already on the coast become our captors, as the booty of
two ships may dispose them to be less exacting with their
prisoners.
Slaves! muttered John Effingham.
His cousin bowed his head over the delicate form of Eve,
which he folded with his arms, as if to shield it from the
blasts and evils of the desert.
As we may be separated immediately on being taken,
resumed Paul Blunt, it will be well to adopt some common
mode of acting, and a uniform account of ourselves, in order
that we may impress the barbarians with the policy of
carrying
us, as soon as possible, into the vicinity of Mogadore,
with a view to obtaining a speedy ransom.
Can any thing be better than the holy truth? exclaimed
Eve. No, no, no! Let us not deform this chastening act
of God by colouring any thought or word with deception.
Deception in our case will hardly be needed; but by
understanding those facts which will most probably influence
the Arabs, we may dwell the most on them. We cannot do
better than by impressing on the minds of our captors the
circumstance that this is no common ship, a fact their own
eyes will corroborate, and that we are not mere mariners,
but passengers, who will be likely to reward their
forbearance
and moderation.
I think, sir, interrupted Ann Sidley, looking up with
tearful eyes from the spot where she still knelt, that if
these people knew how much Miss Eve is sought and
beloved, they might be led to respect her as she deserves,
and this at least would `temper the wind to the shorn
lamb!'
Poor Nanny! murmured Eve, stretching forth a hand
towards her old nurse, though her face was still buried in
her own hair, thou wilt soon learn that there is another
leveller beside the grave!
Ma'am!
Thou wilt find that Eve, in the hands of barbarians, is
not thy Eve. It will now become my turn to become a
handmaiden, and to perform for others offices a thousand
7*
times more humiliating than any thou hast ever performed
for me.
Such a consummation of their misery had never struck
the imagination of the simple-minded Ann, and she gazed at
her child with tender concern, as if she distrusted her senses.
This is too improbable, dear Miss Eve, she said, and
you will distress your father by talking so wildly. The
Arabs are human beings though they are barbarians, and
they will never dream of anything so wicked as this.
Mademoiselle Viefville made a rapid and fervent
ejaculation
in her own language, that was keenly expressive of her
own sense of misery, and Ann Sidley, who always felt
uneasiness when anything was said affecting Eve that she
could not understand, looked from one to the other, as if
she demanded an explanation.
I'm sure Mamerzelle cannot think any such thing likely
to take place, she continued more positively; and, sir,
you at least will not permit Miss Eve to torment herself with
any notions as unreasonable, as monstrous as this!
We are in the hands of God, my worthy Ann, and you
may live to see all your fixed ideas of propriety violated,
returned Mr. Effingham. Let us pray that we may not
be separated, for there will at least be a tender consolation
in being permitted to share our misery in company. Should
we be torn asunder, then indeed will the infliction be one of
insupportable agony!
And who will think of such a cruelty, sir?
Me
they
cannot separate from Miss Eve, for I am her servant, her
own long-tried, faithful attendant, who first held her in arms,
and nursed her when a helpless infant; and you too, sir,
you are her father, her own beloved revered parent; and
Mr. John, is he not her kinsman, of her blood and name?
And even Mamerzelle also has claims to remain with Miss
Eve, for she has taught her many things, I dare say, that it
is good to know. Oh! no, no, no! no one has a right to
tear us asunder, and no one will have the heart to do it.
Nanny, Nanny, murmured Eve, you do not, cannot
know the cruel Arabs!
They cannot be crueller and more unforgiving than our
own savages, ma'am, and they keep the mother with the
child; and when they spare life, they take the prisoners into
their huts, and treat them as they treat their own. God has
caused so many of the wicked to perish for their sins, in
these eastern lands, that I do not think a man can be left
that is wretch enough to harm one like Miss Eve. Take
courage then, sir, and put your trust in his Holy Providence.
I know the trial is hard to a tender father's heart, but should
their customs require them to keep the men and women
asunder, and to separate you from your daughter, for a
short time, remember that I shall be with her, as I was in
her childhood, when, by the mercy of God, we carried her
through so many mortal diseases in safety, and have got
her, in the pride of her youth, without a blemish or a defect,
the perfect creature she is.
If the world had no other tenants but such as you,
devoted
and simple-hearted woman, there would indeed be
little cause for apprehension; for you are equally unable to
imagine wrong yourself, or to conceive it in others. It
would remove a mountain from my heart, could I indeed
believe
that even you will be permitted to remain near this
dependent
and fragile girl during the months of suffering and
anguish that are likely to occur.
Father, said Eve, hurriedly drying her eyes, and
rising
to her feet with a motion so easy, and an effort so slight,
that it appeared like the power of mere volition,the
superiority
of the spirit over her light frame,father, do not
let a thought of me distress you at this awful moment. You
have known me only in happiness and prosperity,an
indulged
and indolent girl; but I feel a force which is capable
of sustaining me, even in this blank desert. The Arabs can
have no other motive than to preserve us all, as captives
likely to repay their care with a rich ransom. I know that
a journey, according to their habits, will be painful and
arduous
,
but it may be borne. Trust, then, more to my spirit
than to my feeble body, and you will find that I am not as
worthless as I fear you fancy.
Mr. Effingham passed his arm round the slender waist of
his child, and folded her almost frantically to his bosom. But
Eve was aroused, and gently extricating herself, with bright
but tearless eyes, she looked round at her companions, as if
she would reverse the order of their sympathies, and direct
them to their own wants and hazards.
I know you think me the most exposed by this dreadful
disaster, she said; that I may not be able to bear up
against the probable suffering, and that I shall sink first,
because
I am the feeblest and frailest in frame; but God
permits
the reed to bend, when the oak is destroyed. I am
stronger, able to bear more than you imagine, and we shall
all live to meet again, in happier scenes, should it be our
present hard fortune to be separated.
As Eve spoke, she cast affectionate looks on those dear to
her by habit, and blood, and services; nor did she permit an
unnecessary reserve at such a moment to prevent glances of
friendly interest towards the two young men, whose very
souls seemed wrapped in her movements. Words of
encouragement
from such a source, however, only served to
set the frightful truth more vividly before the minds of her
auditors, and not one of them heard what she said who did
not feel an awful presentiment that a few weeks of the
suffering
of which she made so light, did she even escape a
crueller fate, would consign that form, now so winning and
lovely, to the sands. Mr. Effingham now rose, and for the
first time the flood of sensations that had been so long
gathering in his bosom, seemed ready to burst through the
restraints of manhood. Struggling to command himself, he
turned to his two young male companions, and spoke with
an impressiveness and dignity that carried with them a
double
force, from the fact of his ordinary manners being so
tempered and calm.
Gentlemen, he said, we may serve each other, by
coming to an understanding in time; or at least you may
confer on me a favour that a life of gratitude would not
repay
.
You are young and vigorous, bold and intelligent,
qualities that will command the respect of even savages.
The chances that one of you will survive to reach a
Christian
land are much greater than those of a man of my
years, borne down as I shall be with the never-dying
anxieties
of a parent.
Father! father!
Hush! darling: let me entreat these gentlemen to bear
us in mind, should they reach a place of safety; for, after
all, youth may do that in your behalf, which time will deny
to John and myself. Money will be of no account, you
know, to rescue my child from a fate far worse than death,
and it may be some consolation to you, young men, to
recollect
,
at the close of your own careers, which I trust will
yet be long and happy, that a parent, in his last moments,
found a consolation in the justifiable hopes he had placed on
your generous exertions.
Father, I cannot bear this! For you to be the victim
of these barbarians is too much; and I would prefer trusting
all to a raft on the terrible ocean, to incurring the smallest
chance of such a calamity. Mademoiselle, you will join me
in the entreaty to the gentlemen to prepare a few planks to
receive us, where we can perish together, and at least have
the consolation of knowing that our eyes will be closed by
friends. The longest survivor will be surrounded and
supported
by the spirits of those who have gone before, into a
world devoid of care.
I have thought this from the first, returned
Mademoiselle
Viefville in French, with an energy of manner that
betokened a high and resolved character: I would not
expose
gentlewomen to the insults and outrages of barbarians;
but did not wish to make a proposition that the feelings of
others might reject.
It is a thousand times preferable to capture, if indeed it
be practicable, said John Effingham, looking inquiringly
towards Paul. The latter, however, shook his head in the
negative, for, the wind blowing on shore, he knew it would
be merely meeting captivity without the appearance of a
self-reliance
and dignity, that might serve to impress their
captors
favourably.
It is impossible, said Eve, reading the meaning of the
glances, and dropping on her knees before Mr. Effingham:
well, then, may our trust be in God! We have yet a few
minutes of liberty, and let them not be wasted idly, in vain
regrets. Father, kiss me, and give me once more that holy
and cherished blessing, with which you used to consign me
to sleep, in those days when we scarce dreamed of, never
realized, misfortune.
Bless you, bless you, my babe; my beloved, my
cherished Eve! said the father solemnly, but with a
quivering
lip. May that dread Being whose ways, though
mysterious
,
are perfect wisdom and mercy, sustain you in this
trial, and bring you at last, spotless in spirit and person, to
his own mansions of peace. God took from me early thy
sainted mother, and I had impiously trusted in the hope that
thou wert left to be my solace in age. Bless you, my Eve;
I shall pray God, without ceasing, that thou mayest pass
away as pure and as worthy of His love, as her to whom
thou owest thy being.
John Effingham groaned; the effort he made to repress
his feelings causing the out-breaking of his soul to be deep
though smothered.
Father, let us pray together. Ann, my good Ann, thou
who first taught me to lisp a thanksgiving and a request,
kneel here by my sideand you, too, mademoiselle; though
of a different creed, we have a common God! Cousin John,
you pray often, I know, though so little apt to show your
emotions; there is a place for you, too, with those of your
blood. I know not whether these gentlemen are too proud
to pray.
Both the young men knelt with the others, and there was
a long pause in which the whole party put up their
supplications
,
each according to his or her habits of thought.
Father! resumed Eve, looking up as she still knelt
between
the knees of Mr. Effingham, and smiling fondly in
the face of him she so piously loved; there is one precious
hope of which even the barbarians cannot rob us: we may
be separated here, but our final meeting rests only with
God!
Mademoiselle Viefville passed an arm round the waist of
her sweet pupil, and pressed her against her heart.
There is but one abode for the blessed, my dear
mademoiselle
,
and one expiation for us all. Then rising from
her knees, Eve said with the grace and dignity of a
gentlewoman
,
Cousin Jack, kiss me; we know not when another
occasion may offer to manifest to each other our mutual
regard
.
You have been a dear and an indulgent kinsman to
me, and should I live these twenty years a slave, I shall not
cease to think of you with kindness and regret.
John Effingham folded the beautiful and ardent girl in his
arms, with the freedom and fondness of a parent.
Gentlemen, continued Eve, with a deepening colour,
but eyes that were kind and grateful, I thank you, too, for
lending your supplications to ours. I know that young men
in the pride of their security, seldom fancy such a
dependence
on God necessary; but the strongest are overturned,
and pride is a poor substitute for the hope of the meek. I
believe you have thought better of me than I merit, and I
should never cease to reproach myself with a want of
consideration
,
did I believe that any thing more than accident
has brought you into this ill-fated vessel. Will you permit
me to add one more obligation to the many I feel to you
both? advancing nearer to them, and speaking lower; you
are young, and likely to endure bodily exposure better than
my fatherthat we shall be separated I feel persuadedand
it might be in your power to solace a heart-broken parent.
I see, I know, I may depend on your good offices.
Eve  my blessed daugther  my only, my beloved
child! exclaimed Mr. Effingham, who overheard her lowest
syllable, so death-like was the stillness of the cabincome
to me, dearest; no power on earth shall ever tear us
asunder!
Eve turned quickly, and beheld the arms of her parent
extended. She threw herself into them, when the pent and
irresistible emotions broke loose in both, for they wept
together
,
as she lay on his bosom, with a violence that in a
man it was awfully painful to witness.
Mr. Sharp had advanced to take the offered hand of Eve,
when she suddenly left him for the purpose just mentioned,
and he now felt the grasp of Paul's fingers on his arm, as if
they were about to penetrate the bone. Fearful of betraying
the extent of their feelings, the two young men rushed on
deck together, where they paced backward and forward for
many minutes, quite unable to exchange a word, or even a
look.
CHAPTER VI.
O Domine Deus! speravi in te;
O care mi Jesu, nune libera me:
In dur caten,
In miser pn,
Desidero te
Languendo, gemendo
Et genuflectendo,
Adora, imploro, ut liberes me.
Queen Mary
.
The
sublime consolations of religion were little felt by
either of the two generous-minded and ardent young men
who were pacing the deck of the Montauk. The gentle and
the plastic admit the most readily of the divine influence;
and of all on board the devoted vessel at that moment, they
who were the most resigned to their fate were those who by
their physical force were the least able to endure it.
This heavenly resignation, said Mr. Sharp, half
whispering
,
is even more heart-rending than the out-breakings
of despair.
It is frightful! returned his companion. Any thing
is better than passive submission in such circumstances. I
see but little, indeed no hope of escape; but idleness is
torture. If I endeavour to raise this boat, will you aid
me?
Command me like your slave. Would to Heaven there
were the faintest prospects of success!
There is but little; and should we even succeed, there
are no means of getting far from the ship in the launch, as
all the oars have been carried off by the captain, and I can
hear of neither masts nor sails. Had we the latter, with
this wind which is beginning to blow, we might indeed
prolong
the uncertainty, by getting on some of those more
distant spits of sand.
Then, in the name of the blessed Maria! exclaimed
one behind them in French,delay not an instant, and all
on board will join in the labour!
The gentlemen turned in surprise, and beheld
Mademoiselle
Viefville standing so near them as to have overheard
their conversation. Accustomed to depend on herself,
coming of a people among whom woman is more energetic
and useful, perhaps, than in any other Christian nation, and
resolute of spirit naturally, this cultivated and generous
female
had come on deck purposely to see if indeed there
remained
no means by which they might yet escape the
Arabs. Had her knowledge of a vessel at all equalled her
resolution, it is probable that many fruitless expedients
would already have been adopted; but finding herself in
a situation so completely novel as that of a ship, until now
she had found no occasion to suggest any thing to which her
companions would be likely to lend themselves. But,
seizing
the hint of Paul, she pressed it on him with ardour, and,
after a few minutes of urging, by her zeal and persuasion
she prevailed on the two gentlemen to commence the
necessary
preparations without further delay. John Effingham
and Saunders were immediately summoned by
Mademoiselle
Viefville herself, who, once engaged in the undertaking,
pursued it fervently, while she went in person into the
cabins to make the necessary preparations connected with
their subsistence and comforts, should they actually
succeed
in quitting the vessel.
No experienced mariner could set about the work with
more discretion, or with a better knowledge of what was
necessary to be done, than Mr. Blunt now showed.
Saunders
was directed to clear the launch, which had a roof on
it, and still contained a respectable provision of poultry,
sheep and pigs. The roof he was told not to disturb, since
it might answer as a substitute for a deck; but everything
was passed rapidly from the inside of the boat, which the
steward commenced scrubbing and cleaning with an
assiduity
that he seldom manifested in his cabins. Fortunately,
the tackles with which Mr. Leach had raised the sheers and
stepped the jury-mast the previous morning were still lying
on the deck, and Paul was spared the labour of reeving new
ones. He went to work, therefore, to get up two on the
substitute for a main-stay; a job that he had completed,
through the aid of the two gentlemen on deck, by the time
Vol. II.  8
Saunders pronounced the boat to be in a fit condition to
receive
its cargo. The gripes were now loosened, and the
fall of one of the tackles was led to the capstan.
By this time Mademoiselle Viefville, by her energy and
decision, had so far aroused Eve and her woman, that Mr.
Effingham had left his daughter, and appeared on deck
among those who were assisting Paul. So intense was the
interest, however, which all took in the result, that the
ladies, and even Ann Sidley, with the
femme de chambre
,
suspended their own efforts, and stood clustering around
the capstan as the gentlemen began to heave, almost
breathless
between their doubts and hopes; for it was a matter of
serious question whether there was sufficient force to lift so
heavy a body at all. Turn after turn was made, the fall
gradually tightening, until those at the bars felt the full
strain of their utmost force.
Heave together, gentlemen, said Paul Blunt, who
directed
every thing, besides doing so much with his own
hands. We have its weight now, and all we gain is so
much towards lifting the boat.
A steady effort was continued for two or three minutes,
with but little sensible advantage, when all stopped for
breath.
I fear it will surpass our strength, observed Mr. Sharp.
The boat seems not to have moved, and the ropes are
stretched in a way to menace parting.
We want but the force of a boy added to our own,
said Paul, looking doubtingly towards the females; in
such cases, a pound counts for a ton.
Allons!
cried Mademoiselle Viefville, motioning to the
femme de chambre
to follow; we will not be defeated for
the want of such a trifle.
These two resolute women applied their strength to the
bars, and the power, which had been so equally balanced,
preponderated in favour of the machine. The capstan,
which a moment before was scarcely seen to turn, and that
only by short and violent efforts, now moved steadily but
slowly round, and the end of the launch rose. Eve was
only prevented from joining the labourers by Nanny, who
held her folded in her arms, fearful that some accident might
occur to injure her.
Paul Blunt now cheerfully announced the certainty that
they had a force sufficient to raise the boat, though the
operation
would still be long and laborious. We say,
cheerfully
;
for while this almost unhoped-for success promised
little relief in the end, there is always something buoyant
and encouraging in success of any sort.
We are masters of the boat, he said, provided the
Arabs do not molest us; and we may drift away, by means
of some contrivance of a sail, to such a distance as will
keep us out of their power, until all chance of seeing our
friends again is finally lost.
This, then, is a blessed relief! exclaimed Mr.
Effingham
;
and God may yet avert from us the bitterest portion
of this calamity!
The pent emotions again flowed, and Eve once more wept
in her father's arms, a species of holy joy mingling with her
tears. In the mean time, Paul, having secured the fall by
which they had just been heaving, brought the other to the
capstan, when the operation was renewed with the same
success
.
In this manner in the course of half an hour the
launch hung suspended from the stay, at a sufficient height
to apply the yard-tackles. As the latter, however, were not
aloft, Paul having deemed it wise to ascertain their ability to
lift the boat at all, before he threw away so much toil, the
females renewed their preparations in the cabins, while the
gentlemen assisted the young sailor in getting up the
purchases
.
During this pause in the heaving, Saunders was
sent below to search for sails and masts, both of which Paul
thought must be somewhere in the ship, as he found the
launch was fitted to receive them.
It was apparent, in the mean time, that the Arabs watched
their proceedings narrowly; for the moment Paul appeared
on the yard a great movement took place among them, and
several muskets were discharged in the direction of the ship,
though the distance rendered the fire harmless. The
gentlemen
observed with concern, however, that the balls passed
the vessel, a fearful proof of the extraordinary power of the
arms used by these barbarians. Luckily the reef, which by
this time was nearly bare ahead of the ship, was still covered
in a few places nearer to the shore to a depth that forbade a
passage, except by swimming. John Effingham, however,
who was examining the proceedings of the Arabs with a
glass, announced that a party appeared disposed to get on
the naked rocks nearest the ship, as they had left the shore,
dragging some light spars after them, with which they
seemed to be about to bridge the different spots of deep
water, most of which were sufficiently narrow to admit of
being passed in this manner.
Although the operation commenced by the Arabs would
necessarily consume a good deal of time, this intelligence
quickened the movements of all in the ship. Saunders, in
particular, who had returned to report his want of success,
worked with redoubled zeal; for, as is usual with those
who are the least fortified by reason, he felt the greatest
horror of falling into the hands of barbarians. It was a
slow and laborious thing, notwithstanding, to get upon the
yards the heavy blocks and falls; and had not Paul Blunt
been quite as conspicuous for personal strength as he was
ready and expert in a knowledge of his profession, he would
not have succeeded in the unaided effort;unaided aloft,
though the others, of course, relieved him much by
working
at the whips on deck. At length this important
arrangement was effected, the young man descended, and
the capstan was again manned.
This time the females were not required, it being in the
power of the gentlemen to heave the launch out to the side
of the ship, Paul managing the different falls so adroitly,
that the heavy boat was brought so near, and yet so much
above the rail, as to promise to clear it. John Effingham
now stood at one of the stay-tackle falls, and Paul at the
other, when the latter made a signal to ease away. The
launch settled slowly towards the side of the vessel until it
reached the rail, against which it lodged. Catching a turn
with his fall, Mr. Blunt sprang forward, and bending
beneath
the boat, he saw that its keel had hit a belaying-pin.
One blow from a capstan-bar cleared away this obstruction,
and the boat swung off. The stay-tackle falls were let go
entirely, and all on board saw, with an exultation that
words can scarcely describe, the important craft suspended
directly over the sea. No music ever sounded more
sweetly to the listeners than the first plash of the massive
boat as it fell heavily upon the surface of the water. Its
size, its roof, and its great strength gave it an appearance
of security, that for the moment deceived them all; for, in
contemplating the advantage they had so unexpectedly
gained, they forgot the many obstacles that existed to their
availing themselves of it.
It was not many minutes before Paul was on the roof of
the launch, had loosened the tackles, and had breasted the
boat to, at the side of the ship, in readiness to receive the
stores that the females had collected. In order that the
reader may better understand the nature of the ark that
was about to receive those who remained in the Montauk,
however, it may be well to describe it.
The boat itself was large, strong, and capable of
resisting
a heavy sea when well managed, and, of course,
unwieldy in proportion. To pull it, at a moderate rate,
eight or ten large oars were necessary; whereas, all the
search of the gentlemen could not find one. They
succeeded
,
however, in discovering a rudder and tiller,
appliances
not always used in launches, and Paul Blunt shipped
them instantly. Around the gunwales of the boat,
stanchions
,
which sustained a slightly-rounded roof, were fitted,
a provision that it is usual to make in the packets, in order
to protect the stock they carry against the weather. This
stock having been turned loose on the deck, and the
interior
cleaned, the latter now presented a snug and
respectable
cabin; one coarse and cramped, compared with those
of the ship certainly, but on the other hand, one that might
be well deemed a palace by shipwrecked mariners. As it
would be possible to retain this roof until compelled by bad
weather to throw it away, Paul, who had never before seen
a boat afloat with such a canopy, regarded it with delight;
for it promised a protection to that delicate form he so
much cherished in his inmost heart, that he had not even
dared to hope for. Between the roof and the gunwale of
the boat, shutters buttoned in, so as to fill the entire space;
and when these were in their places, the whole of the
interior formed an enclosed apartment, of a height
sufficient
to allow even a man to stand erect without his hat.
8*
It is true, this arrangement rendered the boat clumsy, and,
to a certain extent, top-heavy and unmanageable; but so
long as it could be retained, it also rendered it infinitely
more comfortable than it could possibly be without it.
The roof, moreover, might be cut away in five minutes, at
any time, should circumstances require it.
Paul had just completed a hasty survey of his treasure,
for such he now began to consider the launch, when casting
his eye upward, with the intention to mount the ship's side,
he saw Eve looking down at him, as if to read their fate in
the expression of his own countenance.
The Arabs, she hurriedly remarked, are moving
along the reef, as my father says, faster than he could wish,
and all our hopes are centred in you and the boat. The first,
I know, will not fail us, so long as means allow; but can
we do anything with the launch?
For the first time, dearest Miss Effingham, I see a little
chance of rescuing ourselves from the grasp of these
barbarians
.
There is no time to lose, but everything must be
passed into the boat with as little delay as possible.
Bless you, bless you, Powis, for this gleam of hope!
Your words are cordials, and our lives can scarcely serve
to prove the gratitude we owe you.
This was said naturally, and as one expresses a strong
feeling, without reflection, or much weighing of words; but
even at that fearful moment, it thrilled on every pulse of the
young man. The ardent look that he gave the beautiful
girl caused her to redden to the temples, and she hastily
withdrew.
The gentlemen now began to pass into the boat the
different
things that had been provided, principally by the
foresight of Mademoiselle Viefville, where they were received
by Paul who thrust them beneath the roof without stopping
to lose the precious moments in stowage. They included
mattresses, the trunks that contained their ordinary
sea-attire
,
or those that were not stowed in the baggage-room,
blankets, counterpanes, potted meats, bread, wine, various
condiments and prepared food, from the stores of Saunders,
and generally such things as had presented themselves in
the hurry of the moment. Nearly half of the articles were
rejected by Paul, as unnecessary, though he received many
in consideration of the delicacy of his feebler companions,
which would otherwise have been cast aside. When he
found, however, that food enough had been passed into the
boat to supply the wants of the whole party for several
weeks, he solicited a truce, declaring it indiscreet to render
themselves uselessly uncomfortable in this manner, to say
nothing of the effect on the boat. The great requisite,
water, was still wanting, and he now desired that the two
domestics might get into the boat to arrange the different
articles, while he endeavoured to find something that might
serve as a substitute for sails, and obtain the all-important
supply.
His attention was first given to the water, without which
all the other preparations would be rendered totally useless.
Before setting about this, however, he stole a moment to
look into the state of things among the Arabs. It was
indeed
time, for the tide had now fallen so low as to leave the
rocks nearly bare, and several hundreds of the barbarians
were advancing along the reef, towing their bridge, the
slow progress of which alone prevented them from coming
up at once to the point opposite the ship. Paul saw there
was not a moment to lose, and, calling Saunders, he hurried
below.
Three or four small casks were soon found, when the
steward brought them to the tank to be filled. Luckily the
water had not to be pumped off, but it ran in a stream into
the vessel that was placed to receive it. As soon as one
cask was ready, it was carried on deck by the gentlemen,
and was struck into the boat with as little delay as possible.
The shouts of the Arabs now became audible, even to those
who were below, and it required great steadiness of nerve to
continue the all-important preparation. At length the last
of the casks was filled, when Paul rushed on deck, for, by
this time, the cries of the barbarians proclaimed their
presence
near the ship. When he reached the rail, he found
the reef covered with them, some hailing the vessel, others
menacing, hundreds still busied with their floating bridge,
while a few endeavoured to frighten those on board by
discharging
their muskets over their heads. Happily, aim was
impossible, so long as care was taken not to expose the body
above the bulwarks.
We have not a moment to lose! cried Mr. Effingham,
on whose bosom Eve lay, nearly incapable of motion.
The food and water are in the boat, and in the name of a
merciful God, let us escape from this scene of frightful
barbarity
?
The danger is not yet so inevitable, returned Paul,
steadily. Frightful and pressing as it truly seems, we have
a few minutes to think in. Let me entreat that Miss
Effingham
and Mademoiselle Viefville will receive a drop of this
cordial.
He poured into a glass a restorative from a bottle that had
been left on the capstan as superfluous, in the confusion of
providing stores, and held it to the pallid lips of Eve. As
she swallowed a mouthful, nearly as helpless as the infant
that receives nourishment from the hand of its nurse, the
blood returned, and raising herself from her father's arms,
she smiled, though with an effort, and thanked him for his
care.
It was a dread moment, she said, passing a hand over
her brow; but it is past, and I am better. Mademoiselle
Viefville will be obliged to you, also, for a little of this.
The firm-minded and spirited Frenchwoman, though pale
as death, and evidently suffering under extreme
apprehension
,
put aside the glass courteously, declining its contents.
We are sixty fathoms from the rocks, said Paul calmly,
and they must cross this ditch yet, to reach us. None of
them seem disposed to attempt it by swimming, and their
bridge, though ingeniously put together, may not prove long
enough.
Would it be safe for the ladies to get into the boat where
she lies, exposed as they would be to the muskets of the
Arabs? inquired Mr. Sharp.
All that shall be remedied, returned Paul. I cannot
quit the deck; would you, slightly bowing to Mr. Sharp,
go below again, with Saunders, and look for some light
sail? without one, we cannot move away from the ship, even
when in the boat. I see a suitable spar and necessary
rigging
on deck; but the canvas must be looked for in the
sail-room. It is a nervous thing, I confess, to be below at
such a moment; but you have too much faith in us to dread
being deserted.
Mr. Sharp grasped the hand as a pledge of a perfect
reliance
on the other's faith, but he could not speak. Calling
Saunders, the steward received his instructions, when the
two went hastily below.
I could wish the ladies were in the boat with their
women, said Paul, for Ann Sidley and the
femme de
chambre
were still in the launch, busied in disposing of its
mixed cargo of stores, though concealed from the Arabs by
the roof and shutters; but it would be hazardous to
attempt it while exposed to the fire from the reef. We shall
have to change the position of the ship in the end, and it
may as well be done at once.
Beckoning to John Effingham to follow, he went forward
to examine into the movements of the Arabs, once more,
before he took any decided step. The two gentlemen placed
themselves behind the high defences of the forecastle, where
they had a fair opportunity of reconnoitring their
assailants
,
the greater height of the ship's deck completely
concealing
all that had passed on it from the sight of those on
the rocks.
The barbarians, who seemed to be, and who in truth
were, fully apprised of the defenceless and feeble condition
of the party on board, were at work without the smallest
apprehension of receiving any injury from that quarter.
Their great object was to get possession of the ship, before
the returning water should again drive them from the rocks.
In order to effect this, they had placed all who were willing
and sufficiently subordinate on the bridge, though a hundred
were idle, shouting, clapping their hands, menacing, and
occasionally discharging a musket, of which there were
probably fifty in their possession.
They work with judgment at their pontoon, said Paul,
after he had examined the proceedings of those on the reef
for a few minutes. You may perceive that they have
dragged the outer end of the bridge up to windward, and
have just shoved it from the rocks, with the intention to
permit
it to drift round, until it shall bring up against the bows
of the ship, when they will pour on board like so many
tigers. It is a disjointed and loose contrivance, that the
least sea would derange; but in this perfectly smooth water
it will answer their purpose. It moves slowly, but will
surely drift round upon us in the course of fifteen or twenty
minutes more; and of this they appear to be quite certain
themselves, for they seem as well satisfied with their work
as if already assured of its complete success.
It is, then, important to us to be prompt, since our time
will be so brief.
We will be prompt, but in another mode. If you will
assist me a little, I think this effort, at least, may be easily
defeated, after which it will be time enough to think of
escape.
Paul, aided by John Effingham, now loosened the chains
altogether from the bitts, and suffered the ship to drop astern.
As this was done silently and stealthily, it occupied several
minutes; but the wind being by this time fresh, the huge
mass yielded to its power with certainty; and when the
bridge had floated round in a direct line from the reef, or
dead to leeward, there was a space of water between its end
and the ship of more than a hundred feet. The Arabs had
rushed on it in readiness to board; but they set up a yell of
disappointment as soon as the truth was discovered. A
tumult followed; several fell from the wet and slippery
spars; but, after a short time wasted in confusion and
clamour, the directions of their chiefs were obeyed, and they
set to work with energy to break up their bridge, in order to
convert its materials into a raft.
By this time Mr. Sharp and Saunders had returned,
bringing
with them several light sails, such as spare royals and
top-gallant studding-sails. Paul next ordered a spare
mizzen-top-gallant
mast, with a top-gallant studding-sail boom, and
a quantity of light rope to be laid in the gangway, after
which he set about the final step. As time now pressed in
earnest, the Arabs working rapidly and with increasing
shouts, he called upon all the gentlemen for assistance,
giving such directions as should enable them to work with
intelligence.
Bear a hand, Saunders, he said, having taken the
steward
forward with him, as one more accustomed to ships than
the others; bear a hand my fine fellow, and light up this
chain. Ten minutes just now are of more value than a year
at another time.
'Tis awful, Mr. Blunt, sir  werry awful, I do
confirm
,
returned the steward, blubbering and wiping his eyes
between the drags at the chains. Such a fate to befall
such cabins, sir!And the crockery of the werry best
quality out of London or New York! Had I diwined such
an issue for the Montauk, sir, I never would have counselled
Captain Truck to lay in half the stores we did, and most
essentially not the new lots of vines. Oh! sir, it is truly
awful to have such a calamity wisit so much elegant
preparation
!
Forget it all, my fine fellow, and light up the chain.
Ha!she touches abaft! Ten or fifteen fathoms more will
answer.
I've paid great dewotion to the silver, Mr. Blunt, sir, for
it's all in the launch, even to the broken mustard-spoon;
and I do hope, if Captain Truck's soul is permitted to
superintend
the pantry any longer, it will be quite beatified and
encouraged with my prudence and oversight. I left all the
rest of the table furniture, sir; though I suppose these
muscle
-men will not have much use for any but the
oyster-knives
,
as I am informed they eat with their fingers. I
declare
it is quite oppressive and unhuman to have such
wagabonds
rummaging one's lockers!
Rouse away, my man, and light up! the ship has caught
the breeze on her larboard bow, and begins to take the chain
more freely. Remember that precious beings depend on us
for safety!
Ay, ay, sir; light up, it is. I feel quite a concern for
the ladies, sir, and more especially for the stores we abandon
to the underwriters. A better-found ship never came out of
St. Catherine's Docks or the East River, particularly in the
pantry department; and I wonder what these wretches will
do with her. They will be quite abashed with her
conveniences
,
sir, and unable to enjoy them. Poor Toast, too!
he will have a monstrous unpleasant time with the
muscle
men; for he never eats fish; and has quite a genteel and
ameliorated way with him. I shouldn't wonder if he forgot
all I have taken so much pains to teach him, sir, unless he's
dead; in which case it will be of no use to him in another
world.
That will do, interrupted Paul, ceasing his labour;
the ship is aground from forward aft. We will now hurry
the spars and sails into the boat, and let the ladies get into
her.
In order that the reader may better understand the present
situation of the ship, it may be necessary to explain what
Mr. Powis and the steward had been doing all this time.
By paying out the chains, the ship had fallen farther astern,
until she took the ground abaft on the edge of the sand-bank
so often mentioned; and, once fast at that end, her bows
had fallen off, pressed by the wind, as long as the depth of
the water would allow. She now lay aground forward and
aft, with her starboard side to the reef, and the launch
between
the vessel and the naked sands was completely
covered
from the observations and assaults of the barbarians
by the former.
Eve, Mademoiselle Viefville, and Mr. Effingham now got
into the launch, while the others still remained in the ship to
complete the preparations.
They get on fast with their raft, said Paul, while he
both worked himself and directed the labour of the others,
though we shall be safe here until they actually quit the
rocks. Their spars will be certain to float down upon the
ship; but the movement will necessarily be slow, as the
water is too deep to admit of setting, even if they had poles,
of which I see none. Throw these spare sails on the roof
of the launch, Saunders. They may be wanted before we
reach a port, should God protect us long enough to effect so
much. Pass two compasses also into the boat, with all the
carpenter's tools that have been collected.
While giving these orders, Paul was busied in sawing off
the larger end of the pole-mizzen-top-gallant-mast, to convert
it into a spar for the launch. This was done by the time
he ceased speaking; a step was made, and, jumping down
on the roof of the boat, he cut out a hole to receive it, at a
spot he had previously marked for that purpose. By the
time he had done, the spar was ready to be entered, and in
another minute they had the satisfaction of seeing a very
sufficient mast in its place. A royal was also stretched to
its yard, and halyards, tack and sheet, being bent,
everything
was ready to run up a sail at a moment's warning. As
this supplied the means of motion, the gentlemen began to
breathe more freely, and to bethink them of those minor
comforts and essentials that in the hurry of such a scene
would be likely to be overlooked. After a few more busy
minutes, all was pronounced to be ready, and John
Effingham
began seriously to urge the party to quit the ship; but
Paul still hesitated. He strained his eyes in the direction of
the wreck, in the vain hope of yet receiving succour from
that quarter; but, of course, uselessly, as it was about the
time when Captain Truck was warping off with his raft, in
order to obtain an offing. Just at this moment a party of
twenty Arabs got upon the spars, which they had brought
together into a single body, and began to drift down slowly
upon the ship.
Paul cast a look about him to see if anything else that
was useful could be found, and his eyes fell upon the gun.
It struck him that it might be made serviceable as a
scarecrow
in forcing their way through the inlet, and he
determined
to lodge it on the roof of the launch, for the present,
at least, and to throw it overboard as soon as they got into
rough water, if indeed they should be so fortunate as to get
outside of the reef at all. The stay and yard tackles
offered the necessary facilities, and he instantly slung the
piece. A few rounds of the capstan lifted it from the deck,
a few more bore it clear of the side, and then it was easily
lowered on the roof, Saunders being sent into the boat to set
up a stanchion beneath, in order that its weight might do no
injury.
The gentlemen at last got into the launch, with the
exception
of Paul, who still lingered in the ship watching the
progress of the Arabs, and making his calculations for the
future.
It required great steadiness of nerve, perfect self-reliance,
and an entire confidence in his resources and knowledge,
for one to remain a passive spectator of the slow drift of the
Vol. II.  9
raft, while it gradually settled down on the ship. As it
approached, Paul was seen by those on it, and, with the
usual duplicity of barbarians, they made signs of amity and
encouragement. These signs did not deceive the young man,
however, who only remained to be a close observer of their
conduct, thinking some useful hint might thus be obtained,
though his calmness so far imposed on the Arabs that they
even made signs to him to throw them a rope. Believing it
now time to depart, he answered the signal favourably, and
disappeared from their sight.
Even in descending to the boat, this trained and cool
young seaman betrayed no haste. His movements were
quick, and everything was done with readiness and
knowledge
certainly, but no confusion or trepidation occasioned
the loss of a moment. He hoisted the sail, brought down
the tack, and then descended beneath the roof, having first
hauled in the painter, and given the boat a long and
vigorous
shove, to force it from the side of the vessel. By this
last expedient he at once placed thirty feet of wate between
the boat and the Montauk, a space that the Arabs had no
means of overcoming. As soon as he was beneath the roof
the sheet was hauled in, and Paul seized the tiller; which
had been made, by means of a narrow cut in the boards, to
play in one of the shutters. Mr. Sharp took a position in
the bows, where he could see the sands and channels through
the crevices, directing the other how to steer; and just as a
shout announced the arrival of the raft at the other side of
the ship, the flap of their sail gave those in the boat the
welcome
intelligence that they had got so far from her cover
as to feel the force of the wind.
CHAPTER VII.
Speed, gallant bark! richer cargo is thine,
Than Brazilian gem, or Peruvian mine;
And the treasures thou bearest thy destiny wait,
For they, if thou perish, must share in thy fate.
Park
.
The
departure of the boat was excellently timed. Had
it left the side of the ship while the Arabs on the raft were
unoccupied, and at a little distance, it would have been
exposed
to their fire; for at least a dozen of those who boarded
had muskets; whereas the boat now glided away to
leeward
,
while they were busy in getting up her side, or were
so near the ship as not to be able to see the launch at all.
When Paul Powis, who was looking astern through a
crevice, saw the first Arab on the deck of the Montauk, the
launch was already near a cable's length from her, running
with a fresh and free wind into one of the numerous little
channels that intersected the naked banks of sand. The
unusual
construction of the boat, with its enclosed roof, and
the circumstance that no one was visible on board her, had
the effect to keep the barbarians passive, until distance put
her beyond the reach of danger. A few muskets were
discharged
,
but they were fired at random, and in the bravado
of a semi-savage state of feeling.
Paul kept the launch running off free, until he was near
a mile from the ship, when, finding he was approaching the
reef to the northward and eastward, and that a favourable
sandbank lay a short distance ahead, he put down the helm,
let the sheet fly, and the boat's forefoot shot upon the sands.
By a little management, the launch was got broadside to the
bank, the water being sufficiently deep, and, when it was
secured, the females were enabled to land through the
opening
of a shutter.
The change from the apparent hopelessness of their
situation
,
was so great, as to render the whole party
comparatively
happy. Paul and John Effingham united in affirming
it would be quite possible to reach one of the islands to
leeward
in so good a boat, and that they ought to deem
themselves
fortunate, under the circumstances, in being the
masters of a little bark so well found in every essential.
Eve and Mademoiselle Viefville, who had fervently returned
their thanks to the Great Ruler of events, while in the boat,
walked about the hard sand with even a sense of
enjoyment
,
and smiles began again to brighten the beautiful
features
of the first. Mr. Effingham declared, with a grateful
heart, that in no park, or garden, had he ever before met
with a promenade that seemed so delightful as this spot of
naked and moistened sand, on the sterile coast of the Great
Desert. Its charm was its security, for its distance from
every point that could be approached by the Arabs, rendered
it, in their eyes, a paradise.
Paul Powis, however, though he maintained a cheerful
air, and the knowledge that he had been so instrumental in
saving the party lightened his heart of a load, and disposed
him even to gaiety, was not without some lingering remains
of uneasiness. He remembered the boats of the Dane, and,
as he thought it more than probable Captain Truck had
fallen into the hands of the barbarians, he feared that the
latter might yet find the means to lay hands on themselves.
While he was at work fitting the rigging, and preparing a
jigger, with a view to render the launch more manageable,
he cast frequent uneasy glances to the northward, with a
feverish apprehension that one of the so-long-wished-for
boats might at length appear. Their friends he no longer
expected, but his fears were all directed towards the
premature
arrival of enemies from that quarter. None appeared,
however, and Saunders actually lighted a fire on the bank,
and prepared the grateful refreshment of tea for the whole
party; none of which had tasted food since morning, though
it was now drawing near night.
Our caterers, said Paul, smiling, as he cast his eyes
over the repast which Ann Sidley had spread on the roof of
the boat, where they were all seated on stools, boxes, and
trunks, our caterers have been of the gentler sex, as any
one may see, for we have delicacies that are fitter for a
banquet
than a desert.
I thought Miss Eve would relish them, sir, Nanny
meekly excused herself by saying; she is not much
accustomed
to a coarse diet; and mamerzelle, too, likes
niceties
,
as I believe is the case with all of French extraction.
Eve's eyes glistened, though she felt it necessary to say
something by way of apology.
Poor Ann has been so long accustomed to humour the
caprices of a petted girl, she said, that I fear those who
will have occasion for all their strength may be the sufferers.
I should regret it for ever, Mr. Powis, if
you
, who are every
way of so much importance to us, should not find the food
you required.
I have very inadvertently and unwittingly drawn down
upon myself the suspicion of being one of Mr. Monday's
gourmets
, a plain roast and boiled person, the young man
answered laughingly, when it was merely my desire to
express the pleasure I had in perceiving that those whose
comfort and ease are of more account than any thing else,
have been so well cared for. I could almost starve with
satisfaction, Miss Effingham, if I saw you free from
suffering
under the extraordinary circumstances in which we are
placed.
Eve looked grateful, and the emotion excited by this
speech restored all that beauty which had so lately been
chilled by fear.
Did I not hear a dialogue between you and Mr.
Saunders
touching the merits of sundry stores that had been left
in the ship? asked John Effingham, turning to Paul by way
of relieving his cousin's distress.
Indeed you might; he relieved the time we were rousing
at the chains with a beautiful Jeremiad on the calamities of
the lockers. I fancy, steward, that you consider the
misfortunes
of the pantry as the heaviest disaster that has
befallen
the Montauk!
Saunders seldom smiled. In this particular he resembled
Captain Truck; the one subduing all light emotions from an
inveterate habit of serious comicality, and the responsibility
of command; and the other having lost most of his
disposition
to merriment, as the cart-horse loses his propensity to
kick, from being overworked. The steward, moreover, had
9*
taken up the conceit that it was indicative of a nigger to
be merry; and, between dignity, a proper regard to his
colourwhich was about half-way between that of a Gold
Coast importation, and a rice-plantation overseer, down with
the fever in his third seasonand dogged submission to
unmitigated
calls on his time, the prevailing character of the
poor fellow's physiognomy was that of a dolorous
sentimentality
.
He believed himself to be materially refined by
having
had so much intimate communication with gentlemen
and ladies suffering under sea-sickness, and he knew that
no man in the ship could use language like that he had
always at his finger's ends. While so strongly addicted to
melancholy, therefore, he was fond of hearing himself talk;
and, palpably encouraged as he had now been by John
Effingham and Paul, and a little emboldened by the
familiarity
of a shipwreck, he did not hesitate about mingling in
the discourse, though holding the Effinghams habitually in
awe.
I esteem it a great privilege, ladies and gentlemen, he
observed, as soon as Paul ceased, to have the honour of
being
wracked
(for so the steward, in conformity with the
Doric of the forecastle, pronounced the word,) in such
company
.
I should deem it a disgrace to be cast away in some
society I could name, although I will predicate, as we say in
America, nothing on their absence. As to what inwolves
the stores, it surgested itself to me that the ladies would like
delicate diet, and I intermated as much to Mrs. Sidley and
t'other French waiting-woman. Do you imagine,
gentlemen
,
that the souls of the dead are permitted to look back
at such ewents of this life as touches their own private
concerns
and feelings?
That would depend, I should think, steward, on the
nature of the employment of the souls themselves, returned
John Effingham. There must be certain souls to which any
occupation would be more agreeable than that of looking
behind them. But, may I ask why you inquire?
Because, Mr. John Effingham, sir, I do not believe
Captain
Truck can ever be happy in heaven, as long as the ship
is in the hands of the Arabs! If she had been honourably
and fairly wracked, and the captain suffercated by
drowning
,
he could go to sleep like another Christian; but, I do
think, sir, if there be any special perdition for seamen, it
must be to see their vessel rummaged by Arabs. I'll
warrant
,
now, those blackguards have had their fingers in every
thing already; sugar, chocolate, raisins, coffee, cakes, and
all! I wonder who they think would like to use articles
they have handled! And there is poor Toast, gentlemen,
an aspiring and improving young man; one who had the
materials of a good steward in him, though I can hardly say
they were completely deweloped. I did look forward to the
day when I could consign him to Mr. Leach as my own
predecessor, when Captain Truck and I should retire, as I
have no doubt we should have done on the same day, but
for this distressing accident. I dewoutly pray that Toast is
deceased, for I would rather any misfortune should befal him
in the other world than that he should be compelled to
associate
with Arab niggers in this. Dead or alive, ladies, I am
an advocate for a man's keeping himself respectable, and in
proper company.
So elastic had the spirits of the whole become by their
unlooked-for escape, that Saunders was indulged to the top
of his humour, and while he served the meal, passing
between his fire on the sands and the roof of the launch, he
enjoyed a heartier gossip than any he had had since they
left the dock; not even excepting those sniggering scenes
with Mr. Toast in the pantry, in which he used to unbend
himself a little, forgetting his dignity as steward in the
native propensities of the black.
Paul Powis entered but a moment into the trifling, for on
him rested the safety of all. He alone could navigate, or
even manage the boat in rough water; and, while the others
confided so implicitly in his steadiness and skill, he felt the
usual burthen of responsibility. When the supper was
ended, and the party were walking up and down the little
islet of sand, he took his station on the roof therefore, and
examined the proceedings of the Arabs with the glass; Mr.
Sharp, with a species of chivalrous self-denial that was not
lost on his companion, foregoing the happiness of walking
at the side of Eve, to remain near him.
The wretches have laid waste the cabins already!
observed
Mr. Sharp, when Paul had been looking at the ship
some little time. That which it took months to produce
they will destroy in an hour.
I do not see that, returned Paul; there are but about
fifty in the ship, and their efforts seem to be directed to
hauling
her over against the rocks. They have no means of
landing their plunder where she lies; and I suspect there is
a sort of convention that all are to start fair. One or two,
who appear to be chiefs, go in and out of the cabins; but
the rest are actively engaged in endeavouring to move the
ship.
And with what success?
None, apparently. It exceeds their knowledge of
mechanics
to force so heavy a mass from its position. The
wind has driven the ship firmly on the bank, and nothing
short of the windlass, or capstan, can remove her. These
ignorant creatures have got two or three small ropes between
the vessel and the reef, and are pulling fruitlessly at both
ends! But
our
chief concern will be to find an outlet into
the ocean, when we will make the best of our way towards
the Cape de Verds.
Paul now commenced a long and close examination of the
reef, to ascertain by what openings he might get the launch
on the outside. To the northward of the great inlet there
was a continued line of rocks, on which he was sorry to
perceive armed Arabs beginning to show themselves; a sign
that the barbarians still entertained the hope of capturing the
party. Southward of the inlet there were many places in
which a boat might pass at half-tide, and he trusted to getting
through one of them as soon as it became dark. As the
escape
in the boat could not have been foreseen, the Arabs had
not yet brought down upon them the boats of the wreck;
but should morning dawn and find them still within the reef,
he saw no hope of final escape against boats that would
possess
the advantage of oars, ignorant as the barbarians might
be of their proper use.
Every thing was now ready. The interior of the launch
was divided into two apartments by counterpanes, trunks,
and boxes; the females spreading their mattresses in the
forward
room, and the males in the other. Some of those
profound
interpreters of the law, who illustrate legislation by
the devices of trade, had shipped in the Montauk several
hundred rude leaden busts of Napoleon, with a view to save
the distinction in duties between the metal manufactured and
the metal unmanufactured. Four or five of these busts had
been struck into the launch as ballast. They were now
snugly stowed, together with the water, and all the heavier
articles, in the bottom of the boat. The jigger had been
made and bent, and a suitable mast was stepped by means
of the roof. In short, every provision for comfort or safety
that Paul could think of had been attended to; and every
thing was in readiness to re-embark as soon as the proper
hour should arrive.
The gentler portion of the party were seated on the edge
of the roof, watching the setting sun, and engaged in a
discourse
with feelings more attempered to their actual
condition
than had been the case immediately after their escape.
The evening had a little of that wild and watery aspect
which, about the same hour, had given Captain Truck so
much concern, but the sun dipped gorgeously into the liquid
world of the West, and the whole scene, including the
endless
desert, the black reef, the stranded ship, and the
movements
of the bustling Arabs, was one of gloomy grandeur.
Could we foretell the events of a month, said John
Effingham, with what different feelings from the present
would life be chequered! When we left London, the twenty
days since, our eyes and minds were filled with the
movements
,
cares, refinements, and interest of a great and
polished
capital, and here we sit, houseless wanderers, gazing
at an eventide on the coast of Africa! In this way, young
men, and young ladies too, will you find, as life glides away,
that the future will disappoint the expectations of the present
moment!
All futures are not gloomy, cousin Jack, said Eve;
nor is all hope doomed to meet with disappointment. A
merciful God cares for us when we are reduced to despair
on our own account, and throws a ray of unexpected light
on our darkest hours. Certainly we, of all his creatures,
ought not to deny this!
I do not deny it. We have been rescued in a manner
so simple as to seem unavoidable, and yet so unexpected
as to be almost miraculous. Had not Mr. Blunt, or Mr.
Powis, as you call himalthough I am not in the secret
of the masqueradebut, had not this gentleman been a
seaman, it would have surpassed all our means to get this
boat into the water, or even to use her properly were she
even launched. I look upon his profession as being the
first great providential interference, or provision, in our
behalf
;
and his superior skill and readiness in that
profession
as a circumstance of no less importance to us.
Eve was silent; but the glow in the western sky was
scarcely more radiant and bright than the look she cast on
the subject of the remark.
It is no great merit to be a seaman, for the trade is
like another, a mere matter of practice and education,
observed Paul, after a moment of awkward hesitation.
If, as you say, I have been instrumental in serving you,
I shall never regret the accidentscruel accidents of my
early life I had almost called themthat cast my fortunes
so early on the ocean.
A falling pin would have been heard, and all hoped the
young man would proceed; but he chose to be silent.
Saunders happened to overhear the remark, for he was
aiding Ann Sidley in the boat, and he took up the subject
where it was left by the other, in a little aside with his
companion.
It is a misfortune that Mr. Dodge is not here to
question
the gentleman, said the steward to his assistant,
and then we might hear more of his adwentures, which, I
make no doubt, have been werry pathetic and romantical.
Mr. Dodge is a genuine inquisitor, Mistress Ann; not such
an inquisitor as burns people and flays them in Spain,
where I have been, but such an inquisitor as torments
people
,
and of whom we have lots in America.
Let the poor man rest in peace, said Nanny, sighing.
He's gone to his great account, steward; and I fear
we shall none of us make as good a figure as we might at
the final settling. Besides Miss Eve, I never knew a
mortal
that wasn't more or less a sinner.
So they all say; and I must allow that my experience
leans to the wicked side of the question. Captain Truck,
now, was a worthy man; but he had his faults, as well as
Toast. In the first place he would swear when things
took him aback; and then, he had no prewarication about
speaking his mind of a fellow-creature, if the coffee
happened
to be thick, or the poultry didn't take fat kindly.
I've known him box the compass with oaths if the ship
was got in irons.
It's very sinful; and it is to be feared that the poor
man was made to think of all this in his latter moments.
If the Arabs undertook to cannibalize him, I think he
must have given it to them right and left, continued
Saunders
,
wiping an eye, for between him and the captain there
had existed some such affection as the prisoner comes to
feel for the handcuffs with which he amuses his
ennui;
some of his oaths would choke a dog.
Well, let him restlet him rest. Providence is kind;
and the poor man may have repented in season.
And Toast, too! I'm sure, Mrs. Ann, I forgive Toast
all the little mistakes he made, from the bottom of my heart;
and particularly that affair of the beefsteak that he let fall
into the coffee the morning that Captain Truck took me so
flat aback about it; and I pray most dewoutly that the
captain
,
now he has dropped this mortal coil, and that there is
nothing left of him but soul, may not find it out, lest it should
breed ill-blood between them in heaven.
Steward, you scarcely know what you say, interrupted
Ann, shocked at his ignorance, and I will speak of it no
more.
Mr. Saunders was compelled to acquiesce, and he amused
himself by listening to what was said by those on the roof.
As Paul did not choose to explain farther, however, the
conversation
was resumed as if he had said nothing. They
talked of their escape, their hopes, and of the supposed fate
of the rest of the party; the discourse leaving a feeling of
sadness on all, that harmonized with the melancholy, but not
unpicturesque, scene in which they were placed. At length
the night set in; and as it threatened to be dark and damp,
the ladies early made their arrangements to retire. The
gentlemen remained on the sands much later; and it was
ten o'clock before Paul Powis and Mr. Sharp, who had
assumed
the watch, were left alone.
This was about an hour later than the period already
described
as the moment when Captain Truck disposed
himself
to sleep in the launch of the Dane. The weather had
sensibly altered in the brief interval, and there were signs
that, to the understanding of our young seaman, denoted a
change. The darkness was intense. So deep and pitchy
black, indeed, had the night become, that even the land was
no longer to be distinguished, and the only clues the two
gentlemen had to its position were the mouldering
watch-fires
of the Arab camp, and the direction of the wind.
We will now make an attempt, said Paul, stopping in
his short walk on the sand, and examining the murky vault
over head. Midnight is near; and by two o'clock the tide
will be entirely up. It is a dark night to thread these
narrow
channels in, and to go out upon the ocean, too, in so
frail a bark! But the alternative is worse.
Would it not be better to allow the water to rise still
higher? I see by these sands that it has not yet done coming
in.
There is not much tide in these low latitudes, and the
little rise that is left may help us off a bank, should we strike
one. If you will get upon the roof, I will bring in the
grapnels
and force the boat off.
Mr. Sharp complied, and in a few minutes the launch was
floating slowly away from the hospitable bank of sand. Paul
hauled out the jigger, a small sprit-sail, that kept itself
close-hauled
from being fastened to a stationary boom, and a little
mast stepped quite aft, the effect of which was to press the
boat against the wind. This brought the launch's head up,
and it was just possible to see, by close attention, that they
had a slight motion through the water.
I quit that bank of sand as one quits a tried friend,
said Paul, all the conversation now being in little more
than whispers: when near it, I know where we are;
but presently we shall be absolutely lost in this intense
darkness.
We have the fires of the Arabs for lighthouses still.
They may give us some faint notions of our position;
but light like that is a very treacherous guide in so dark a
night. We have little else to do but to keep an eye on the
water, and to endeavour to get to windward.
Paul set the lug-sail, into which he had converted the
royal, and seated himself directly in the eyes of the boat,
with a leg hanging down on each side of the cutwater. He
had rigged lines to the tiller, and with one in each hand he
steered, as if managing a boat with yoke-lines. Mr. Sharp
was seated at hand, holding the sheet of the mainsail; a
boat-hook
and a light spar lying on the roof near by, in readiness
to be used should they ground.
While on the bank, Paul had observed that, by keeping
the boat near the wind, he might stretch through one of the
widest of the channels for near two miles unless disturbed
by currents, and that, when at its southern end, he should
be far enough to windward to fetch the inlet, but for the
banks of sand that might lie in his way. The distance had
prevented his discerning any passage through the reef at the
farther end of this channel; but, the boat drawing only two
feet of water, he was not without hopes of being able to find
one. A chasm, that was deep enough to prevent the
passage
of the Arabs when the tide was in, would, he thought,
certainly suffice for their purpose. The progress of the boat
was steady, and reasonably fast; but it was like moving in
a mass of obscurity. The gentleman watched the water
ahead intently, with a view to avoid the banks, but with
little
success; for, as they advanced, it was merely one pile
of gloom succeeding another. Fortunately the previous
observation
of Paul availed them, and for more than half an
hour their progress was uninterrupted.
They sleep in security beneath us, said Paul, while
we are steering almost at random. This is a strange and
hazardous situatien in which we are placed. The obscurity
renders all the risks double.
By the watch-fires, we must have nearly crossed the
bay, and I should think we are now quite near the southern
reef.
I think the same; but I like not this baffling of the
wind. It comes fresher at moments, but it is in puffs, and I
fear there will be a shift. It is now my best pilot.
Vol. II.  10
That and the fires.
The fires are treacherous always. It looks darker than
ever ahead!
The wind ceased blowing altogether, and the sail fell in
heavily. Almost at the same moment the launch lost its
way, and Paul had time to thrust the boot-hook forward just
in season to prevent its striking a rock.
This is a part of the reef, then, that is never covered,
said he. If you will get on the rocks and hold the boat, I
will endeavour to examine the place for a passage. Were
we one hundred feet to the southward and westward, we
should be in the open ocean, and comparatively safe.
Mr. Sharp complied, and Paul descended carefully on the
reef, feeling his way in the intense darkness by means of the
boat-hook. He was absent ten minutes, moving with great
caution, as there was the danger of his falling into the sea
at every step. His friend began to be uneasy, and the whole
of the jeopardy of their situation presented itself vividly to
his mind in that brief space of time, should accident befall
their only guide. He was looking anxiously in the direction
in which Paul had disappeared, when he felt a gripe of his
arm.
Breathe even with care! whispered Paul hurriedly.
These rocks are covered with Arabs, who have chosen to
remain on the dry parts of the reef, in readiness for their
plunder in the morning. Thank Heaven! I have found you
again; for I was beginning to despair. To have called to
you would have been certain capture, as eight or ten of the
barbarians are sleeping within fifty feet of us. Get on the
roof with the least possible noise, and leave the rest to me.
As soon as Mr. Sharp was in the boat, Paul gave it a
violent shove from the rocks, and sprang on the roof at the
same moment. This forced the launch astern, and procured
a momentary safety. But the wind had shifted. It now
came baffling, and in puffs, from the Desert, a circumstance
that brought them again to leeward.
This is the commencement of the trades, said Paul;
they have been interrupted by the late gale, but are
returning
.
Were we outside the reef, our prayers could not be
more kindly answered than by giving us this very wind;
but here, where we are, it comes unseasonably. Ha!this,
at least, helps her!
A puff from the land filled the sails, and the ripple of the
water at the stern was just audible. The helm was
attended
to, and the boat drew slowly from the reef and
ahead
.
We have all reason for gratitude! That danger, at
least, is avoided. Ha! the boat is aground!
Sure enough the launch was on the sands. They were
still so near the rocks, as to require the utmost caution
in their proceedings. Using the spar with great care, the
gentlemen discovered that the boat hung astern, and there
remained no choice but patience.
It is fortunate the Arabs have no dogs with them on
the rocks: you hear them howling incessantly in their
camps.
It is, truly. Think you we can ever find the inlet in
this deep obscurity?
It is our only course. By following the rocks we
should be certain to discover it; but you perceive they are
already out of sight, though they cannot be thirty fathoms
from us. The helm is free, and the boat must be clear of
the bottom again. This last puff has helped us.
Another silence succeeded, during which the launch
moved slowly onward, though whither, neither of the
gentlemen
could tell. But a single fire remained in sight, and
that glimmered like a dying blaze. At times the wind
came hot and arid, savouring of the Desert, and then
intervals
of death-like calm would follow. Paul watched the
boat narrowly for half an hour, turning every breath of air
to the best account, though he was absolutely ignorant of
his position. The reef had not been seen again, and three
several times they grounded, the tide as often floating them
off. The course, too, had been repeatedly varied. The
result
was that painful and profound sensation of
helplessness
that overcomes us all when the chain of association is
broken, and reason becomes an agent less useful than
instinct
.
The last fire is out, whispered Paul. I fear that the
day will dawn and find us still within the reef.
I see an object near us. Can it be a high bank?
The wind had entirely ceased, and the boat was almost
without motion. Paul saw a darkness more intense even
than common ahead of him, and he leaned forward,
naturally
raising a hand before him in precaution. Something
he touched, he knew not what; but feeling a hard smooth
surface, that he at first mistook for a rock, he raised his
eyes slowly, and discerned, by the little light that lingered
in the vault of heaven, a dim tracery that he recognized.
His hand was on the quarter of the ship!
'This the Montauk! he whispered breathlessly, and
her decks must be covered with Arabs. Hist!do you
hear nothing?
They listened, and smothered voices, those of the watch,
mingled with low laughter, were quite audible. This was
a crisis to disturb the coolness of one less trained and
steady than Paul; but he preserved his self-possession.
There is good as well as evil in this, he whispered.
I now know our precise position; and, God be praised!
the inlet is near, could we but reach it.By a strong shove
we can always force the launch from the vessel's side, and
prevent their boarding us; and I think, with extreme
caution
,
we may even haul the boat past the ship undetected.
This delicate task was undertaken. It was necessary to
avoid even a tread heavier than common, a fall of the
boat-hook
,
or a collision with the vessel, as the slightest noise
became
distinctly audible in the profound stillness of deep night.
Once enlightened as to his real position, however, Paul saw
with his mind's eye obstructions that another might not have
avoided. He knew exactly where to lay his hand, when to
bear off, and when to approach nearer to the side of the ship,
as he warily drew the boat along the massive hull.The
yard of the launch luckily leaned towards the reef, and
offered no impediment. In this manner, then, the two
gentlemen
hauled their boat as far as the bows of the ship, and
Paul was on the point of giving a last push, with a view to
shove it to as great a distance possible ahead of the packet,
when its movement was suddenly and violently arrested.
CHAPTER VIII.
And when the hours of rest
Come, like a calm upon the mid-sea brine,
Hushing its billowy breast
The quiet of that moment, too, is thine;
It breathes of him who keeps
The vast and helpless city while it sleeps.
Bryant
.
It
was chilling to meet with this unexpected and sudden
check at so critical a moment. The first impression was,
that some one of the hundreds of Arabs, who were known
to be near, had laid a hand on the launch; but this fear
vanished on examination. No one was visible, and the side
of the boat was untouched. The boat-hook could find no
impediment in the water, and it was not possible that they
could again be aground. Raising the boat-hook over his
head, Paul soon detected the obstacle. The line used by the
barbarians in their efforts to move the ship was stretched
from the forecastle to the reef, and it lay against the boat's
mast. It was severed with caution; but the short end
slipped
from the hand of Mr. Sharp, who cut the rope, and fell
into the water. The noise was heard, and the watch on the
deck of the ship made a rush towards her side.
No time was to be lost; but Paul, who still held the outer
end of the line, pulled on it vigorously, hauling the boat
swiftly from the ship, and, at the same time, a little in
advance
.
As soon as this was done, he dropped the line and
seized the tiller-ropes, in order to keep the launch's head in
a direction between the two dangersthe ship and the reef.
This was not done without some little noise; the footfall on
the roof, and the plash of the water when it received the
line, were audible; and even the element washing under the
bows of the boat was heard. The Arabs of the ship called
to those on the reef, and the latter answered. They took
the alarm, and awoke their comrades, for, knowing as they
did, that the party of Captain Truck was still at liberty, they
apprehended an attack.
10*
The clamour and uproar that succeeded were terrific.
Muskets were discharged at random, and the noises from
the camp echoed the cries and tumult from the vessel and
the rocks. Those who had been sleeping in the boat were
rudely awaked, and Saunders joined in the cries through
sheer fright. But the two gentlemen on deck soon caused
their companions to understand their situation, and to
observe
a profound silence.
They do not appear to see us, whispered Paul to Eve,
as he bent over, so as to put his head at an open window;
and a return of the breeze may still save us. There is a
great alarm among them and no doubt they know we are
not distant; but so long as they cannot tell precisely where,
we are comparatively safe.Their cries do us good service
as land-marks, and you may be certain I shall not approach
the spots were they are heard. Pray Heaven for a wind,
dearest Miss Effingham, pray Heaven for a wind!
Eve silently, but fervently did pray, while the young
man gave all his attention again to the boat.As soon as
they were clear of the lee of the ship, the baffling puffs
returned, and there were several minutes of a steady
little breeze, during which the boat sensibly moved away
from the noises of the ship. On the reef, however, the
clamour still continued, and the gentlemen were soon
satisfied
that the Arabs had stationed themselves along the
whole line of rocks, wherever the latter were bare at high
water, as was now nearly the case, to the northward as
well as to the southward of the opening.
The tide is still entering by the inlet, said Paul, and
we have its current to contend with. It is not strong, but
a trifle is important at a moment like this!
Would it not be possible to reach the bank inside of
us, and to shove the boat ahead by means of these light
spars? asked Mr. Sharp.
The suggestion was a good one; but Paul was afraid
the noise in the water might reach the Arabs, and expose
the party to their fire, as the utmost distance between the
reef and the inner bank at that particular spot did not
exceed a hundred fathoms. At length another puff of air
from the land pressed upon their sails, and the water once
more rippled beneath the bows of the boat. Paul's heart
beat hard, and as he managed the tiller-lines, he strained
his eyes uselessly in order to penetrate the massive-looking
darkness.
Surely, he said to Mr. Sharp, who stood constantly
at his elbow, these cries are directly ahead of us! We
are steering for the Arabs!
We have got wrong in the dark then. Lose not a
moment to keep the boat away, for here to leeward there
are noises.
As all this was self-evident, though confused in his
reckoning, Paul put up the helm, and the boat fell off
nearly dead before the wind. Her motion being now
comparatively
rapid, a few minutes produced an obvious change
in the direction of the different groups of clamorous Arabs,
though they also brought a material lessening in the force
of the air.
I have it! said Paul, grasping his companion almost
convulsively by the arm. We are at the inlet, and
heading, I trust, directly through it! You hear the cries
on our right; they come from the end of the northern reef,
while these on our left are from the end of the southern.
The sounds from the ship, the direction of the land breeze,
our distanceall confirm it, and Providence again
befriends
us!
It will be a fearful error should we be mistaken!
We cannot be deceived, since nothing else will explain
the circumstances. There!the boat
scels
the
ground-swell
a
blessed and certain sign that we are at the inlet!
Would that this tide were done, or that we had more
wind!
Fifteen feverish minutes succeeded. At moments the
puffs of night-air would force the boat ahead, and then
again it was evident by the cries that she fell astern under
the influence of an adverse current. Neither was it easy
to keep her on the true course, for the slightest variation
from the direct line in a tide's way causes a vessel to sheer.
To remedy the latter danger, Paul was obliged to watch his
helm closely, having no other guide than the noisy and
continued vociferations of the Arabs.
These liftings of the boat are full of hope, resumed
Paul; I think, too, that they increase.
I perceive but little difference, though I would gladly
see all you wish.
I am certain the swell increases, and that the boat
rises and falls more frequently. You will allow there is a
swell?
Quite obviously: I perceived it before we kept the boat
away. This variable air is cruelly tantalizing!
Sir George TemplemoreMr. Powis, said a soft voice
at a window beneath them.
Miss Effingham! said Paul, so eager that he suffered
the tiller-line to escape him.
These are frightful cries!Shall we never be rid of
them!
If it depended on meon either of usthey should
distress
you no more. The boat is slowly entering the inlet,
but has to struggle with a head-tide. The wind baffles, and
is light, or in ten minutes we should be out of danger.
Out of this danger, but only to encounter another!
Nay, I do not think much of the risk of the ocean in
so stout a boat. At the most, we may be compelled to cut
away the roof, which makes our little bark somewhat clumsy
in appearance, though it adds infinitely to its comfort. I
think we shall soon get the trades, before which our launch,
with its house even, will be able to make good weather.
We are certainly nearer those cries than before!
Paul felt his cheek glow, and his hand hurriedly sought
the tiller-line, for the boat had sensibly sheered towards the
northern reef. A puff of air helped to repair his oversight,
and all in the launch soon perceived that the cries were
gradually but distinctly drawing more aft.
The current lessens, said Paul, and it is full time;
for it must be near high water. We shall soon feel it in our
favour, when all will be safe!
This is indeed blessed tidings! and no gratitude can
ever repay the debt we owe you, Mr. Powis!
The puffs of air now required all the attention of Paul,
for they again became variable, and at last the wind drew
directly ahead in a continued current for half an hour. As
soon as this change was felt, the sails were trimmed to it,
and the boat began to stir the water under her bows.
The shift was so sudden, that we cannot be mistaken in
its direction, Paul remarked; besides, those cries still
serve as pilots. Never was uproar more agreeable.
I feel the bottom with this spar! said Mr. Sharp
suddenly
.
Merciful Providence protect and shield the weak and
lovely
Nay, I feel it no longer: we are already in deeper
water.
It was the rock on which the seamen stood when we
entered! Paul exclaimed, breathing more freely. I like
those voices settling more under our lee, too. We will keep
this tack (the boat's head was to the northward) until we
hit the reef, unless warned off again by the cries.
The boat now moved at the rate of five miles in the hour,
or faster than a man walks, even when in quick motion. Its
rising and falling denoted the long heavy swell of the ocean,
and the wash of water began to be more and more audible,
as she settled into the sluggish swells.
That sounds like the surf on the reef, continued Paul
every thing denotes the outside of the rocks.
God send it prove so!
That is clearly a sea breaking on a rock! It is
awkwardly
near, and to leeward, and yet it is sweet to the ear
as music.
The boat stood steadily on, making narrow escapes from
jutting rocks, as was evinced by the sounds, and once or
twice by the sight even; but the cries shifted gradually, and
were soon quite astern. Paul knew that the reef trended
east soon after passing the inlet, and he felt the hope that
they were fast leaving its western extremity, or the part that
ran the farthest into the ocean; after effecting which, there
would be more water to leeward, his own course being
nearly north, as he supposed.
The cries drew still farther aft, and more distant, and the
sullen wash of the surf was no longer so near as to seem
fresh and tangible.
Hand me the lead and line, that lie at the foot of the
mast, if you please, said Paul. Our water seems
sensibly
to deepen, and the seas have become more regular.
He hove a cast, and found six fathoms of water; a proof,
he thought, that they were quite clear of the reef.
Now, dear Mr. Effingham, Miss Effingham,
Mademoiselle
,
he cried cheerfully, now I believe we may indeed
deem ourselves beyond the reach of the Arabs, unless a gale
force us again on their inhospitable shores.
Is it permitted to speak? asked Mr. Effingham, who
had maintained a steady but almost breathless silence.
Freely: we are quite beyond the reach of the voice;
and this wind, though blowing from a quarter I do not like,
is carrying us away from the wretches rapidly.
It was not safe in the darkness, and under the occasional
heaves of the boat, for the others to come on the roof; but
they opened the shutters, and looked out upon the gloomy
water with a sense of security they could not have deemed
possible for people in their situation. The worst was over
for the moment, and there is a relief in present escape that
temporarily conceals future dangers. They could converse
without the fear of alarming their enemies, and Paul spoke
encouragingly of their prospects. It was his intention to
stand to the northward until he reached the wreck, when,
failing to get any tidings of their friends, they might make
the best of their way to the nearest island to leeward.
With this cheering news the party below again disposed
themselves to sleep, while the two young men maintained
their posts on the roof.
We must resemble an ark, said Paul laughing, as he
seated himself on a box near the stem of the boat, and I
should think would frighten the Arabs from an attack, had
they even the opportunity to make one. This house we
carry will prove a troublesome companion, should we
encounter
a heavy and a head sea.
You say it may easily be gotten rid of.
Nothing would be easier, the whole apparatus being
made to ship and unship.
Before
the wind we might carry
it a long time, and it would even help us along; but
on
a
wind it makes us a little top-heavy, besides giving us a
leeward
set. In the event of rain, or of bad weather of any
sort, it would be a treasure to us all, more especially to the
females, and I think we had better keep it as long as
possible
.
The half hour of breeze already mentioned sufficed to
carry the boat some distance to the northward, when it
failed, and the puffs from the land returned. Paul supposed
they were quite two miles from the inlet, and, trying the
lead, he found ten fathoms of water, a proof that they had
also gradually receded from the shore. Still nothing but a
dense darkness surrounded them, though there could no
longer be the smallest doubt of their being in the open ocean.
For near an hour the light baffling air came in puffs, as
before, during which time the launch's head was kept, as
near as the two gentlemen could judge, to the northward,
making but little progress; and then the breeze drew
gradually
round into one quarter, and commenced blowing with
a steadiness that they had not experienced before that night.
Paul suspected this change, though he had no certain means
of knowing it; for as soon as the wind baffled, his course
had got to be conjectural again. As the breeze freshened,
the speed of the boat necessarily augmented, though she was
kept always on a wind; and after half an hour's progress,
the gentlemen became once more uneasy as to the direction.
It would be a cruel and awkward fate to hit the reef
again, said Paul; and yet I cannot be sure that we are
not running directly for it.
We have compasses: let us strike a light and look into
the matter.
It were better had we done this more early, for a light
might now prove dangerous, should we really have altered
the course in this intense darkness. There is no remedy,
however, and the risk must be taken. I will first try the
lead again.
A cast was made, and the result was two and a half
fathoms of water.
Put the helm down! cried Paul, springing to the sheet:
lose not a moment, but down with the helm!
The boat did not work freely under her imperfect sail
and with the roof she carried, and a moment of painful
anxiety succeeded. Paul managed, however, to get a part
of the sail aback, and he felt more secure.
The boat has stern-way: shift the helm, Mr. Sharp.
This was done, the yard was dipped, and the two young
men felt a relief almost equal to that they had experienced
on clearing the inlet, when they found the launch again
drawing ahead, obedient to her rudder.
We are near something, reef or shore, said Paul,
standing with the lead-line in his hand, in readiness to
heave. I think it can hardly be the first, as we hear no
Arabs.
Waiting a few minutes, he hove the lead, and, to his
infinite
joy, got three fathoms fairly.
That is good news. We are hauling off the danger,
whatever it may be, he said, as he felt the mark: and
now for the compass.
Saunders was called, a light was struck, and the
compasses
were both examined. These faithful but mysterious
guides, which have so long served man while they have
baffled all his ingenuity to discover the sources of their
power, were, as usual, true to their governing principle.
The boat was heading north-north-west; the wind was at
north-east, and before they tacked they had doubtless been
standing directly for the beach, from which they could not
have been distant a half quarter of a mile, if so much. A
few more minutes would have carried them into the
breakers
,
capsized the boat, and most probably drowned all
below
the roof, if not those on it.
Paul shuddered as these facts forced themselves on his
attention, and he determined to stand on his present course
for two hours, when daylight would render his return
towards
the land without danger.
This is the trade, he said, and it will probably stand.
We have a current to contend with, as well as a head-wind;
but I think we can weather the cape by morning, when we
can get a survey of the wreck by means of the glass. If
we discover nothing, I shall bear up at once for the Cape de
Verds.
The two gentlemen now took the helm in turns, he who
slept fastening himself to the mast, as a precaution against
being rolled into the sea by the motion of the boat. In
fifteen
fathoms water they tacked again, and stood to the
east-south-east
,
having made certain, by a fresh examination of
the compass, that the wind stood in the same quarter as
before
.
The moon rose soon after, and, although the morning
was clouded and lowering, there was then sufficient light to
remove all danger from the darkness. At length this long
and anxious night terminated in the usual streak of day,
which gleamed across the desert.
Paul was at the helm, steering more by instinct than any
thing else, and occasionally nodding at his post; for two
successive nights of watching and a day of severe toil had
overcome his sense of danger, and his care for others.
Strange fancies beset men at such moments; and his busy
imagination was running over some of the scenes of his
early youth, when either his sense or his wandering
faculties
made him hear the usual brief, spirited hail of,
Boat ahoy!
Paul opened his eyes, felt that the tiller was in his hand,
and was about to close the first again, when the words were
more sternly repeated,
Boat ahoy!what craft's that? Answer, or expect a
shot!
This was plain English, and Paul was wide awake in an
instant. Rubbing his eyes, he saw a line of boats anchored
directly on his weather bow, with a raft of spars riding
astern.
Hurrah! shouted the young man. This is Heaven's
own tidings! Are these the Montauk's?
Ay, ay. Who the devil are you?
The truth is, Captain Truck did not recognize his own
launch in the royal, roof, and jigger. He had never before
seen a boat afloat in such a guise; and in the obscurity of
the hour, and fresh awakened from a profound sleep, like
Paul, his faculties were a little confused. But the latter
soon comprehended the whole matter. He clapped his
helm down, let fly the sheet, and in a minute the launch of
the packet was riding alongside of the launch of the Dane.
Heads were out of the shutters, and every boat gave up
its sleepers, for the cry was general throughout the little
flotilla.
The party just arrived alone felt joy. They found those
Vol. II.  11
whom they had believed dead, or captives, alive and free;
whereas the others now learned the extent of the misfortune
that had befallen them. For a few minutes this contrast in
feeling produced an awkward meeting; but the truth soon
brought all down to the same sober level. Captain Truck
received the congratulations of his friends like one in a
stupor
;
Toast looked amazed as his friend Saunders shook his
hand; and the gentlemen who had been to the wreck met the
cheerful greetings of those who had just escaped the Arabs
like men who fancied the others mad.
We pass over the explanations that followed, as every
one will readily understand them. Captain Truck listened
to Paul like one in a trance, and it was some time after the
young man had done before he spoke. With a wish to
cheer him, he was told of the ample provision of stores that
had been brought off in the launch, of the trade winds that
had now apparently set in, and of the great probability of
their all reaching the islands in safety. Still the old man
made no reply; he got on the roof of his own launch, and
paced backwards and forwards rapidly, heeding nothing.
Even Eve spoke to him unnoticed, and the consolations
offered by her father were not attended to. At length he
stopped suddenly, and called for his mate.
Mr. Leach?
Sir.
Here is a category for you!
Ay, ay, sir; it's bad enough in its way; still we are
better off than the Danes.
You tell me, sir, turning to Paul, that these foul
blackguards were actually on the deck of the ship?
Certainly, Captain Truck. They took complete
possession
;
for we had no means of keeping them off.
And the ship is ashore?
Beyond a question.
Bilged?
I think not. There is no swell within the reef, and she
lies on sand.
We might have spared ourselves the trouble, Leach, of
culling these cursed spars, as if they had been so many
toothpicks.
That we might, sir; for they will not now serve as
oven-wood, for want of the oven.
A damnable category, Mr. Effingham! I'm glad you
are safe, sir; and you, too, my dear young ladyGod bless
you!God bless you!It were better the whole line should
be in their power than one like you!
The old seaman's eyes filled as he shook Eve by the hand,
and for a moment he forgot the ship.
Mr. Leach?
Sir.
Let the people have their breakfasts, and bear a hand
about it. We are likely to have a busy morning, sir. Lift
the kedge, too, and let us drift down towards these gentry,
and take a look at them. We have both wind and current
with us now, and shall make quick work of it.
The kedge was raised, the sails were all set, and, with
the two launches lashed together, the whole line of boats
and spars began to set to the southward at a rate that would
bring them up with the inlet in about two hours.
This is the course for the Cape de Verds, gentlemen,
said the captain bitterly. We shall have to pass before
our own door to go and ask hospitality of strangers. But
let the people get their breakfasts, Mr. Leach; just let the
boys have one comfortable meal before they take to their
oars.
Eat himself, however, Mr. Truck would not. He chewed
the end of a cigar, and continued walking up and down the
roof.
In half an hour the people had ended their meal, the day
had fairly opened, and the boats and raft had made good
progress.
Splice the main-brace, Mr. Leach, said the captain,
for we are a littled jammed. And you, gentlemen, do me
the favour to step this way for a consultation. This much
is due to your situation.
Captain Truck assembled his male passengers in the stern
of the Dane's launch, where he commenced the following
address:
Gentlemen, he said, every thing in this world has
its nature and its principles. This truth I hold you all to be
too well informed and well educated to deny. The nature
of a traveller is to travel, and see curiosities; the nature of
old men is to think on the past, of a young man to hope for
the future. The nature of a seaman is to stick by his ship,
and of a ship to be treated like a vessel, and not to be
ransacked
like a town taken by storm, or a nunnery that is
rifled.You are but passengers, and doubtless have your
own wishes and occupations, as I have mine. Your wishes
are, beyond question, to be safe in New York among your
friends; and mine are to get the Montauk there too, in as
little time and with as little injury as possible. You have a
good navigator among you; and I now propose that you
take the Montauk's launch, with such stores as are
necessary
,
and fill away at once for the islands, where, I pray
God, you may all arrive in safety, and that when you reach
America you may find all your relations in good health, and
in no manner uneasy at this little delay. Your effects shall
be safely delivered to your respective orders, should it please
God to put it in the power of the line to honour your drafts.
You intend to attempt recapturing the ship! exclaimed
Paul.
I do, sir, returned Mr. Truck, who, having thus far
opened his mind, for the first time that morning gave a
vigorous hem! and set about lighting a cigar.We may
do it, gentlemen, or we may not do it. If we do it, you will
hear farther from me; if we fail, why, tell them at home
that we carried sail as long as a stitch would draw.
The gentlemen looked at each other, the young waiting
in respect for the counsel of the old, the old hesitating in
deference to the pride and feelings of the young.
We must join you in this enterprise, captain, said Mr.
Sharp quietly, but with the manner of a man of spirit and
nerve.
Certainly, certainly, cried Mr. Monday; we ought to
make a common affair of it; as I dare say Sir George
Templemore
will agree with me in maintaining; the nobility and
gentry are not often backward when their persons are to be
risked.
The spurious baronet acquiesced in the proposal as readily
as it had been made by him whom he had temporarily
deposed
;
for, though a weak and a vain young man, he was
far from being a dastard.
This is a serious business, observed Paul, and it
ought to be ordered with method and intelligence. If we
have a ship to care for, we have those also who are infinitely
more precious.
Very true, Mr. Blunt, very true, interrupted Mr. Dodge,
a little eagerly. It is my maxim to let well alone; and I
am certain shipwrecked people can hardly be better off and
more comfortable than we are at this very moment. I dare
say these gallant sailors, if the question was fairly put to
them, would give it by a handsome majority in favour of
things as they are. I am a conservative, captainand I
think an appeal ought to be made to the ballot-boxes before
we decide on a measure of so much magnitude.
The occasion was too grave for the ordinary pleasantry,
and this singular proposition was heard in silence, to Mr.
Dodge's great disgust.
I think it the duty of Captain Truck to endeavour to
retake
his vessel, continued Paul; but the affair will be
serious, and success is far from certain. The Montauk's
launch ought to be left at a safe distance with all the females,
and in prudent keeping; for any disaster to the boarding
party would probably throw the rest of the boats into the
hands of the barbarians, and endanger the safety of those
left in the launch.Mr. Effingham and Mr. John Effingham
will of course remain with the ladies.
The father assented with the simplicity of one who did
not distrust his own motives, but the eagle-shaped features
of his kinsman curled with a cool and sarcastic smile.
Will
you
remain in the launch? the latter asked
pointedly
,
turning towards Paul.
Certainly it would be greatly out of character were I
to think of it. My trade is war; and I trust that Captain
Truck means to honour me with the command of one of the
boats.
I thought as much, by Jove! exclaimed the captain,
seizing a hand which he shook with the utmost cordiality.
I should as soon expect to see the sheet-anchor wink, or
the best-bower give a mournful smile, as to see you duck!
11*
Still, gentlemen, I am well aware of the difference in our
situations. I ask no man to forget his duties to those on
shore on my account; and I fancy that my regular people,
aided by Mr. Blunt, who can really serve me by his
knowledge
,
will be as likely to do all that can be done as all of
us united. It is not numbers that carry ships as much as
spirit, promptitude, and resolution.
But the question has not yet been put to the people,
said Mr. Dodge, who was a little mystified by the word last
used, which he had yet to learn was strictly technical as
applied
to a vessel's crew.
It shall, sir, returned Captain Truck, and I beg you
to note the majority. My lads, he continued, rising on a
thwart, and speaking aloud, you know the history of the
ship. As to the Arabs, now they have got her, they do not
know how to sail her, and it is no more than a kindness to
take her out of their hands. For this business I want
volunteers
;
those who are for the reef, and an attack, will rise up
and cheer; while they who like an offing have only to sit
still and stay where they are.
The words were no sooner spoken than Mr. Leach jumped
up on the gunwale and waved his hat. The people rose as
one man, and taking the signal from the mate, they gave
three as hearty cheers as ever rung over the bottle.
Dead against you, sir! observed the captain, nodding
to the editor; and I hope you are now satisfied.
The ballot might have given it the other way,
muttered
Mr. Dodge; there can be no freedom of election
without the ballot.
No one, however, thought any longer of Mr. Dodge or
his scruples; but the whole disposition for the attack was
made with promptitude and caution. It was decided that
Mr. Effingham and his own servant should remain in the
launch; while the captain compelled his two mates to
draw lots which of them should stay behind also, a
navigator
being indispensable. The chance fell on the second
mate, who submitted to his luck with an ill grace.
A bust of Napoleon was cut up, and the pieces of lead
were beaten as nearly round as possible, so as to form a
dozen leaden balls, and a quantity of slugs, or langrage.
The latter were put in canvas bags; while the keg of
powder
was opened, a flannel shirt or two were torn, and
cartridges
were filled. Ammunition was also distributed to
the people, and Mr. Sharp examined their arms. The gun
was got off the roof of the Montauk's launch, and placed
on a grating forward in that of the Dane. The sails and
rigging were cleared out of the boat and secured on the
raft when she was properly manned, and the command of
her was given to Paul.
The three other boats received their crews, with John
Effingham at the head of one, the captain and his mate
commanding the others. Mr. Dodge felt compelled to
volunteer to go in the launch of the Dane, where Paul had
now taken his station, though he did it with a reluctance
that escaped the observation of no one who took the pains
to observe him. Mr. Sharp and Mr. Monday were with
the captain, and the false Sir George Templemore went
with Mr. Leach. These arrangements completed, the
whole party waited impatiently for the wind and current to
set them down towards the reef, the rocks of which by this
time were plainly visible, even from the thwarts of the
several boats.
CHAPTER IX.
Hark! was it not the trumpet's voice I heard?
The soul of battle is a wake within me.
The fate of ages and of empires hangs
On this dread hour.
Massinger
.
The
two launches were still sailing side by side, and
Eve now appeared at the open window next the seat of
Paul. Her face was pale as when the scene of the cabin
occurred, and her lip trembled.
I do not understand these warlike proceedings, she
said; but I trust, Mr. Blunt,
we
have no concern with
the present movement.
Put your mind at ease on this head, dearest Miss
Effingham, for what we now do we do in compliance with a
general law of manhood. Were your interests and the
interests of those with you alone consulted, we might come
to a very different decision: but I think you are in safe
hands should our adventure prove unfortunate.
Unfortunate! It is fearful to be so near a scene like
this! I cannot ask you to do any thing unworthy of
yourself
;
but, all that we owe you impels me to say, I trust
you have too much wisdom, too much true courage, to
incur unnecessary risks.
The young man looked volumes of gratitude; but the
presence of the others kept its expression within due
bounds.
We old sea dogs, he answered, smiling, are rather
noted for taking care of ourselves. They who are trained
to a business like this usually set about it too much in a
business-like manner to hazard anything for mere show.
And very wisely; Mr. Sharp, too,Eve's colour
deepened
with a consciousness that Paul would have given worlds
to understandhe has a claim on us we shall never forget.
My father can say all this better than I.
Mr. Effingham now expressed his thanks for all that had
passed, and earnestly enjoined prudence on the young men.
After which Eve withdrew her head, and was seen no more.
Most of the next hour was passed in prayer by those in the
launch.
By this time the boats and raft were within half a mile
of the inlet; and Captain Truck ordered the kedge, which
had been transferred to the launch of the Montauk, to be let
go. As soon as this was done, the old seaman threw down
his hat, and stood on a thwart in his grey hair.
Gentlemen, you have your orders, he said with
dignity
;
for from that moment his manner rose with the
occasion
,
and had something of the grandeur of the warrior.
You see the enemy. The reef must first be cleared, and
then the ship shall be carried. God knows who will live to
see the end; but that end must be success, or the bones of
John Truck shall bleach on these sands! Our cry is `The
Montauk and our own!' which is a principle Vattel will
sustain
us in. Give way, men! a long pull, a strong pull, and
a pull altogether; each boat in its station!
He waved his hand, and the oars fell into the water at the
same instant. The heavy launch was the last, for she had
double-fasts to the other boat. While loosening that forward
the second mate deserted his post, stepping nimbly on board
the departing boat, and concealing himself behind the
foremost
of the two lug-sails she carried. Almost at the same
instant Mr. Dodge reversed this manuvre by pretending to
be left clinging to the boat of the Montauk, in his zeal to
shove off. As the sails were drawing hard, and the oars
dashed the spray aside, it was too late to rectify either of
these mistakes, had it been desirable.
A few minutes of a stern calm succeeded, each boat
keeping
its place with beautiful precision. The Arabs had left
the northern reef with the light; but, the tide being out,
hundreds were strung along the southern range of rocks,
especially near the ship. The wind carried the launch
ahead, as had been intended, and she soon drew near the
inlet.
Take in the sails, said Mr. Blunt. See your gun
clear forward.
A fine, tall, straight, athletic young seaman stood near
the grating, with a heated iron lying in a vessel of live coals
before him, in lieu of a loggerhead, the fire being covered
with a tarpaulin. As Paul spoke, this young mariner turned
towards him with the peculiar grace of a man-of-war's-man,
and touched his hat.
Ay, ay, sir. All ready, Mr. Powis.
Paul started, while the other smiled proudly, like one who
knew more than his companions.
We have met before, said the first.
That have we sir, and in boat-duty, too. You were the
first on board the pirate on the coast of Cuba, and I was
second.
A look of recognition and a wave of the hand passed
between them, the men cheering involuntarily. It was too
late for more, the launch being fairly in the inlet, where she
received a general but harmless fire from the Arabs. An
order had been given to fire the first shot over the heads of
the barbarians; but this assault changed the plan.
Depress the piece, Brooks, said Paul, and throw in a
bag of slugs.
All ready, sir, was uttered in another minute.
Hold water, menthe boat is steadylet them have it.
Men fell at that discharge; but how many was never
known, as the bodies were hurried off the reef by those who
fled. A few concealed themselves along the rocks, but most
scampered towards the shore.
Bravely done! cried Captain Truck, as his boat swept
past. Now for the ship, sir!
The people cheered again, and dashed their oars into the
water. To clear the reef was nothing; but to carry the
ship was a serious affair. She was defended by four times
the number of those in the boats, and there was no retreat.
The Arabs, as has already been seen, had suspended their
labour during the night, having fruitlessly endeavoured to
haul the vessel over to the reef before the tide rose. More
by accident than by calculation, they had made such
arrangements
by getting a line to the rocks as would probably
have set the ship off the sands, when she floated at high
water; but this line had been cut by Paul in passing, and the
wind coming on shore again, during the confusion and
clamour
of the barbarians, or at a moment when they thought
they were to be attacked, no attention was paid to the
circumstance
,
and the Montauk was suffered to drive up still
higher on the sands, where she effectually grounded at the
very top of the tide. As it was now dead low water, the
ship had sewed materially, and was now lying on her bilge,
partly sustained by the water, and partly by the bottom.
During the short pause that succeeded, Saunders, who was
seated in the captain's boat as a small-arms-man, addressed
his subordinate in a low voice.
Now, Toast, he said, you are about to contend in
battle for the first time; and I diwine, from experience, that
the ewent gives you some sentiments that are werry original.
My adwice to you is, to shut both eyes until the word is
given to fire, and then to open them suddenly, as if just
awaking from sleep; after which you may present and pull
the trigger. Above all, Toast, take care not to kill any of
our own friends, most especially not Captain Truck, just at
this werry moment.
I shall do my endeavours, Mr. Saunders, muttered
Toast, with the apathy and submissive dependence on others
with which the American black usually goes into action. If
I do any harm, I hope it will be overlooked, on account of
my want of experience.
Imitate me, Toast, in coolness and propriety, and you'll
be certain not to offend. I do not mean that you too are to
kill the werry same
Muscle
-men that I kill, but that when I
kill one you are to kill another. And be werry careful not
to hurt Captain Truck, who'll be certain to run right afore
the muzzle of our guns, if he sees any thing to be done
there.
Toast growled an assent, and then there was no other
noise in the boat than that which was produced by the steady
and vigorous falling of the oars. An attempt had been made
to lighten the vessel by unloading her, and the bank of sand
was already covered with bales and boxes, which had been
brought up from the hold by means of a stage, and by sheer
animal force. The raft had been extended in size, and
brought round to the bank by the stern of the vessel, with
the intention to load it, and to transfer the articles already
landed to the rocks.
Such was the state of things about the Montauk when the
boats came into the channel that ran directly up to the bank.
The launch led again, her sails having been set as soon as
the reef was swept, and she now made another discharge on
the deck of the ship, which, inclining towards the gun,
offered
no shelter. The effect was to bring every Arab, in the
twinkling of an eye, down upon the bank.
Hurrah! shouted Captain Truck; that grist has
purified
the old bark! And now to see who is to own her! `The
thieves are out of the temple,' as my good father would have
said.
The four boats were in a line abreast, the launch under
one sail only. A good deal of confusion existed on the bank;
but the Arabs sought the cover of the bales and boxes, and
opened a sharp though irregular fire. Three times, as they
advanced, the second mate and that gallant-looking young
seaman called Brooks discharged the gun, and at each
discharge
the Arabs were dislodged and driven to the raft. The
cheers of the seamen became animated, though they still
plied the oars.
Steadily, men, said Captain Truck, and prepare to
board.
At this moment the launch grounded, though still twenty
yards from the bank, the other boats passing her with loud
cheers.
We are all ready, sir, cried Brooks.
Let 'em have it. Take in the sail, boys.
The gun was fired, and the tall young seaman sprang
upon the grating and cheered. As he looked backward,
with a smile of triumph, Paul saw his eyes roll. He leaped
into the air, and fell at his length dead upon the water; for
such is the passage of a man in battle, from one state of
existence
to another.
Where do we hang? asked Paul steadily; forward
or aft?
It was forward, and deeper water lay ahead of them. The
sail was set again, and the people were called aft. The boat
tipped, and shot ahead towards the sands, like a courser
released
from a sudden pull.
All this time the others were not idle. Not a musket was
fired from either boat until the whole three struck the bank,
almost at the same instant, though at as many different
points. Then all leaped ashore, and threw in a fire so close,
that the boxes served as much for a cover to the assailants
as to the assailed. It was at this critical moment, when the
seamen paused to load, that Paul, just clear of the bottom,
with his own hand applying the loggerhead, swept the rear
of the bank with a most opportune discharge.
Yard-arm and yard-arm! shouted Captain Truck.
Lay 'em aboard, boys, and give 'em Jack's play!
The whole party sprang forward, and from that moment
all order ceased. Fists, handspikes, of which many were
on the bank, and the butts of muskets, were freely used,
and in a way that set the spears and weapons of the Arabs
at defiance. The Captain, Mr. Sharp, John Effingham, Mr.
Monday, the
soi-disant
Sir George Templemore, and the
chief mate, formed a sort of Macedonian phalanx, which
penetrated the centre of the barbarians, and which kept
close to the enemy, following up its advantages with a spirit
that admitted of no rallying. On their right and left pressed
the men, an athletic, hearty, well-fed gang. The superiority
of the Arabs was in their powers of endurance; for, trained
to the whip-cord rigidity of racers, force was less their
peculiar
merit than bottom. Had they acted in concert,
however
,
or had they been on their own desert, mounted, and
with room for their subtle evolutions, the result might have
been very different; but, unused to contend with an enemy
who brought them within reach of the arm, their tactics
were deranged, and all their habits violated. Still, their
numbers were formidable, and it is probable that the
accident
to the launch, after all, decided the matter. From the
moment the
mle
began not a shot was fired, but the
assailants
pressed upon the assailed, until a large body of the
latter had collected near the raft. This was just as the
launch reached the shore, and Paul perceived there was
great danger that the tide might roll backward from sheer
necessity. The gun was loaded, and filled nearly to the
muzzle with slugs. He caused the men to raise it on their
oars, and to carry it to a large box, a little apart from the
confusion of the fight. All this was done in a moment,
for three minutes had not yet passed since the captain
landed.
Instead of firing, Paul called aloud to his friends to cease
fighting. Though chafing like a vexed lion, Captain Truck
complied, surprise effecting quite as much as obedience.
The Arabs, hardest pressed upon, profited by the pause to
fall back on the main body of their friends, near the raft.
This was all Paul could ask, and he ordered the gun to be
pointed at the centre of the group, while he advanced
himself
towards the enemy, making a sign of peace.
Damn 'em, lay 'em aboard! cried the captain: no
quarter to the blackguards!
I rather think we had better charge again, added Mr.
Sharp, who was thoroughly warmed with his late
employment
.
Vol. II.  12
Hold, gentlemen; you risk all needlessly. I will show
these poor wretches what they have to expect, and they
will probably retire. We want the ship, not their blood.
Well, well, returned the impatient captain, give 'em
plenty of Vattel, for we have 'em now in a category.
The men of the wilderness and of the desert seem to act
as much by instinct as by reason. An old sheik advanced,
smiling, towards Paul, when the latter was a few yards in
advance of his friends, offering his hand with as much
cordiality
as if they met merely to exchange courtesies. Paul
led him quietly to the gun, put his hand in, and drew out a
bag of slugs, replaced it, and pointed significantly at the
dense crowd of exposed Arabs, and at the heated iron that
was ready to discharge the piece. At all this the old Arab
smiled, and seemed to express his admiration. He was
then showed the strong and well-armed party, all of whom
by this time had a musket or a pistol ready to use. Paul
then signed to the raft and to the reef, as much as to tell the
other to withdraw his party.
The sheik exhibited great coolness and sagacity, and,
unused to frays so desperate, he signified his disposition to
comply. Truces, Paul knew, were common in the African
combats, which are seldom bloody, and he hoped the best
from the manner of the sheik, who was now permitted to
return to his friends. A short conference succeeded among
the Arabs, when several of them smilingly waved their
hands, and most of the party crowded on the raft. Others
advanced, and asked permission to bear away their
wounded
,
and the bodies of the dead, in both of which offices they
were assisted by the seamen, as far as was prudent; for it
was all-important to be on the guard against treachery.
In this extraordinary manner the combatants separated,
the Arabs hauling themselves over to the reef by a line,
their old men smiling, and making signs of amity, until
they were fairly on the rocks. Here they remained but a
very few minutes, for the camels and dromedaries were seen
trotting off towards the Dane on the shore; a sign that the
compact between the different parties of the barbarians was
dissolved, and that each man was about to plunder on his
own account. This movement produced great agitation
among the old sheiks and their followers on the reef, and
set them in motion with great activity towards the land. So
great was their hurry, indeed, that the bodies of all the
dead, and of several of the wounded, were fairly abandoned
on the rocks, at some distance from the shore.
The first step of the victors, as a matter of course, was
to inquire into their own loss. This was much less than
would have otherwise been, on account of their good
conduct
.
Every man, without a solitary exception, had
ostensibly
behaved well; one of the most infallible means of
lessening danger. Several of the party had received slight
hurts, and divers bullets had passed through hats and jackets.
Mr. Sharp, alone, had two through the former, besides one
through his coat. Paul had blood drawn on an arm, and
Captain Truck, to use his own language, resembled a
horse in fly-time, his skin having been rased in no less
than five places. But all these trifling hurts and
hair-breadth
escapes counted for nothing, as no one was seriously
injured by them, or felt sufficient inconvenience even to
report
himself wounded.
The felicitations were warm and general; even the
seamen
asking leave to shake their sturdy old commander by
the hand. Paul and Mr. Sharp fairly embraced, each
expressing his sincere pleasure that the other had escaped
unharmed. The latter even shook hands cordially with his
counterfeit, who had acted with spirit from the first to the
last. John Effingham alone maintained the same cool
indifference
after the affair that he had shown in it, when it was
seen that he had played his part with singular coolness and
discretion, dropping two Arabs with his fowling-piece on
landing, with a sort of sportsman-like coolness with which
he was in the habit of dropping woodcocks at home.
I fear Mr. Monday is seriously hurt, this gentleman
said to the captain, in the midst of his congratulations: he
sits aloof on the box yonder, and looks exhausted.
Mr. Monday! I hope not, with all my heart and soul.
He is a capital
diplomate
, and a stout boarder. And Mr.
Dodge, too! I miss Mr. Dodge.
Mr. Dodge must have remained behind to console the
ladies, returned Paul, finding that your second mate had
abandoned them, like a recreant that he is.
The captain shook his disobedient mate by the hand a
second time, and swore he was a mutineer for violating his
orders, and ended by declaring that the day was not distant
when he and Mr. Leach should command two as good liners
as ever sailed out of America.
I'll have nothing to do with either of you as soon as we
reach home, he concluded. There was Leach a foot or
two ahead of me the whole time; and, as for the second
officer, I should be justified in logging him as having run.
Well, well; young men will be young men; and so would
old men too, Mr. John Effingham, if they knew how. But
Mr. Monday does look doleful; and I am afraid we shall be
obliged to overhaul the medicine-chest for him.
Mr. Monday, however, was beyond the aid of medicine.
A ball had passed through his shoulder-blade in landing;
notwithstanding which he had pressed into the
mle
, where,
unable to parry it, a spear had been thrust into his chest.
The last wound appeared grave, and Captain Truck
immediately
ordered the sufferer to be carried into the ship: John
Effingham, with a tenderness and humanity that were
singularly
in contrast to his ordinary sarcastic manner,
volunteering
to take charge of him.
We have need of all our forces, said Captain Truck,
as Mr. Monday was borne away; and yet it is due to our
friends in the launch to let them know the result. Set the
ensign, Leach; that will tell them our success, though a
verbal communication can alone acquaint them with the
particulars
.
If, interrupted Paul, eagerly, you will lend me the
launch of the Dane, Mr. Sharp and myself will beat her up
to the raft, let our friends know the result, and bring the
spars down to the inlet. This will save the necessity of any
of the men's being absent. We claim the privilege, too, as
belonging properly to the party that is now absent.
Gentlemen, take any privilege you please. You have
stood by me like heroes; and I owe you all more than the
heel of a worthless old life will ever permit me to pay.
The two young men did not wait for a second invitation,
but in five minutes the boat was stretching through one of
the channels that led landward; and in five more it was
laying out of the inlet with a steady breeze.
The instant Captain Truck retrod the deck of his ship
was one of uncontrollable feeling with the weather-beaten
old seaman. The ship had sewed too much to admit of
walking with ease, and he sat down on the coamings of the
main hatch, and fairly wept like an infant. So high had
his feelings been wrought that this outbreaking was violent,
and the men wondered to see their grey-headed, stern, old
commander, so completely unmanned. He seemed at length
ashamed of the weakness himself, for, rising like a worried
tiger, he began to issue his orders as sternly and promptly
as was his wont.
What the devil are you gaping at, men! he growled;
did you never see a ship on her bilge before? God knows,
and for that matter you all know, there is enough to do, that
you stand like so many marines, with their `eyes right!'
and `pipe-clay.'
Take it more kindly, Captain Truck, returned an old
sea-dog, thrusting out a hand that was all knobs, a fellow
whose tobacco had not been displaced even by the fray;
take it kindly, and look upon all these boxes and bales as
so much cargo that is to be struck in, in dock. We'll soon
stow it, and, barring a few slugs, and one four-pounder, that
has cut up a crate of crockery as if it had been a cat in a
cupboard, no great harm is done. I look upon this matter
as no more than a sudden squall, that has compelled us to
bear up for a little while, but which will answer for a winch
to spin yarns on all the rest of our days. I have fit the
French, and the English, and the Turks, in my time; and
now I can say I have had a brush with the niggers.
Dn me, but you are right, old Tom! and I'll make
no more account of the matter. Mr. Leach, give the people
a little encouragement. There is enough left in the jug that
you'll find in the stern-sheets of the pinnace; and then
turn-to
,
and strike in all this dunnage, that the Arabs have been
scattering on the sands. We'll stow it when we get the
ship into an easier bed than the one in which she is now
lying.
This was the signal for commencing work; and these
straight-forward tars, who had just been in the confusion and
hazards of a fight, first took their grog, and then commenced
12*
their labour in earnest. As they had only, with their
knowledge
and readiness, to repair the damage done by the
ignorant
and hurried Arabs, in a short time every thing was on
board the ship again, when their attention was directed to
the situation of the vessel itself. Not to anticipate events,
however, we will now return to the party in the launch.
The reader will readily imagine the feelings with which
Mr. Effingham and his party listened to the report of the
first gun. As they all remained below, they were ignorant
who the individual really was that kept pacing the roof
over their heads, though it was believed to be the second
mate, agreeably to the arrangement made by Captain Truck.
My eyes grow dim,' said Mr. Effingham, who was
looking through a glass; will you try to see what is
passing
,
Eve?
Father, I cannot look, returned the pallid girl. It is
misery enough to hear these frightful guns.
It is awful! said Nanny, folding her arms about her
child, and I wonder that such gentlemen as Mr. John and
Mr. Powis should go on an enterprise so wicked!
Voulez-vous avoir la complaisance, monsieur?
said
Mademoiselle Viefville, taking the glass from the unresisting
hand of Mr. Effingham.
Ha! le combat commence en
effet!
Is it the Arabs who now fire? demanded Eve, unable,
in spite of terror, to repress her interest.
Non, c'est cet admirable jeune homme, Monsieur Blunt,
qui dvance tous les autres!
And now, mademoiselle,
that
must surely be the
barbarians
?
Du tout. Les sauvages fuient. C'est encore du
bateau
de Monsieur Blunt qu'on tire. Quel beau courage!
son bateau est toujours des premiers!
That shout is frightful! Do they close?
On crie des deux parts, je crois. Le vieux capitaine
est en avant  prsent, et Monsieur Blunt s'arrte!
May Heaven avert the danger! Do you see the
gentlemen
at all, Mademoiselle?
La fume est trop paisse. Ah! les viol! On tire
encore de son bateau
.
Eh bien, mademoiselle?
said Eve tremulously, after
a long pause.
C'est dj fini. Les Arabes se retirent et nos amis se
sont empars du btiment. Cela a t l'affaire d'un
moment
,
et que le combat a t glorieux! Ces jeunes gens
sont vraiment dignes d'tre Franais, et le vieux capitaine,
aussi
.'
Are there no tidings for us, mademoiselle? asked
Eve, after another long pause, during which she had
poured out her gratitude in trembling, but secret
thanksgivings
.
Non, pas encore. Ils se flicitent, je crois
.
It's time, I'm sure, ma'am, said the meek-minded Ann,
to send forth the dove, that it may find the olive branch.
War and strife are too sinful to be long indulged in.
There is a boat making sail in this direction, said
Mr. Effingham, who had left the glass with the governess,
in complaisance to her wish.
Oui, c'est le bateau de Monsieur Blunt
.
And who is in it? demanded the father, for the meed
of a world could not have enabled Eve to speak.
Je vois Monsieur Sharpoui, c'est bien lui
.
Is he alone?
Non, il y en a deux  mais  oui  c'est Monsieur
Blunt,notre jeune heros!
Eve bowed her face, and even while her soul melted in
gratitude to God, the feelings of her sex caused the
telltale
blood to suffuse her features to the brightness of
crimson.
Mr. Effingham now took the glass from the spirited
Frenchwoman, whose admiration of brilliant qualities had
overcome her fears, and he gave a more detailed and
connected
account of the situation of things near the ship, as
they presented themselves to a spectator at that distance.
Notwithstanding they already knew so much, it was a
painful and feverish half hour to those in the launch, the
time that intervened between this dialogue and the moment
when the boat of the Dane came alongside of their own.
Every face was at the windows, and the young men were
received like deliverers, in whose safety all felt a deep
concern.
But, cousin Jack, said Eve, across whose speaking
countenance apprehension and joy cast their shadows and
gleams like April clouds driving athwart a brilliant sky,
my father has not been able to discover his form among
those who move about on the bank.
The gentlemen explained the misfortune of Mr. Monday,
and related the manner in which John Effingham had
assumed the office of nurse. A few delicious minutes
passed; for nothing is more grateful than the happiness
that first succeeds a victory, and the young men proceeded
to lift the kedge, assisted by the servant of Mr. Effingham.
The sails were set; and in fifteen minutes the raftthe
long-desired and much-coveted raftapproached the inlet.
Paul steered the larger boat, and gave to Mr. Sharp
directions how to steer the other. The tide was flowing
into the passage; and, by keeping his weatherly position,
the young man carried his long train of spars with so much
precision into its opening, that, favoured by the current, it
was drawn through without touching a rock, and brought
in triumph to the very margin of the bank. Here it was
secured, the sails and cordage were brought ashore, and
the whole party landed.
The last twenty hours seemed like a dream to all the
females
,
as they again walked the solid sand in security and
hope. They had now assembled every material of safety,
and all that remained was to get the ship off the shore, and
to rig her; Mr. Leach having already reported that she was
as tight as the day she left London.
CHAPTER X.
Would I were in an ale-house in London!
I would give all my fame for a pot of ale and safety.
Henry Vth
.
Mademoiselle Viefville
, with a decision and
intelligence
that rendered her of great use in moments of need,
hastened to offer her services to the wounded man, while
Eve, attended by Ann Sidley, ascended the ship and made
her way into the cabins, in the best manner the leaning
position
of the vessel allowed. Here they found less confusion
than might have been expected, the scene being ludicrous,
rather than painful, for Mr. Monday was in his state-room
excluded from sight.
In the first place, the
soi-disant
Sir George Templemore
was counting over his effects, among which he had
discovered
a sad deficiency in coats and pantaloons. The Arabs
had respected the plunder, by compact, with the intention of
making a fair distribution on the reef; but, with a view to
throw a sop to the more rapacious of their associates, one
room had been sacked by the permission of the sheiks. This
unfortunate room happened to be that of Sir George
Templemore
,
and the patent razors, the East Indian dressing
case, the divers toys, to say nothing of innumerable
vestments
which the young man had left paraded in his room,
for the mere pleasure of feasting his eyes on them, had
disappeared
.
Do me the favour, Miss Effingham, he said, appealing
to Eve, of whom he stood habitually in awe, from the pure
necessity of addressing her in his distress, or of addressing
no one; do me the favour to look into my room, and see
the unprincipled manner in which I have been treated. Not
a comb nor a razor left; not a garment to make myself
decent
in! I'm sure such conduct is quite a disgrace to the
civilization
of barbarians even, and I shall make it a point to
have the affair duly represented to his majesty's minister the
moment I arrive in New York. I sincerely hope you have
been better treated, though I think, after this specimen of
their principles, there is little hope for any one: I'm sure we
ought to be grateful they did not strip the ship. I trust we
shall all make common cause against them the moment we
arrive.
We ought, indeed, sir, returned Eve, who, while she
had known from the beginning of his being an impostor, was
willing to ascribe his fraud to vanity, and who now felt
charitable
towards him on account of the spirit he had shown in
the combat; though I trust we shall have escaped better.
Our effects were principally in the baggage-room, and that,
I understand from Captain Truck, has not been touched.
Indeed you are very fortunate, and I can only wish that
the same good luck had happened to myself. But then, you
know, Miss Effingham, that one has need of his little
comforts
,
and, as for myself, I confess to rather a weakness in
that way.
Monstrous prodigality and wastefulness! cried
Saunders
,
as Eve passed on towards her own cabin, willing to
escape any more of Sir George's complaints. Just be so
kind, Miss Effingham, ma'am, to look into this here pantry,
once! Them niggers, I do believe, have had their fingers
in every thing, and it will take Toast and me a week to
get things decorous and orderly again. Some of the
shrieks (for so the steward styled the chiefs) have been
yelling well in this place, I'll engage, as you may see, by the
manner in which they have spilt the mustard and mangled
that cold duck. I've a most mortal awersion to a man that
cuts up poultry against the fibers; and, would you think it,
Miss Effingham, ma'am, that the last gun Mr. Blunt fired,
dislocated, or otherwise diwerted, about half a dozen of the
fowls that happened to be in the way; for I let all the poor
wretches out of the coops, that they might make their own
livings should we never come back. I should think that as
polite and experienced a gentleman as Mr. Blunt might have
shot the Arabs instead of my poultry!
So it is, thought Eve, as she glanced into the pantry
and proceeded. What is considered happiness to-day gets
to be misery to-morrow, and the rebukes of adversity are
forgotten the instant prosperity resumes its influence. Either
of these men, a few hours since, would have been most
happy
to have been in this vessel, as a home, or a covering for
their heads, and now they quarrel with their good fortune
because it is wanting in some accustomed superfluity or
pampered
indulgence.
We shall leave her with this wholesome reflection
uppermost
,
to examine into the condition of her own room, and
return to the deck.
As the hour was still early, Captain Truck having once
quieted his feelings, went to work with zeal, to turn the late
success to the best account. The cargo that had been
discharged
was soon stowed again, and the next great object
was to get the ship afloat previously to hoisting in the new
spars. As the kedges still lay on the reef, and all the
anchors
remained in the places where they had originally been
placed, there was little to do but to get ready to heave upon
the chains as soon as the tide rose. Previously to
commencing
this task, however, the intervening time was well
employed in sending down the imperfect hamper that was
aloft, and in getting up shears to hoist out the remains of the
foremast, as well as the jury mainmast, the latter of which,
it will be remembered, was only fitted two days before. All
the appliances used on that occasion being still on deck, and
every body lending a willing hand, this task was completed
by noon. The jury-mast gave little trouble, but was soon
lying on the bank; and then Captain Truck, the shears
having been previously shifted, commenced lifting the broken
foremast, and just as the cooks announced that the dinner
was ready for the people, the latter safely deposited the spar
on the sands.
`Here, a sheer hulk, lies poor Tom Bowline,'  said
Captain Truck to Mr. Blunt, as the crew came up the
staging
in their way to the galley, in quest of their meal. I
have not beheld the Montauk without a mast since the day
she lay a new-born child at the ship-yards. I see some half
a dozen of these mummified scoundrels dodging about on the
shore yet, though the great majority, as Mr. Dodge would
say, have manifested a decided disposition to amuse
themselves
with a further acquaintance with the Dane. In my
humble opinion, sir, that poor deserted ship will have no
more inside of her by night, than one of Saunders' ducks
that have been dead an hour. That hearty fellow, Mr.
Monday, is hit, I fear, between wind and water, Leach?
He is in a bad way, indeed, as I understand from Mr.
John Effingham, who very properly allows no one to
disturb
him, keeping the state-room door closed on all but
himself
and his own man.
Ay, ay, that is merciful; a man likes a little quiet when
he is killed. As soon as the ship is more fit to be seen,
however, it will become my duty to wait on him in order to
see that nothing is wanting. We must offer the poor man
the consolations of religion, Mr. Blunt.
They would certainly be desirable had we one qualified
for the task.
I can't say as much in that way for myself, perhaps, as
I might, seeing that my father was a priest. But then, we
masters of packets have occasion to turn our hands to a
good many odd jobs. As soon as the ship is snug, I shall
certainly take a look at the honest fellow. Pray, sir, what
became of Mr. Dodge in the skirmish?
Paul smiled, but he prudently answered, I believe he
occupied himself in taking notes of the combat, and I make
no doubt will do you full justice in the Active Inquirer, as
soon as he gets its columns again at his command.
Too much learning, as my good father used to say, has
made him a little mad. But I have a grateful heart to-day,
Mr. Blunt, and will not be critical. I did not perceive
Mr. Dodge in the conflict, as Saunders calls it, but there
were so many of those rascally Arabs, that one had not an
opportunity of seeing much else. We must get the ship
outside of this reef with as little delay as possible, for to tell
you a secrethere the captain dropped his voice to a
whisperthere are but two rounds a-piece left for the
small arms, and only one cartridge for the four-pounder. I
own to you a strong desire to be in the offing.
They will hardly attempt to board us, after the
specimen
they have had of what we can do.
No one knows, sir; no one knows. They keep pouring
down upon the coast like crows on the scent of a carrion,
and once done with the Dane, we shall see them in hundreds
prowling around us like wolves. How much do we want
of high water?
An hour, possibly. I do not think there is much time
to lose before the people get to work at the windlass.
Captain Truck nodded, and proceeded to look into the
condition of his ground-tackle. It was a joyous but an
anxious
moment when the handspikes were first handled, and
the slack of one of the chains began to come in. The ship
had been upright several hours, and no one could tell how
hard she would hang on the bottom. As the chain
tightened
,
the gentlemen, the officers included, got upon the bows
and looked anxiously at the effect of each heave; for it was
a nervous thing to be stranded on such a coast, even after
all that had occurred.
She winks, by George! cried the captain; heave
together, men, and you will stir the sand!
The men did heave, gaining inch by inch, until no effort
could cause the ponderous machine to turn. The mates,
and then the captain, applied their strength in succession,
and but half a turn more was gained. Everybody was now
summoned, even to the passengers, and the enormous strain
seemed to threaten to tear the fabric asunder; and still the
ship was immoveable.
She hangs hardest forward, sir, said Mr. Leach:
suppose we run up the stern-boat?
This expedient was adopted, and so nearly were the
counteracting powers balanced, that it prevailed. A strong
heave caused the ship to start, an inch more of tide aided
the effort, and then the vast hull slowly yielded to the
purchase
,
gradually turning towards the anchor, until the quick
blows of the pall announced that the vessel was fairly afloat
again.
Thank God for that, as for all his mercies! said
Captain
Truck. Heave the hussy up to her anchor, Mr.
Leach, when we will cast an eye to her moorings.
All this was done, the ship being effectually secured, with
due attention to a change in the wind, that now promised to
be permanent. Not a moment was lost; but, the sheers
being still standing, the foremast of the Dane was floated
alongside, fastened to, and hove into its new berth, with as
much rapidity as comported with care. When the mast was
fairly stepped, Captain Truck rubbed his hands with delight,
and immediately commanded his subordinate to rig it,
although by this time the turn of the day had considerably
passed.
This is the way with us seamen, Mr. Effingham, he
observed; from the fall to the fight, and then again from
the fight to the fall. Our work, like women's, is never
done; whereas you landsmen knock off with the sun, and
sleep while the corn grows. I have always owed my
parents
a grudge for bringing me up to a dog's life.
Vol. II.  13
I had understood it was a choice of your own,
captain
.
Ayso far as running away and shipping without their
knowledge was concerned, perhaps it was; but then it was
their business to begin at the bottom, and to train me up in
such a manner that I would not run away. The Lord
forgive
me, too, for thinking amiss of the two dear old
people
;
for, to be candid with you, they were much too good
to have such a son; and I honestly believe they loved me
more than I loved myself. Well, I've the consolation of
knowing I comforted the old lady with many a pound of
capital tea after I got into the China trade, ma'amselle.
She was fond of it? observed the governess politely.
She relished it very much, as a horse takes to oats, or a
child to custard. That, and snuff and grace, composed
her principal consolations.
Quoi?
demanded the governess, looking towards Paul
for an explanation.
Grace, mademoiselle; la grace de Dieu
.
Bien!
It's a sad misfortune, after all, to lose a mother,
ma'amselle
.
It is like cutting all the headfasts, and riding
altogether
by the stern; for it is letting go the hold of what
has gone before to grapple with the future. It is true that
I ran away from my mother when a youngster, and thought
little of it! but when she took her turn and ran away from
me, I began to feel that I had made a wrong use of my legs.
What are the tidings from poor Mr. Monday?
I understand he does not suffer greatly, but that he
grows weaker fast, returned Paul. I fear there is little
hope of his surviving such a hurt.
The captain had got out a cigar, and had beckoned to
Toast for a coal; but changing his mind suddenly, he broke
the tobacco into snuff, and scattered it about the deck.
Why the devil is not that rigging going up, Mr. Leach?
he cried, fiercely. It is not my intention to pass the
winter
at these moorings, and I solicit a little more
expedition
.
Ay, ay, sir, returned the mate, one of a class
habitually
patient and obedient; bear a hand, my lads, and get
the strings into their places.
Leach, continued the captain, more kindly, and still
working his fingers unconsciously, come this way, my
good friend. I have not expressed to you, Mr. Leach, all I
wish to say of your good conduct in this late affair. You
have stood by me like a gallant fellow throughout the whole
business, and I shall not hesitate about saying as much
when we get in. It is my intention to write a letter to the
owners, which no doubt they'll publish; for, whatever they
have got to say against America, no one will deny it is easy
to get any thing published. Publishing is victuals and
drink to the nation. You may depend on having justice
done you.
I never doubted it, Captain Truck.
No, sir; and you never winked. The mainmast does
not stand up in a gale firmer than you stood up to the
niggers.
Mr. Effingham, sirand Mr. Sharpand particularly
Mr. Blunt
Let me alone to deal with them. Even Toast acted like
a man. Well, Leach, they tell me poor Monday must slip,
after all.
I am very sorry to hear it, sir; Mr. Monday laid about
him like a soldier!
He did, indeed; but Bonaparte himself has been obliged
to give up the ghost, and Wellington must follow him some
day; even old Putnam is dead. Either you or I, or both of
us, Leach, will have to throw in some of the consolations
of religion on this mournful occasion.
There is Mr. Effingham, sir, or Mr. John Effingham;
elderly gentlemen with more scholarship.
That will never do. All they can offer, no doubt, will
be acceptable, but we owe a duty to the ship. The officers
of a packet are not graceless horse-jockeys, but sober,
discreet
men, and it becomes them to show that they have some
education, and the right sort of stuff in them on an
emergency. I expect you will stand by me, Leach, on this
melancholy occasion, as stoutly as you stood by me this
morning.
I humbly hope, sir, not to disgrace the vessel, but it is
likely Mr. Monday is a Church-of-England-man, and we
both belong to the Saybrook Platform!
Ah! the devil!I forgot that! But religion is religion;
old line or new line; and I question if a man so near
unmooring will be very particular. The great thing is
consolation
,
and that we must contrive to give him, by hook or
by crook, when the proper moment comes; and now, Mr.
Leach, let the people push matters, and we shall have
everything
up forward, and that mainmast stepped yet by `sunset;'
or it would be more literal to say `
sun-down;
'  Captain
Truck, like a true New-England-man, invariably using a
provincialism that has got to be so general in America.
The work proceeded with spirit, for every one was anxious
to get the ship out of a berth that was so critical, as well
from the constant vicinity of the Arabs as from the dangers
of the weather. The wind baffled too, as it is usual on the
margin of the trades, and at times it blew from the sea,
though it continued light, and the changes were of short
continuance. As Captain Truck hoped, when the people
ceased work at night, the fore and fore-top-sail-yards were
in their places, the top-gallant-mast was fitted, and, with the
exception of the sails, the ship was what is called a-tanto,
forward. Aft, less had been done, though by the assistance
of the supernumeraries, who continued to lend their aid, the
two lower masts were stepped, though no rigging could be
got over them. The men volunteered to work by watches
through the night, but to this Captain Truck would not
listen, affirming that they had earned their suppers and a
good rest, both of which they should have.
The gentlemen, who merely volunteered an occasional
drag, cheerfully took the look-outs, and as there were plenty
of fire-arms, though not much powder, little apprehension
was entertained of the Arabs. As was expected, the night
passed away tranquilly, and every one arose with the dawn
refreshed and strengthened.
The return of day, however, brought the Arabs down
upon the shore in crowds; for the last gale, which had been
unusually severe, and the tidings of the wrecks, which had
been spread by means of the dromedaries far and wide, had
collected a force on the coast that began to be formidable
through sheer numbers. The Dane had been effectually
emptied, and plunder had the same effect on these rapacious
barbarians that blood is known to produce on the tiger. The
taste had begotten an appetite, and from the first appearance
of the light, those in the ship saw signs of a disposition to
renew the attempt on their liberty.
Happily, the heaviest portion of the work was done, and
Captain Truck determined, rather than risk another conflict
with a force that was so much augmented, to get the spars
on board, and to take the ship outside of the reef, without
waiting to complete her equipment. His first orders,
therefore
,
when all hands were mustered, were for the boats to
get in the kedges and the stream anchor, and otherwise to
prepare to move the vessel. In the mean time other gangs
were busy in getting the rigging over the mast-heads, and in
setting it up. As the lifting of the anchors with boats was
heavy work, by the time they were got on board and stowed
it was noon, and all the yards were aloft, though not a sail
was bent in the vessel.
Captain Truck, while the people were eating, passed
through the ship examining every stay and shroud: there
were some make-shifts it is true, but on the whole he
was satisfied, though he plainly saw that the presence of the
Arabs had hurried matters a little, and that a good many
drags would have to be given as soon as they got beyond
danger, and that some attention must be paid to seizings;
still, what had been done would answer very well for
moderate
weather, and it was too late to stop to change.
The trade wind had returned, and blew steadily as if
finally likely to stand; and the water outside of the reef was
smooth enough to permit the required alterations, now that
the heavier spars were in their places.
The appearance of the Montauk certainly was not as
stately and commanding as before the wreck, but there was
an air of completeness about it that augured well. It was
that of a ship of seven hundred tons, fitted with spars
intended
for a ship of five hundred. The packet a little
resembled
a man of six feet, in the coat of a man of five feet
nine, and yet the discrepancy would not be apt to be noticed
by any but the initiated. Every thing essential was in its
place, and reasonably well secured, and, as the Dane had
been rigged for a stormy sea, Captain Truck felt satisfied he
13*
might, in his present plight, venture on the American coast
even in winter, without incurring unusual hazard.
As soon as the hour of work arrived, therefore, a boat
was sent to drop a kedge as near the inlet as it would be
safe to venture, and a little to windward of it. By making
a calculation, and inspecting his buoys, which still remained
where he had placed them, Captain Truck found that he
could get a narrow channel of sufficient directness to permit
the ship to be warped as far as this point in a straight line.
Every thing but the boats was now got on board, the anchor
by which they rode was hove up, and the warp was brought
to the capstan, when the vessel slowly began to advance
towards the inlet.
This movement was a signal to the Arabs, who poured
down on both reefs in hundreds, screaming and gesticulating
like maniacs. It required good nerves and some self-reliance
to advance in the face of such a danger, and this so much
the more, as the barbarians showed themselves in the greatest
force on the northern range of rocks, which offered a good
shelter for their persons, completely raked the channel, and,
moreover, lay so near the spot where the kedge had been
dropped, that one might have jerked a stone from the one to
the other. To add to the awkwardness of the affair, the
Arabs began to fire with those muskets that are of so little
service in close encounters, but which are notorious for
sending their shot with great precision from a distance. The
bullets came thick upon the ship, though the stoutness of the
bulwarks forward, and their height, as yet protected the men.
In this dilemma, Captain Truck hesitated about continuing
to haul ahead, and he sent for Mr. Blunt and Mr. Leach for
a consultation. Both these gentlemen advised perseverance,
and as the counsel of the former will succinctly show the
state of things, it shall be given in his own words.
Indecision is always discouraging to one's friends, and
encouraging to one's enemies, he said, and I recommend
perseverance. The nearer we haul to the rocks, the greater
will be our command of them, while the more the chances
of the Arabs' throwing their bullets on our decks will be
diminished
.
Indeed, so long as we ride head to wind, they
cannot fire low enough to effect their object from the
northern
reef, and on the southern they will not venture very near,
for want of cover. It is true it will be impossible for us to
bend our sails or to send out a boat in the face of so heavy
a fire, while our assailants are so effectually covered; but
we may possibly dislodge them with the gun, or with our
small-arms, from the decks. If not, I will head a party into
the tops, from which I will undertake to drive them out of
the reach of our muskets in five minutes.
Such a step would be very hazardous to those who
ventured
aloft.
It would not be without danger, and some loss must be
expected; but they who fight must expect risks.
In which case it will be the business of Mr. Leach and
myself to head the parties aloft. If we are obliged to
console
the dying, damn me, but we are entitled to the privilege
of fighting the living.
Ay, ay, sir, put in the mate; that stands to
reason
.
There are three tops, gentlemen, returned Paul, mildly,
and I respect your rights too much to wish to interfere
with them. We can each take one, and the effect will be in
proportion to the greater means we employ,one vigorous
assault being worth a dozen feints.
Captain Truck shook Paul heartily by the hand, and
adopted his advice. When the young man had retired, he
turned to the mate, and said
After all, these men-of-war's men are a little beyond
us in the science of attack and defence, though I think I
could give him a hint in the science of signs. I have had
two or three touches at privateering in my time, but no
regular
occupation in your broadside work. Did you see how
Mr. Blunt handled his boat yesterday? As much like two
double blocks and a steady drag, as one belaying-pin is like
another, and as coolly as a great lady in London looks at
one of us in a state of nature. For my part, Leach, I was
as hot as mustard, and ready to cut the throat of the best
friend I had on earth; whereas he was smiling as I rowed
past him, though I could hardly see his face for the smoke
of his own gun.
Yes, sir, that's the way with your regular builts. I'll
warrant you he began young, and had kicked all the passion
out of himself on old salts, by the time he was eighteen. He
doesn't seem, neither, like one of the true dn-my-eye breed;
but it's a great privilege to a man in a passion to be allowed
to kick when and whom he likes.
Not he. I say Leach, perhaps he might lend us a hand
when it comes to the pinch with poor Monday. I have a
great desire that the worthy fellow should take his departure
decently.
Well, sir, I think you had better propose it. For my
part, I'm quite willing to go into all three of the tops alone,
rather than disappoint a dying man.
The captain promised to look to the matter, and then
they turned their attention to the ship, which in a few more
minutes was up as near the kedge as it was prudent to haul
her.
CHAPTER XI.
Speed, gallant bark, the tornado is past;
Staunch and secure thou hast weather'd the blast;
Now spread thy full sails to the wings of the morn,
And soon the glad haven shall greet thy return.
Park
.
The
Montauk now lay close to the inlet, and even a little
to windward of its entrance; but the channel was crooked,
not a sail was bent, nor was it possible to bend one properly
without exposing the men to the muskets of the Arabs, who,
from firing loosely, had got to be more wary and deliberate,
aiming at the places where a head or an arm was
occasionally
seen. To prolong this state of things was merely to
increase the evil, and Captain Truck determined to make an
effort at once to dislodge his enemies.
With this view the gun was loaded in-board, filled nearly
to the muzzle with slugs, and then it was raised with care to
the top-gallant-forecastle, and cautiously pushed forward near
the gunwale. Had the barbarians understood the
construction
of a vessel, they might have destroyed half the packet's
crew while they were thus engaged about the forecastle by
firing through the planks; but, ignorant of the weakness of
the defences, they aimed altogether at the openings, or over
the rails.
By lowering the gaff the spanker was imperfectly bent;
that is to say, it was bent on the upper leach. The boom
was got in under cover of the hurricane-house, and of the
bundle of the sail; the out-hauler was bent, the boom replaced,
the sail being hoisted with a little and a hurried lacing to the
luff. This was not effected without a good deal of hazard,
though the nearness of the bows of the vessel to the rocks
prevented
most of the Arabs from perceiving what passed so far
aft. Still, others nearer to the shore caught glimpses of the
actors, and several narrow escapes were the consequence.
The second mate, in particular, had a shot through his hat
within an inch of his head. By a little management,
notwithstanding
,
the luff of the spanker was made to stand
tolerably well; and the ship had at least the benefit of this
one sail.
The Dane had been a seaman of the old school; and,
instead
of the more modern spenser, his ship had been fitted
with old-fashioned stay-sails. Of these it was possible to
bend the main and mizzen stay-sails in tolerable security,
provided
the ends of the halyards could be got down. As this,
however, would be nearly all aftersail, the captain
determined
to make an effort to overhaul the buntlines and
leachlines of the foresail, at the same time that men were
sent aloft after the ends of the halyards. He also thought
it possible to set a fore-topmast staysail flying.
No one was deceived in this matter. The danger and the
mode of operating were explained clearly, and then Captain
Truck asked for volunteers. These were instantly found;
Mr. Leach and the second mate setting the example by
stepping
forward as the first two. In order that the whole
procedure
may be understood, however, it shall be explained
more fully.
Two men were prepared to run up on the foreyard at the
word. Both of these, one of whom was Mr. Leach, carried
three small balls of marline, to the end of each of which
was attached a cod-hook, the barb being filed off in order
to prevent its being caught. By means of these hooks the
balls were fastened to the jackets of the adventurers. Two
others stood ready at the foot of the main and mizzen
riggings
.
By the gun lay Paul and three men; while several
of the passengers, and a few of the best shots among the
crew, were stationed on the forecastle, armed with muskets
and fowling-pieces.
Is everybody ready? called out the captain from the
quarter-deck.
All ready! and Ay! ay, sir! were answered from
the different points of the ship.
Haul out the spanker!
As soon as this sail was set, the stern of the ship swung
round towards the inlet, so as to turn the bow on which the
gun was placed towards the part of the reef where the Arabs
were in greatest numbers.
Be steady, men! and do not hurry yourselves, though
active as wild-cats! Up, and away!
The two fore-yard men, and the two by the after-masts,
sprang into the rigging like squirrels, and were running aloft
before the captain had done speaking.At the same instant
one of the three by the gun leaped on the bowsprit, and ran
out towards the stay. Paul, and the other two, rose and
shoved the gun to its berth; and the small-arms men showed
themselves at the rails.
So many, all in swift motion, appearing at the same
moment
in the rigging, distracted the attention of the Arabs for
an instant, though scattering shots were fired. Paul knew
that the danger would be greatest when the men aloft were
stationary, and he was in no haste. Perhaps for half a
minute he was busy in choosing his object, and in levelling
the gun, and then it was fired. He had chosen the moment
well; for Mr. Leach and his fellow adventurers were already
on the fore-yard, and the Arabs had arisen from their covers
in the eagerness of taking aim. The small-arms men poured
in their volley, and then little more could be done in the way
of the offensive, nearly all the powder in the ship having
been expended.
It remains to tell the result of this experiment.Among
the Arabs a few fell, and those most exposed to the fire from
the ship were staggered, losing near a minute in their
confusion
;
but those more remote maintained hot discharges
after the first surprise. The whole time occupied in what
we are going to relate was about three minutes; the action
of the several parts going on simultaneously.
The adventurer forward, though nearest to the enemy,
was least exposed. Partly covered by the bowsprit, he ran
nimbly out on that spar till he reached the stay. Here he
cut the stop of the fore-topmast halyards, overhauled the
running part, and let the block swing in. He then hooked
a block that he had carried out with him, and in which the
bight of a rope had been rove through the thimble, and ran
in as fast as possible. This duty, which had appeared the
most hazardous of all the different adventures, on account
of the proximity of the bowsprit to the reef, was the first
done, and with the least real risk; the man being partly
concealed by the smoke of the gun, as well as by the
bowsprit
.
He escaped uninjured.
As the two men aft pursued exactly the same course, the
movements of one will explain those of the other. On
reaching
the yard, the adventurer sprang on it, caught the hook
of the halyard-block, and threw himself off without an
instant's
hesitation, overhauling the halyards by his weight.
Men stood in readiness below to check the fall by easing off
the other end of the rope, and the hardy fellow reached the
deck in safety. This seemed a nervous undertaking to the
landsmen; but the seamen who so well understood the
machinery
of their vessel, made light of it.
On the fore-yard, Mr. Leach passed out on one yard-arm,
and his co-adventurer, a common seaman, on the other.
Each left a hook in the knot of the inner buntline, as he
went out, and dropped the ball of marline on deck. The
same was done at the outer buntlines, and at the leachlines.
Here the mate returned, according to his orders, leaped upon
the rigging, and thence upon a backstay, when he slid on
deck with a velocity that set aim at defiance.
Notwithstanding
the quickness of his motions, Mr. Leach received a
trifling hit on the shoulder, and several bullets whizzed near
him.
The seaman on the other yard-arm succeeded equally
well, escaping the smallest injury, until he had secured the
leachline, when, knowing the usefulness of obtaining it,
for he was on the weather side of the ship, he determined
to bring in the end of the reef-tackle with him. Calling
out to let go the rope on the deck, he ran out to the lift,
bent over and secured the desired end, and raised himself
erect, with the intention to make a run in, on the top of
the yard. Captain Truck and the second mate had both
commanded him to desist in vain, for impunity from harm
had rendered him fool-hardy. In this perilous position he
even paused to give a cheer. The cry was scarcely ended
when he sprang off the yard several feet upwards and fell
perpendicularly towards the sea, carrying the rope in his
hand. At first, most on board believed the man had jumped
into the water as the least hazardous means of getting
down, depending on the rope, and on swimming, for his
security; but Paul pointed out the spot of blood that
stained the surface of the sea, at the point where he had
fallen. The reef-tackle was rounded cautiously in, and its
end rose to the surface without the hand that had so lately
grasped it. The man himself never re-appeared.
Captain Truck had now the means of setting three
stay-sails
,
the spanker, and the fore-course; sails sufficient, he
thought, to answer his present purposes.The end of the
reef-tackle, that had been so dearly bought, was got in, by
means of a light line, which was thrown around it.
The order was now given to brail the spanker, and to
clap on and weigh the kedge, which was done by the run.
As soon as the ship was free of the bottom, the
fore-topmast-staysail
was set flying, like a jib-top-sail, by
hauling
out the tack, and swaying upon the halyards. The
sheet was hauled to windward, and the helm put down; of
course the bows of the ship began to fall off, and, as soon
as her head was sufficiently near her course, the sheet was
drawn, and the wheel shifted.
Captain Truck now ordered the foresail, which, by this
time was ready, to be set. This important sail was got on
the vessel, by bending the buntlines and leachlines to its
head, and by hauling out the weather-head-cringle by
means of the reef tackle. As soon as this broad spread of
canvas was on the ship, her motion was accelerated, and
she began to move away from the spot, followed by the
furious cries and menaces of the Arabs. To the latter no
one paid any heed, but they were audible until drowned in
distance. Although aided by all her spars, and the force
of the wind on her hull, a body as large as the Montauk
required some little time to overcome the
vis inerti
, and
several anxious minutes passed before she was so far from
the cover of the Arabs as to prevent their clamour from
seeming to be in the very ears of those on board. When
this did occur, it brought inexpressible relief, though it
perhaps
increased the danger, by increasing the chances of
the bullets hitting objects on deck.
The course at first was nearly before the wind, when
the flat rock, so often named, being reached, the ship was
compelled to haul up on an easy bowline, in order to pass
to windward of it. Here the staysails aft and the spanker
were set, which aided in bringing the vessel to the wind,
and the fore-tack was brought down. By laying straight
out of the pass, a distance of only a hundred yards, the
vessel would be again clear of every thing, and beyond all
the dangers of the coast, so long as the present breeze
stood. But the tide set the vessel bodily towards the rock,
and her condition did not admit of pressing hard upon a
bowline. Captain Truck was getting to be uneasy, for he
soon perceived that they were nearing the danger, though
very gradually, and he began to tremble for his copper.
Still the vessel drew steadily ahead, and he had hopes of
passing the outer edge of the rocks in safety. This outer
edge was a broken, ragged, and pointed fragment, that
would break in the planks should the vessel rest upon it
an instant, while falling in that constant heaving and
setting
of the ocean, which now began to be very sensibly
felt. After all his jeopardy, the old mariner saw that
his safety was at a serious hazard, by one of those
unforeseen
but common risks that environ the seaman's life.
Luff! luff! you can, cried Captain Truck, glancing
his eye from the rock to the sails, and from the sails to the
rock. Luff, siryou are at the pinch!
Vol. II.  14
Luff it is sir! answered the man at the wheel, who
stood abaft the hurricane-house, covered by its roof, over
which he was compelled to look, to get a view of the sails.
Luff I may, and luff it is, sir.
Paul stood at the captain's side, the crew being ordered
to keep themselves as much covered as possible, on account
of the bullets of the Arabs, which were at this time
pattering
against the vessel, like hail at the close of a storm.
We shall not weather that point of ragged rock,
exclaimed
the young man, quickly; and if we touch it the
ship will be lost.
Let her claw off, returned the old man sternly. Her
cutwater is up with it already. Let her claw off.
The bows of the ship were certainly up with the
danger
,
and the vessel was slowly drawing ahead; but every
moment its broadside was set nearer to the rock, which
was now within fifty feet of them. The fore-chains were
past the point, though little hope remained of clearing it
abaft. A ship turns on her centre of gravity as on a pivot,
the two ends inclining in opposite directions; and Captain
Truck hoped that as the bows were past the danger, it
might be possible to throw the after-part of the vessel up
to the wind, by keeping away, and thus clear the spot
entirely
.
Hard up with your helm! he shouted; hard up!
Haul down the mizzen-staysail, and give her sheet!
The sails were attended to, but no answer came from the
wheel, nor did the vessel change her course.
Hard up, I tell you, sirhard uphard up, and be
dd to you!
The usual reply was not made. Paul sprang through the
narrow gangway that led to the wheel. All that passed
took but a minute, and yet it was the most critical minute
that had yet befallen the Montauk; for had she touched
that rock but for an instant, human art could hardly have
kept her above water an hour.
Hard up, and be dd to you! repeated Captain
Truck, in a voice of thunder, as Paul darted round the
corner of the hurricane-house.
The seaman stood at the wheel, grasping its spokes
firmly, his eyes aloft as usual, but the turns of the tiller
rope showed that the order was not obeyed.
Hard up, man, hard up! are you mad? Paul
uttered
these words as he sprang to the wheel, which he made
whirl with his own hands in the required direction. As for
the seaman, he yielded his hold without resistance, and fell
like a log, as the wheel flew round. A ball had entered his
back, and passed through his heart, and yet he had stood
steadily to the spokes, as the true mariner always clings
to the helm while life lasts.
The bows of the ship fell heavily off, and her stern
pressed
up towards the wind; but the trifling delay so much
augmented
the risk, that nothing saved the vessel but the
formation
of the run and counter, which, by receding as usual,
allowed room to escape the dangerous point, as the Montauk
hove by on a swell.
Paul could not see the nearness of the escape, but the
purity
of the water permitted Captain Truck and his mates
to observe it with a distinctness that almost rendered them
breathless. Indeed there was an instant when the sharp
rock was hid beneath the counter, and each momentarily
expected to hear the grating of the fragment, as it
penetrated
the vessel's bottom.
Relieve that man at the wheel, and send him hither
this moment, said Captain Truck, in a calm stern voice,
that was more ominous than an oath.
The mate called a seaman, and passed aft himself to
execute
the order. In a minute he and Paul returned, bearing
the body of the dead mariner, when all was explained.
Lord, thy ways are unsearchable! muttered the old
master, uncovering himself, as the corpse was carried past,
and we are but as grains of seed, and as the vain
butterflies
in thy hand!
The rock once cleared, an open ocean lay to leeward
of the packet, and bringing the wind a little abaft the beam,
she moved steadily away from those rocks that had been
the witnesses of all her recent dangers. It was not long
before she was so distant that all danger from the Arabs
ceased. The barbarians, notwithstanding, continued a
dropping fire and furious gesticulations, long after their
hullets and menaces became matters of indifference to those
on board.
The body of the dead man was laid between the masts,
and the order was passed to bend the sails. As all was
ready, in half an hour the Montauk was standing off the
land under her three topsails, the reef now distant nearly a
league. The courses came next, when the top-gallant
yards were crossed and the sails set; the lighter canvas
followed, and some time before the sun disappeared, the
ship was under studding-sails, standing to the westward,
before the trades.
For the first time since he received the intelligence that
the Arabs were the masters of the ship, Captain Truck now
felt real relief. He was momentarily happy after the
combat
,
but new cares had pressed upon him so soon, that he
could scarcely be said to be tranquil. Matters were now
changed. His vessel was in good order, if not equipped for
racing, and, as he was in a low latitude, had the trade winds
to befriend him, and no longer entertained any apprehension
of his old enemy the Foam, he felt as if a mountain had
been removed from his breast.
Thank God, he observed to Paul, I shall sleep
to-night
without dreaming of Arabs or rocks, or scowling
faces at New York. They may say that another man
might have shown more skill in keeping clear of such a
scrape, but they will hardly say that another man could
have got out of it better. All this handsome outfit, too,
will cost the owners nothingliterally nothing; and I
question if the poor Dane will ever appear to claim the
sails and spars. I do not know that we are in possession
of them exactly according to the law of Africa, for of that
code I know little; or according to the law of nations, for
Vattel, I believe, has nothing on the subject; but we are in
possession so effectually, that, barring the nor'-westers on
the American coast, I feel pretty certain of keeping them
until we make the East River.
It might be better to bury the dead, said Paul; for
he knew Eve would scarcely appear on deck as long as the
body remained in sight. Seamen, you know, are
superstitious
on the subject of corpses.
I have thought of this, but hoped to cheat those two
rascals of sharks that are following in our wake, as if they
scented their food. It is an extraordinary thing, Mr. Blunt,
that these fish should know when there is a body in a
ship, and that they will follow it a hundred leagues to make
sure of their prey.
It would be extraordinary, if true; but in what manner
has the fact been ascertained?
You see the two rascally pirates astern? observed Mr.
Leach.
Very true; but we might also see them were there no
dead body about the ship. Sharks abound in this latitude,
and I have seen several about the reef since we went in.
They'll be disappointed as to poor Tom Smith, said
the mate, unless they dive deep for him. I have lashed
one of Napoleon's busts to the fine fellow's feet, and he'll
not fetch up until he's snugly anchored on the bottom.
This is a fitting hour for solemn feelings, said the
captain, gazing about him at the heavens and the gathering
gloom of twilight. Call all hands to bury the dead, Mr.
Leach. I confess I should feel easier myself as to the
weather, were the body fairly out of the ship.
While the mate went forward to muster the people, the
captain took Paul aside with a request that he would perform
the last offices for the deceased.
I will read a chapter in the Bible myself, he said;
for I should not like the people to see one of the crew go
overboard, and the officers have no word to say in the
ceremonies
;
it might beget disrespect, and throw a slur on our
knowledge; but you man-of-war's-men are generally more
regularly brought up to prayers than us liners, and if you
have a proper book by you, I should feel infinitely obliged
if you would give us a lift on this melancholy occasion.
Paul proposed that Mr. Effingham should be asked to
officiate, as he knew that gentleman read prayers in his
cabin, to his own party, night and morning.
Does he? said the captain; then he is my man, for
he must have his hand in, and there will be no stammering
or boggling. Ay, ay; he will fetch through on one tack.
Toast, go below, and present my compliments to Mr.
Effingham
,
14*
and say I should like to speak to him; and, harkee,
Toast, desire him to put a prayer-book in his pocket, and
then step into my state-room, and bring up the Bible you
will find under the pillow. The Arabs had a full chance at
the plunder; but there is something about the book that
always takes care of it. Few rogues, I've often remarked,
care about a Bible. They would sooner steal ten novels
than one copy of the sacred writ. This of mine was my
mother's, Mr. Blunt, and I should have been a better man
had I overhauled it oftener.
We pass over most of the arrangements, and come at
once to the service, and to the state of the ship, just as her
inmates were assembled on an occasion which no want of
formality can render any thing but solemn and admonitory.
The courses were hauled up, and the main-topsail had been
laid to the mast, a position in which a ship has always an
air of stately repose. The body was stretched on a plank
that lay across a rail, the leaden bust being enclosed in the
hammock that enveloped it. A spot of blood on the cloth
alone betrayed the nature of the death. Around the body
were grouped the crew, while Captain Truck and his mates
stood at the gangway. The passengers were collected on
the quarter-deck, with Mr. Effingham, holding a
prayer-book
,
a little in advance.
The sun had just dipped into the ocean, and the whole
western horizon was glorious with those soft, pearly,
rainbow
hues that adorn the evening and the morning of a low
latitude, during the soft weather of the autumnal months.
To the eastward, the low line of coast was just discernible
by the hillocks of sand, leaving the imagination to portray
its solitude and wastes. The sea in all other directions was
dark and gloomy, and the entire character of the sunset was
that of a grand picture of ocean magnificence and extent,
relieved by a sky in which the tints came and went like the
well-known colours of the dolphin; to this must be added
the gathering gloom of twilight.
Eve pressed the arm of John Effingham, and gazed with
admiration and awe at the imposing scene.
This is the seaman's grave! she whispered.
And worthy it is to be the tomb of so gallant a fellow.
The man died clinging to his post; and Powis tells me that
his hand was loosened from the wheel with difficulty.
They were silent, for Captain Truck uncovered himself,
as did all around him, placed his spectacles, and opened the
sacred volume. The old mariner was far from critical in his
selections of readings, and he usually chose some subject
that he thought would most interest his hearers, which were
ordinarily those that most interested himself. To him Bible
was Bible, and he now turned to the passage in the Acts of
the Apostles in which the voyage of St. Paul from Judea to
Rome is related. This he read with steadiness, some
quaintness
of pronunciation, and with a sort of breathing
elasticity
,
whenever he came to those verses that touched
particularly
on the navigation.
Paul maintained his perfect self-command during this
extraordinary
exhibition, but an unbidden smile lingered around
the handsome and chiseled mouth of Mr. Sharp. John
Effingham's curved face was sedate and composed, while the
females were too much impressed to exhibit any levity. As
to the crew, they listened in profound attention, occasionally
exchanging glances whenever any of the nautical expedients
struck them as being out of rule.
As soon as this edifying chapter was ended, Mr.
Effingham
commenced the solemn rites for the dead. At the first
sound of his voice, a calm fell on the vessel as if the Spirit
of God had alighted from the clouds, and a thrill passed
through the frames of the listeners. Those solemn words
of the Apostle commencing with I am the resurrection and
the life, saith the Lord, he that believeth in me, though he
were dead, yet he shall live: and whosoever liveth and
believeth
in me, he shall never die, could not have been better
delivered. The voice, intonation, utterance, and manner, of
Mr. Effingham, were eminently those of a gentleman;
without
pretension, quiet, simple, and mellow, while, on the other
hand, they were feeling, dignified, distinct, and measured.
When he pronounced the words I know that my
Redeemer
liveth, and that he shall stand at the latter day upon
the earth: and though, after my skin, worms destroy my
body, yet in my flesh shall I see God, &c. &c. the men
stared about them as if a real voice from heaven had made
the declaration, and Captain Truck looked aloft like one
expecting
a trumpet-blast. The tears of Eve began to flow as
she listened to the much-loved tones; and the stoutest heart
in that much-tried ship quailed. John Effingham made the
responses of the psalm steadily, and Mr. Sharp and Paul
soon joined him. But the profoundest effect was produced
when the office reached those consoling but startling words
from the Revelations, commencing with, I heard a voice
from Heaven saying unto me write, from henceforth blessed
are the dead who die in the Lord, &c. Captain Truck
afterwards
confessed that he thought he heard the very voice,
and the men actually pressed together in their alarm. The
plunge of the body was also a solemn instant. It went off
the end of the plank feet foremost, and, carried rapidly down
by the great weight of the lead, the water closed above it,
obliterating every trace of the seaman's grave. Eve thought
that its exit resembled the few brief hours that draw the veil
of oblivion around the mass of mortals when they disappear
from earth.
Instead of asking for the benediction at the close of the
ceremony, Mr. Effingham devoutly and calmly commenced
the psalm of thanksgiving for victory, If the Lord had not
been on our side, now may we say, if the Lord himself had
not been on our side, when men rose up against us, they
would have swallowed us up quick, when they were so
wrathfully displeased with us. Most of the gentlemen
joined in the responses, and the silvery voice of Eve sounded
sweet and holy amid the breathings of the ocean.
Te Deum
Laudamus
, We praise thee, O God! we acknowledge thee
to be the Lord! All the earth doth worship thee, the
Father everlasting; closed the offices, when Mr. Effingham
dismissed his congregation with the usual layman's request
for the benediction.
Captain Truck had never before been so deeply impressed
with any religious ceremony, and when it ceased he looked
wistfully over the side at the spot where the body had
fallen, or where it might be supposed to have fallenfor
the ship had drifted some distanceas one takes a last
look at the grave of a friend.
Shall we fill the main-topsail, sir? demanded Mr.
Leach, after waiting a minute or two in deference to his
commander's feelings; or shall we hook on the
yard-tackles
,
and stow the launch?
Not yet, Leach; not yet. It will be unkind to poor
Jack to hurry away from his grave so indecently. I have
observed that the people about the river always keep in
sight till the last sod is stowed, and the rubbish is cleared
away. The fine fellow stood to those spokes as a
close-reefed
topsail in a gale stands the surges of the wind, and
we owe him this little respect.
The boats, sir?
Let them tow awhile longer. It will seem like
deserting
him to be rattling the yard-tackles, and stowing boats
directly over his head. Your gran'ther was a priest, Leach,
and I wonder you don't see the impropriety of hurrying
away from a grave. A little reflection will hurt none of
us.
The mate admired at a mood so novel for his
commander
,
but he was fain to submit. The day was fast closing
notwithstanding
,
and the skies were losing their brilliancy in
hues that were still softer and more melancholy, as if
nature
delighted, too, in sympathizing with the feelings of these
lone mariners!
CHAPTER XII.
Sir, 'tis my occupation to be plain.
Lear
.
The
barbarians had done much less injury to the ship
and her contents than under the circumstances could have
been reasonably hoped. The fact that nothing could be
effectually landed where she lay was probably the cause,
the bales that had actually been got out of the ship, having
been put upon the bank with a view to lighten her, more
than for any other reason. The compact, too, between the
chiefs had its influence probably, though it could not have
lasted long with so strong temptations to violate it
constantly
before the eyes of men habitually rapacious.
Of course, one of the first things after each individual
had ascertained his own losses, was to inquire into those of
his neighbours, and the usual party in the ladies' cabin was
seated around the sofa of Eve, about nine in the evening,
conversing on this topic, after having held a short but
serious discourse on their recent escape.
You tell me, John, that Mr. Monday has a desire to
sleep? observed Mr. Effingham, in the manner in which
one puts an interrogation.
He is easier, and dozes. I have left my man with him,
with orders to summon me the instant he awakes.
A melancholy pause succeeded, and then the discourse
took the channel from which it had been diverted.
Is the extent of our losses in effects known? asked
Mr. Sharp. My man reports some trifling
deficit
, but
nothing of any value.
Your counterfeit, returned Eve, smiling, has been
the principal sufferer. One would think by his plaints, that
not a toy is left in Christendom.
So long as they have not stolen from him his good
name, I shall not complain, as I may have some use for it
when we reach America, of which now, God be praised!
there are some flattering prospects.
I understand from my connexions that the person who
is known in the main cabin as Sir George Templemore, is
not the person who is known as such in this, observed
John Effingham, bowing to Mr. Sharp, who returned his
salute as one acknowledges an informal introduction.
There are certainly weak men to be found in high
stations
all over the world, but you will probably think I am
doing honour to my own sagacity, when I say, that I
suspected
from the first that he was not the true Amphitryon.
I had heard of Sir George Templemore, and had been
taught to expect more in him than even a man of fashion
a man of the worldwhile this poor substitute can scarcely
lay claim to be either.
John Effingham so seldom complimented that his kind
words usually told, and Mr. Sharp acknowledged the
politeness
,
more gratified than he was probably willing to
acknowledge
to himself. The other could have heard of him
only from Eve and her father, and it was doubly grateful
to be spoken of favourably in such a quarter: he thought
there was a consciousness in the slight suffusion that
appeared
on the face of the daughter, which led him to hope
that even the latter had not considered him unworthy of
recollection; for he cared but little for the remembrances
of Mr. Effingham, if they could all be transferred to his
child.
This person, who does me the honour to relieve me
from the trouble of bearing my own name, he resumed,
cannot be of very lofty pretensions, or he would have
aspired
higher. I suspect him of being merely one of those
silly young countrymen of mine, of whom so many crowd
stage-coaches and packets, to swagger over their less
ambitious
fellow-mortals with the strut and exactions of the
hour.
And yet, apart from his folly in `sailing under false
colours,' as our worthy captain would call it, the man
seems well enough.
A folly, cousin Jack, said Eve with laughing eyes,
though she maintained a perfect demureness with her
beautiful
featuresthat he shares in common with so many
others!
Very true, though I suspect he has climbed to commit
it, while others have been content to descend. The man
himself behaved well yesterday, showing steadiness as well
as spirit in the fray.
I forgive him his usurpation for his conduct on that
occasion
,
returned Mr. Sharp, and wish with all my heart
the Arabs had discovered less affection for his curiosities. I
should think that they must find themselves embarrassed to
ascertain the uses of some of their prizes; such for instance,
as the button-hooks, the shoe-horn, knives with twenty
blades, and other objects that denote a profound civilization.
You have not spoken of your luck, Mr. Powis, added
Mr. Effingham; I trust you have fared as well as most
of us, though, had they visited their enemies according to
the injury received from them, you would be among the
heaviest of the sufferers.
My loss, replied Paul mournfully, is not much in
pecuniary value, though irreparable to me.
A look of concern betrayed the general interest, for as
he really seemed sad, there was a secret apprehension that
his loss even exceeded that which his words would give
them reason to suppose. Perceiving the curiosity that was
awakened, and which was only suppressed by politeness,
the young man added,
I miss a miniature that, to me, is of inestimable value.
Eve's heart throbbed, while her eyes sunk to the
carpet
.
The others seemed amazed, and after a brief pause,
Mr. Sharp observed
A painting on its own account would hardly possess
much value with such barbarians. Was the setting
valuable
?
It was of gold, of course, and had some merit in the
way of workmanship. It has probably been taken as
curious
rather than for its specific value; though to me, as I
have just said, the ship itself could scarcely be of more
account
certainly
not as much prized.
Many light articles have been merely mislaid; taken
away through curiosity or idleness, and left where the
individual
happened to be at the moment of changing his mind,
said John Effingham: several things of mine have been
scattered through the cabins in this manner, and I
understand
that divers vestments of the ladies have found their
way into the state-rooms of the other cabin; particularly a
night-cap of Mademoiselle Viefville's, that has been
discovered
in Captain Truck's room, and which that gallant
seaman has forthwith condemned as a lawful waif. As he
never uses such a device on his head, he will be compelled
to wear it next his heart. He will be compelled to convert
it into a
liberty
-cap.
Ciel!
if the excellent captain will carry us safe to New
York, coolly returned the governess, he shall have the
prize,
de tout mon cur; c'est un homme brave, et c'est
aussi un brave homme,  sa faon
.
Here are
two
hearts concerned in the affair already,
and no one can foresee the consequences; but, turning to
Paul, describe this miniature, if you please, for there are
many in the vessel, and yours is not the only one that has
been mislaid.
It was a miniature of a female, and one, too, I think,
that would be remarked for her beauty.
Eve felt a chill at her heart.
If, sir, it is the miniature of an elderly lady, said Ann
Sidley, perhaps it is this which I found in Miss Eve's
room, and which I intended to give to Captain Truck in
order
that it might reach the hands of its right owner.
Paul took the miniature, which he regarded coldly for a
moment, and then returned to the nurse.
Mine is the miniature of a female under twenty, he
said, colouring as he spoke; and is every way different
from this.
This was the painful and humiliating moment when Eve
Effingham was made to feel the extent and the nature of
the interest she took in Paul Powis. On all the previous
occasions in which her feelings had been strongly awakened
on his account, she had succeeded in deceiving herself as
to the motive, but now the truth was felt in that
overwhelming
form that no sensitive heart can distrust.
No one had seen the miniature, though all observed the
emotion with which Paul spoke of it, and all secretly
wondered
of whom it could be.
The Arabs appear to have some such taste for the fine
arts as distinguishes the population of a mushroom
American
city, said John Effingham; or one that runs to
portraits
,
which are admired while the novelty lasts, and then
are consigned to the first spot that offers to receive them.
Are
your
miniatures all safe, Eve? Mr. Effingham
inquired with interest; for among them was one of her
mother
that he had yielded to her only through strong
parental
affection, but which it would have given him deep
pain to discover was lost, though John Effingham, unknown
to him, possessed a copy.
It is with the jewellery in the baggage-room, dearest
father, and untouched of course. We are fortunate that
our passing wants did not extend beyond our comforts,
Vol. II.  15
and luckily they are not of a nature to be much prized by
barbarians. Coquetry and a ship have little in common,
and Mademoiselle Viefville and myself had not much out
to tempt the marauders.
As Eve uttered this, both the young men involuntarily
turned their eyes towards her, each thinking that a being
so fair stood less in need than common of the factitious aid
of ornaments. She was dressed in a dark French chintz,
that her maid had fitted to her person in a manner that it
would seem none but a French assistant can accomplish,
setting off her falling shoulders, finely moulded bust, and
slender-rounded waist, in a way to present a modest outline
of their perfection. The dress had that polished medium
between fashion and its exaggeration, that always denotes
a high association, and perhaps a cultivated mindcertainly
a cultivated tasteoffending neither usage on the one hand,
nor self-respect and a chaste appreciation of beauty on the
other. Indeed Eve was distinguished for that important
acquisition to a gentlewoman, an intellectual or refined
toilette; not intellect and refinement in extravagance and
caricature, but as they are displayed in fitness, simplicity,
elegance, and the proportions. This much, perhaps, she
owed to native taste, as the slight air of fashion, and the
high air of a gentlewoman, that were thrown about her
person and attire, were the fruits of an intimate connexion
with the best society of half the capitals of the European
continent. As an unmarried female, modesty, the habits
of the part of the world in which she had so long dwelt,
and her own sense of propriety, caused her to respect
simplicity
of appearance; but through this, as it might be in
spite of herself, shone qualities of a superior order. The
little hand and foot, so beautiful and delicate, the latter just
peeping from the dress under which it was usually
concealed
,
appeared as if formed expressly to adorn a taste
that was every way feminine and alluring.
It is one of the mysteries of the grand designs of
Providence
,
that men should exist in conditions so widely distant
from each other, said John Effingham abruptly, with a
common nature that can be so much varied by
circumstances
.
It is almost humiliating to find one's-self a man, when
beings like these Arabs are to be classed as fellows.
The most instructed and refined, cousin Jack, may get
a useful lesson, notwithstanding your disrelish for the
consanguinity
,
from this very identity of nature, said Eve,
who made a rally to overcome feelings that she deemed
girlish and weak. By showing us what we might be
ourselves
,
we get an admonition of humility; or by reflecting
on the difference that is made by education, does it not
strike you that there is an encouragement to persevere
until
better things are attained?
This globe is but a ball, and a ball, too, insignificant,
even when compared with the powers of man, continued
the other. How many navigators now circle it! even you,
sir, may have done this, young as you still are, turning
to Paul, who made a bow of assent: and yet, within these
narrow limits, what wonderful varieties of physical
appearance
,
civilization, laws, and even of colour, do we find, all
mixed up with points of startling affinity.
So far as a limited experience has enabled me to judge,
observed Paul, I have every where found, not only the
same nature, but a common innate sentiment of justice that
seems universal; for even amidst the wildest scenes of
violence
,
or of the most ungovernable outrages, this sentiment
glimmers through the more brutal features of the being.
The rights of property, for instance, are every where
acknowledged
;
the very wretch who steals whenever he can,
appearing conscious of his crime, by doing it clandestinely,
and as a deed that shuns observation. All seem to have
the same general notions of natural justice, and they are
forgotten only through the policy of systems, irresistible
temptation, the pressure of want, or the result of
contention
.
Yet, as a rule, man every where oppresses his weaker
fellow.
True; but he betrays consciousness of his error,
directly
or indirectly. One can show his sense of the
magnitude
of his crime even by the manner of defending it. As
respects our late enemies, I cannot say I felt any emotion
of animosity while the hottest engaged against them, for
their usages have rendered their proceedings lawful.
They tell me, interrupted Mr. Effingham, that it is
owing to your presence of mind and steadiness that more
blood was not shed unnecessarily.
It may be questioned, continued Paul, noticing this
compliment merely by an inclination of the head, if
civilized
people have not reasoned themselves, under the
influence
of interest, into the commission of deeds quite as much
opposed to natural justice as anything done by these
barbarians
.
Perhaps no nation is perfectly free from the just
imputation of having adopted some policy quite as
unjustifiable
in itself as the system of plunder maintained among
the Arabs.
Do you count the rights of hospitality as nothing?
Look at France, a nation distinguished for refinement,
among its rulers at least. It was but the other day that the
effects of the stranger who died in her territory were
appropriated
to the uses of a monarch wallowing in luxury.
Compare this law with the treaties that invited strangers to
repair to the country, and the wants of the monarch who
exhibited the rapacity, to the situation of the barbarians
from whom we have escaped, and the magnitude of the
temptation we offered, and it does not appear that the
advantage
is much with Christians. But the fate of
shipwrecked
mariners all over the world is notorious. In
countries
the most advanced in civilization they are plundered,
if there is an opportunity, and, at need, frequently
murdered
.
This is a frightful picture of humanity, said Eve
shuddering. I do not think that this charge can be justly
brought against America.
That is far from certain. America has many
advantages
to weaken the temptation to crime, but she is very
far from perfect. The people on some of her coasts have
been accused of resorting to the old English practice of
showing false lights, with a view to mislead vessels, and of
committing cruel depredations on the wrecked. In all
things I believe there is a disposition in man to make
misfortune
weigh heaviest on the unfortunate. Even the coffin
in which we inter a friend costs more than any other piece
of work of the same amount of labour and materials.
This is a gloomy picture of humanity, to be drawn by
one so young, Mr. Effingham mildly rejoined.
I think it true. All men do not exhibit their selfishness
and ferocity in the same way; but there are few who do
not exhibit both. As for America, Miss Effingham, she is
fast getting vices peculiar to herself and her system, and,
I think, vices which bid fair to bring her down, ere long, to
the common level, although I do not go quite so far in
describing
her demerits as some of the countrymen of
Mademoiselle
Viesville
have gone.
And what may that have been? asked the governess
eagerly, in English.
Pourrie avant d'tre mre. Mre
, America is certainly
far from being; but I am not disposed to accuse her yet of
being quite
pourrie
.
We had flattered ourselves, said Eve, a little
reproachfully
,
with having at last found a countryman in Mr.
Powis.
And how would that change the question? Or, do you
admit that an American can be no American, unless blind
to the faults of the country, however great?
Would it be generous for a child to turn upon a parent
that all others assail?
You put the case ingeniously, but scarcely with fairness.
It is the duty of the parent to educate and correct the child,
but it is the duty of the citizen to reform and improve the
character of his country. How can the latter be done, if
nothing but eulogies are dealt in? With foreigners, one
should not deal too freely with the faults of his country,
though even with the liberal among them one would wish
to be liberal, for foreigners cannot repair the evil; but with
one's countrymen I see little use and much danger, in
observing
a silence as to faults. The American, of all others,
it appears to me, should be the boldest in denouncing the
common and national vices, since he is one of those who,
by the institutions themselves, has the power to apply the
remedy.
But America is an exception, I think, or perhaps it
would be better to say I
feel
, since all other people deride
at, mock her, and dislike her. You will admit this yourself,
Sir George Templemore?
By no means: in England, now, I consider America to
be particularly well esteemed.
15*
Eve held up her pretty hands, and even Mademoiselle
Viesville
, usually so well-toned and self-restrained, gave a
visible shrug.
Sir George means in his county, drily observed John
Effingham.
Perhaps the parties would better understand each other,
said Paul, coolly, were Sir George Templemore to descend
to particulars. He belongs himself to the liberal school, and
may be considered a safe witness.
I shall be compelled to protest against a
cross-examination
on such a subject, returned the baronet, laughing.
You will be satisfied, I am certain, with my simple
declaration
.
Perhaps we still regard the Americans as
tant soit
peu
rebels; but that is a feeling that will soon cease.
That is precisely the point on which I think liberal
Englishmen usually do great justice to America, while it is
on other points that they betray a national dislike.
England believes America hostile to herself; and if love
creates love, dislike creates dislike.
This is at least something like admitting the truth of the
charge, Miss Effingham, said John Effingham, smiling,
and we may dismiss the accused. It is odd enough that
England should consider America as rebellious, as is the
case with many Englishmen, I acknowledge, while, in truth,
England herself was the rebel, and this, too, in connexion
with the very questions that produced the American
revolution
.
This is quite new, said Sir George, and I confess
some curiosity to see how it can be made out.
John Effingham did not hesitate about stating his case.
In the first place you are to forget professions and
names, he said, and to look only at facts and things.
When America was settled, a compact was made, either in
the way of charters or of organic laws, by which all the
colonies had distinct rights, while, on the other hand, they
confessed allegiance to the king. But in that age the English
monarch
was
a king. He used his veto on the laws, for
instance
,
and otherwise exercised his prerogatives. Of the two,
he influenced parliament more than parliament influenced
him. In such a state of things, countries separated by an
ocean might be supposed to be governed equitably, the
common
monarch feeling a common parental regard for all his
subjects. Perhaps distance might render him even more
tender of the interest of those who were not present to
protect
themselves.
This is putting the case loyally, at least, said Sir
George, as the other paused for a moment.
It is precisely in that light that I wish to present it. The
degree of power that parliament possessed over the colonies
was a disputed point; but I am willing to allow that
parliament
had all power.
In doing which, I fear, you will concede all the merits,
said Mr. Effingham.
I think not. Parliament then ruled the colonies
absolutely
and legally, if you please, under the Stuarts; but the
English rebelled against these Stuarts, dethroned them, and
gave the crown to an entirely new family,one with only
a remote alliance with the reigning branch. Not satisfied
with this, the king was curtailed in his authority; the prince,
who might with justice be supposed to feel a common
interest
in all his subjects, became a mere machine in the hands
of a body who represented little more than themselves, in
fact, or a mere fragment of the empire, even in theory;
transferring the control of the colonial interest from the
sovereign himself to a portion of his people, and that, too,
a small portion. This was no longer a government of a
prince who felt a parental concern for all his subjects, but a
government of a
clique
of his subjects, who felt a selfish
concern only for their own interests.
And did the Americans urge this reason for the revolt?
asked Sir George. It sounds new to me.
They quarrelled with the results, rather than with the
cause. When they found that legislation was to be chiefly
in the interests of England, they took the alarm, and seized
their arms, without stopping to analyse causes. They
probably
were mystified too much with names and professions
to see the real truth, though they got some noble glimpses
of it.
I have never before heard this case put so strongly,
cried Paul Powis, and yet I think it contains the whole
merit of the controversy as a principle.
It is extraordinary how nationality blinds us, observed
Sir George, laughing. I confess, Powis,the late events
had produced a close intimacy and a sincere regard between
these two fine young men,that I stand in need of an
explanation.
You can conceive of a monarch, continued John
Effingham
,
who possesses an extensive and efficient power?
Beyond doubt; nothing can be plainer than that.
Fancy this monarch to fall into the hands of a
fragment
of his subjects, who reduce his authority to a mere
profession, and begin to wield it for their own especial
benefit
,
no longer leaving him a free agent, though always
using the authority in his name.
Even that is easily imagined.
History is full of such instances. A part of the
subjects
,
unwilling to be the dupes of such a fraud, revolt
against the monarch in name, against the cabal in fact.
Now who are the real rebels? Profession is nothing.
Hyder
Ally never seated himself in the presence of the prince
he had deposed, though he held him captive during life.
But did not America acquiesce in the dethronement of
the Stuarts? asked Eve, in whom the love of the right was
stronger even than the love of country.
Beyond a doubt, though America neither foresaw nor
acquiesced in all the results. The English themselves,
probably, did not foresee the consequences of their own
revolution; for we now find England almost in arms against
the consequences of the very subversion of the kingly
power of which I have spoken. In England it placed a
portion of the higher classes in possession of authority, at
the expense of all the rest of the nation; whereas, as
respects
America, it set a remote people to rule over her,
instead of a prince, who had the same connexion with his
colonies as with all the rest of his subjects. The late
English
reform is a peaceable revolution; and America would
very gladly have done the same thing, could she have
extricated
herself from the consequences, by mere acts of
congress
.
The whole difference is, that America, pressed upon
by peculiar circumstances, preceded England in the revolt
about sixty years, and that this revolt was against an
usurper, and not against the legitimate monarch, or against
the sovereign himself.
I confess all this is novel to me, exclaimed Sir George.
I have told you, Sir George Templemore, that, if you
stay long enough in America, many novel ideas will suggest
themselves. You have too much sense to travel through the
country seeking for petty exceptions that may sustain your
aristocratical prejudices, or opinions, if you like that better;
but will be disposed to judge a nation, not according to
pre-conceived
notions, but according to visible facts.
They tell me there is a strong bias to aristocracy in
America; at least such is the report of most European
travellers
.
The report of men who do not reflect closely on the
meaning of words. That there are real aristocrats in opinion
in America is very true; there are also a few monarchists,
or those who fancy themselves monarchists.
Can a man be deceived on such a point?
Nothing is more easy. He who would set up a king
merely in name, for instance, is not a monarchist, but a
visionary, who confounds names with things.
I see you will not admit of a balance in the state.
I shall contend that there must be a preponderating
authority in every government, from which it derives its
character; and if this be not the king, that government is
not a real monarchy, let the laws be administered in whose
name they may. Calling an idol Jupiter does not convert it
into a god. I question if there be a real monarchist left in
the English empire at this very moment. They who make
the loudest professions that way strike me as being the
rankest aristocrats, and a real political aristocrat is, and
always has been, the most efficient enemy of kings.
But we consider loyalty to the prince as attachment to
the system.
That is another matter; for in that you may be right
enough, though it is ambiguous as to terms.
SirgentlemenMr. John Effingham, sir, interrupted
Saunders, Mr. Monday is awake, and so werry
conwales-cent
I
fear he will not live long. The ship herself is not
so much conwerted by these new spars as poor Mr. Monday
is conwerted since he went to sleep.
I feared this, observed John Effingham, rising.
Acquaint
Captain Truck with the fact, steward: he desired to
be sent for at any crisis.
He then quitted the cabin, leaving the rest of the party
wondering that they could have been already so lost to the
situation of one of their late companions, however different
from themselves he might be in opinions and character. But
in this they merely showed their common connexion with
all the rest of the great family of man, who uniformly
forget
sorrows that do not press too hard on self, in the
reaction
of their feelings.
CHAPTER XIII.
Watchman, what of the night? Watchman, what of the night?
Isaiah
.
The
principal hurt of Mr. Monday was one of those
wounds that usually produce death within eight-and-forty
hours. He had borne the pain with resolution; and, as yet,
had discovered no consciousness of the imminent danger
that was so apparent to all around him. But a film had
suddenly past from before his senses; and, a man of mere
habits, prejudices, and animal enjoyments, he had awakened
at the very termination of his brief existence to something
like a consciousness of his true position in the moral world,
as well as of his real physical condition. Under the first
impulse of such an alarm, John Effingham had been sent
for; and he, as has been seen, ordered Captain Truck to be
summoned. In consequence of the previous understanding,
these two gentlemen and Mr. Leach appeared at the
state-room
door at the same instant. The apartment being small,
it was arranged between them that the former should enter
first, having been expressly sent for; and that the others
should be introduced at the pleasure of the wounded man.
I have brought my Bible, Mr. Leach, said the captain
when he and the mate were left alone, for a chapter is
the very least we can give a cabin-passenger, though I am
a little at a loss to know what particular passage will be
the most suitable for the occasion. Something from the
book of Kings would be likely to suit Mr. Monday, as he is
a thorough-going king's man.
It is so long since I read that particular book, sir,
returned the mate, diligently thumbing his watch-key, that
I should be diffident about expressing an opinion. I think,
however, a little Bible might do him good.
It is not an easy matter to hit a conscience exactly
between
wind and water. I once thought of producing an
impression on the ship's company by reading the account
of Jonah and the whale as a subject likely to attract their
attention, and to show them the hazards we seamen run;
but, in the end, I discovered that the narration struck them
all aback as a thing not likely to be true. Jack can stand
any thing but a fish story, you know, Leach.
It is always better to keep clear of miracles at sea, I
believe, sir, when the people are to be spoken to: I saw
some of the men this evening wince about that ship of St.
Paul's carrying out anchors in a gale.
The graceless rascals ought to be thankful they are not
at this very moment trotting through the great desert lashed
to dromedaries' tails! Had I known that, Leach, I would
have read the verse twice! But Mr. Monday is altogether
a different man, and will listen to reason. There is the
story of Absalom, which is quite interesting; and perhaps
the account of the battle might be suitable for one who dies
in consequence of a battle; but, on the whole, I remember
my worthy old father used to say that a sinner ought to be
well shaken up at such a moment.
I fancy, sir, Mr. Monday has been a reasonably steady
man as the world goes. Seeing that he is a passenger, I
should try and ease him off handsomely, and without any
of these Methodist surges.
You may be right, Leach, you may be right; do as
you would be done by is the golden rule after all. But,
here comes Mr. John Effingham; so I fancy we may
enter.
The captain was not mistaken, for Mr. Monday had just
taken a restorative, and had expressed a desire to see the
two officers. The state-room was a small, neat, and even
beautifully finished apartment, about seven feet square. It
had originally been fitted with two berths; but, previously
to taking possession of the place, John Effingham had
caused the carpenter to remove the upper, and Mr. Monday
now lay in what had been the lower bed. This situation
placed him below his attendant, and in a position where he
might be the more easily assisted. A shaded lamp lighted
the room, by means of which the captain caught the anxious
expression of the dying man's eye, as he took a seat himself.
I am grieved to see you in this state, Mr. Monday,
said the master, and this all the more since it has
happened
in consequence of your bravery in fighting to regain
my ship. By rights this accident ought to have befallen
one of the Montauk's people, or Mr. Leach, here, or even
myself, before it befel you.
Mr. Monday looked at the speaker as if the intended
consolation
had failed of its effect, and the captain began to
suspect
that he should find a difficult subject for his new
ministrations. By way of gaining time, he thrust an elbow
into the mate's side as a hint that it was now his turn to
offer
something.
It might have been worse, Mr. Monday, observed Leach,
shifting his attitude like a man whose moral and physical
action moved
pari passu:
it might have been much worse.
I once saw a man shot in the under jaw, and he lived a
fortnight
without any sort of nourishment!
Still Mr. Monday gazed at the mate as if he thought
matters
could not be much worse.
That
was
a hard case, put in the captain; why, the
poor fellow had no opportunity to recover without victuals.
No, sir, nor any drink. He never swallowed a
mouthful
of liquor of any sort from the time he was hit, until he
took the plunge when we threw him overboard.
Perhaps there is truth in the saying that misery loves
company, for the eye of Mr. Monday turned towards the
table on which the bottle of cordial still stood, and from
which John Effingham had just before helped him to a
swallow
,
under the impression that it was of no moment what he
took. The captain understood the appeal, and influenced by
the same opinion concerning the hopelessness of the patient's
condition, besides being kindly anxious to console him, he
poured out a small glass, all of which he permitted the other
to drink. The effect was instantaneous, for it would seem
this treacherous friend is ever to produce a momentary
pleasure
as a poor compensation for its lasting pains.
I don't feel so bad, gentlemen, returned the wounded
man with a force of voice that startled his visitors. I feel
better  much better, and am very glad to see you. Captain
Truck, I have the honour to drink your health.
The captain looked at the mate as if he thought their visit
was twenty-four hours too soon, for live, all felt sure, Mr.
Monday could not. But Leach, better placed to observe the
countenance of the patient, whispered his commander that
it was merely a a catspaw, and will not stand.
I am very glad to see you both, gentlemen, continued
Mr. Monday, and beg you to help yourselves.
The captain changed his tactics. Finding his patient so
strong and cheerful, he thought consolation would be more
easily received just at that moment, than it might be even
half an hour later.
We are all mortal, Mr. Monday
Yes, sir; all very mortal.
And even the strongest and boldest ought occasionally
to think of their end.
Quite true, sir; quite true. The strongest and boldest.
When do you think we shall get in, gentlemen?
Captain Truck afterwards affirmed that he was never
before taken so flat aback by a question as by this. Still
he extricated himself from the dilemma with dexterity, the
spirit of proselytism apparently arising within him in
proportion
as the other manifested indifference to his offices.
There is a port to which we are all steering, my dear
sir, he said; and of which we ought always to bear in
mind the landmarks and beacons, and that port is Heaven.
Yes, added Mr. Leach, a port that, sooner or latter,
will fetch us all up.
Mr. Monday gazed from one to the other, and something
Vol. II.  16
like the state of feeling, from which he had been aroused by
the cordial, began to return.
Do you think me so bad, gentlemen? he inquired, with
a little of the eagerness of a startled man.
As bad as one bound direct to so good a place as I hope
and trust is the case with you, can be, returned the
captain
,
determined to follow up the advantage he had gained.
Your wound, we fear, is mortal, and people seldom remain
long in this wicked world with such sort of hurts.
If he stands that, thought the captain, I shall turn
him over, at once, to Mr. Effingham.
Mr. Monday did not stand it. The illusion produced by
the liquor, although the latter still sustained his pulses, had
begun to evaporate, and the melancholy truth resumed its
power.
I believe, indeed, that I am near my end, gentlemen,
he said faintly; and am thankfulforfor this
consolation
.
Now will be a good time to throw in the chapter,
whispered Leach; he seems quite conscious, and very
contrite.
Captain Truck, in pure despair, and conscious of his own
want of judgment, had determined to leave the question of
the selection of this chapter to be decided by chance.
Perhaps
a little of that mysterious dependence on Providence,
which renders all men more or less superstitious, influenced
him; and that he hoped a wisdom surpassing his own might
direct him to a choice. Fortunately, the book of Psalms is
near the middle of the sacred volume, and a better
disposition
of this sublime repository of pious praise and spiritual
wisdom could not have been made; for the chance-directed
peruser of the Bible will perhaps oftener open among its
pages than at any other place.
If we should say that Mr. Monday felt any very profound
spiritual relief from the reading of Captain Truck, we should
both overrate the manner of the honest sailor, and the intel
ligence of the dying man. Still the solemn language of
praise and admonition had an effect, and, for the first time
since childhood, the soul of the latter was moved. God and
judgment passed before his imagination, and he gasped for
breath in a way that induced the two seamen to suppose the
fatal moment had come, even sooner than they expected.
The cold sweat stood upon the forehead of the patient, and
his eyes glared wildly from one to the other. The
paroxysm
,
however, was transient, and he soon settled down
into a state of comparative calmness, pushing away the glass
that Captain Truck offered, in mistaken kindness, with a
manner of loathing.
We must comfort him, Leach, whispered the captain;
for I see he is fetching up in the old way, as was duly
laid down by our ancestors in the platform. First,
groanings
and views of the devil, and then consolation and hope.
We have got him into the first category, and we ought now,
in justice, to bring-to, and heave a strain to help him
through it.
They generally give 'em prayer, in the river, in this
stage of the attack, said Leach. If you can remember
a short prayer, sir, it might ease him off.
Captain Truck and his mate, notwithstanding the
quaintness
of their thoughts and language, were themselves
solemnly
impressed with the scene, and actuated by the kindest
motives. Nothing of levity mingled with their notions, but
they felt the responsibility of officers of a packet, besides
entertaining
a generous interest in the fate of a stranger who
had fallen, fighting manfully at their side. The old man
looked awkwardly about him, turned the key of the door,
wiped his eyes, gazed wistfully at the patient, gave his mate
a nudge with his elbow to follow his example, and knelt
down with a heart momentarily as devout as is often the
case with those who minister at the altar. He retained the
words of the Lord's prayer, and these he repeated aloud,
distinctly, and with fervour, though not with a literal
conformity
to the text. Once Mr. Leach had to help him to
the word. When he rose, the perspiration stood on his
forehead, as if he had been engaged in severe toil.
Perhaps nothing could have occurred more likely to
strike the imagination of Mr. Monday than to see one, of
the known character and habits of Captain Truck, thus
wrestling with the Lord in his own behalf. Always obtuse
and dull of thought, the first impression was that of
wonder
;
awe and contrition followed. Even the mate was
touched, and he afterwards told his companion on deck,
that the hardest day's work he had ever done, was
lending
a hand to rouse the captain through that prayer.
I thank you, sir, gasped Mr. Monday, I thank you
Mr. John Effinghamnow, let me see Mr. John
Effingham
.
I have no time to lose, and wish to see
him
.
The captain rose to comply, with the feelings of a man
who had done his duty, and, from that moment, he had a
secret satisfaction at having so manfully acquitted himself.
Indeed, it has been remarked by those who have listened
to his whole narrative of the passage, that he invariably
lays more stress on the scene in the state-room, than on
the readiness and skill with which he repaired the damages
sustained by his own ship, through the means obtained
from the Dane, or the spirit with which he retook her from
the Arabs.
John Effingham appeared in the state-room, where the
captain and Mr. Leach left him alone with the patient.
Like all strong-minded men, who are conscious of their
superiority over the rest of their fellow creatures, this
gentleman
felt disposed to concede most to those who were
the least able to contend with him. Habitually sarcastic
and stern, and sometimes forbidding, he was now mild and
discreet. He saw, at a glance, that Mr. Monday's mind
was alive to novel feelings, and aware that the approach of
death frequently removes moral clouds that have concealed
the powers of the spirit while the animal part of the being
was in full vigour, he was surprised at observing the
sudden
change that was so apparent in the countenance of the
dying man.
I believe, sir, I have been a great sinner, commenced
Mr. Monday, who spoke more feebly as the influence of
the cordial evaporated, and in short and broken sentences.
In that you share the lot of all, returned John
Effingham
.
We are taught that no man of himself, no unaided
soul, is competent to its own salvation. Christians look to
the Redeemer for succour.
I believe I understand you, but I am a business man,
sir, and have been taught that reparation is the best
atonement
for a wrong.
It certainly should be the
first
.
Yes, indeed it should, sir. I am but the son of poor
parents, and may have been tempted to some things that
are improper. My mother, too, I was her only support.
Well, the Lord will pardon it, if it were wrong, as I dare
say it might have been. I think I should have drunk less
and thought more, but for this affairperhaps it is not yet
too late.
John Effingham listened with surprise, but with the
coolness
and sagacity that marked his character. He saw the
necessity, or at least the prudence, of there being another
witness present. Taking advantage of the exhaustion of
the speaker, he stepped to the door of Eve's cabin, and
signed Paul to follow him. They entered the state-room
together, when John Effingham took Mr. Monday
soothingly
by the hand, offering him a nourishment less exciting
than the cordial, but which had the effect to revive him.
I understand you, sir, continued Mr. Monday,
looking
at Paul; it is all very proper; but I have little to
saythe papers will explain it all. Those keys, sirthe
upper drawer of the bureau, and the red morocco case
take it allthis is the key. I have kept everything
together
,
from a misgiving that an hour would come. In
New York you will have timeit is not yet too late.
As the wounded man spoke at intervals, and with
difficulty
,
John Effingham had complied with his directions
before he ceased. He found the red morocco case, took the
key from the ring, and showed both to Mr. Monday, who
smiled and nodded approbation. The bureau contained
paper, wax, and all the other appliances of writing. John
Effingham inclosed the case in a strong envelope, and affixed
to it three seals, which he impressed with his own arms;
he then asked Paul for his watch, that the same might be
done with the seal of his companion. After this precaution,
he wrote a brief declaration that the contents had been
delivered
to the two, for the purpose of examination, and for
the benefit of the parties concerned, whoever they might be,
and signed it. Paul did the same, and the paper was handed
to Mr. Monday, who had still strength to add his own
signature
.
16*
Men do not usually trifle at such moments, said John
Effingham, and this case may contain matter of moment
to wronged and innocent persons. The world little knows
the extent of the enormities that are thus committed. Take
the case, Mr. Powis, and lock it up with your effects, until
the moment for the examination shall come.
Mr. Monday was certainly much relieved after this
consignment
of the case into safe hands, trifles satisfying the
compunctions of the obtuse. For more than an hour he
slumbered. During this interval of rest, Captain Truck
appeared at the door of the state-room to inquire into the
condition of the patient, and, hearing a report so favourable,
in common with all whose duty did not require them to
watch, he retired to rest. Paul had also returned, and
offered his services, as indeed did most of the gentlemen;
but John Effingham dismissed his own servant even, and
declared it was his intention not to quit the place that night.
Mr. Monday had reposed confidence in him, appeared to be
gratified by his attentions and presence, and he felt it to be
a sort of duty, under such circumstances, not to desert a
fellow-creature in his extremity. Anything beyond some
slight alleviation of the sufferer's pains was hopeless; but
this, he rightly believed, he was as capable of administering
as another.
Death is appalling to those of the most iron nerves, when
it comes quietly and in the stillness and solitude of night.
John Effingham was such a man; but he felt all the
peculiarity
of his situation as he sat alone in the state-room by
the side of Mr. Monday, listening to the washing of the
waters that the ship shoved aside, and to the unquiet
breathing
of his patient. Several times he felt a disposition to
steal away for a few minutes, and to refresh himself by
exercise in the pure air of the ocean; but as often was the
inclination checked by jealous glances from the glazed eye
of the dying man, who appeared to cherish his presence as
his own last hope of life. When John Effingham wetted
the feverish lips, the look he received spoke of gratitude
and thanks, and once or twice these feelings were audible
in whispers. He could not desert a being so helpless, so
dependent; and, although conscious that he was of no
material
service beyond sustaining his patient by his presence,
he felt that this was sufficient to exact much heavier
sacrifices
.
During one of the troubled slumbers of the dying man,
his attendant sat watching the struggles of his countenance,
which seemed to betray the workings of the soul that was
about to quit its tenement, and he mused on the character
and fate of the being whose departure for the world of
spirits he himself was so singularly called on to witness!
Of his origin I know nothing, thought John Effingham,
except by his own passing declarations, and the evident
fact that, as regards station, it can scarcely have reached
mediocrity. He is one of those who appear to live for the
most vulgar motives that are admissible among men of any
culture, and whose refinement, such as it is, is purely of the
conventional class of habits. Ignorant, beyond the current
opinions of a set; prejudiced in all that relates to nations,
religions, and characters; wily, with an air of blustering
honesty; credulous and intolerant; bold in denunciations
and critical remarks, without a spark of discrimination, or
any knowledge but that which has been acquired under a
designing dictation; as incapable of generalizing as he is
obstinate in trifles; good-humoured by nature, and yet
querulous from imitation:for what purposes was such a
creature brought into existence to be hurried out of it in
this eventful manner? The conversation of the evening
recurred to John Effingham, and he inwardly said, If
there exist such varieties of the human race among nations,
there are certainly as many species, in a moral sense, in
civilized life itself. This man has his counterpart in a
particular feature in the every-day American absorbed in
the pursuit of gain; and yet how widely different are the
two in the minor points of character! While the other
allows himself no rest, no relaxation, no mitigation of the
eternal gnawing of the vulture rapacity, this man has made
self-indulgence the constant companion of his toil; while
the other has centered all his pleasures in gain, this
Englishman
,
with the same object in view, but obedient to national
usages, has fancied he has been alleviating his labours by
sensual enjoyments. In what will their ends differ? From
the eyes of the American the veil will be torn aside when
it is too late, perhaps, and the object of his earthly pursuit
will be made the instrument of his punishment, as he sees
himself compelled to quit it all for the dark uncertainty of
the grave; while the blusterer and the bottle-companion
sinks into a forced and appalled repentance, as the animal
that has hitherto upheld him loses its ascendency.
A groan from Mr. Monday, who now opened his glassy
eyes, interrupted these musings. The patient signed for the
nourishment, and he revived a little.
What is the day of the week? he asked, with an
anxiety that surprised his kind attendant.
It is, or rather it
was
, Monday; for we are now past
midnight.
I am glad of it, sirvery glad of it.
Why should the day of the week be of consequence to
you now?
There is a saying, sirI have faith in sayingsthey
told me I was born of a Monday, and should die of a
Monday
.
The other was shocked at this evidence of a lingering
and abject superstition in one who could not probably
survive
many hours, and he spoke to him of the Saviour, and
of his mediation for man. All this could John Effingham
do at need; and he could do it well, too, for few had clearer
perceptions of this state of probation than himself. His
weak point was in the pride and strength of his character;
qualities that indisposed him in his own practice to rely on
any but himself, under the very circumstances which would
impress on others the necessity of relying solely on God.
The dying man heard him attentively, and the words made
a momentary impression.
I do not wish to die, sir, Mr. Monday said suddenly,
after a long pause.
It is the general fate; when the moment arrives, we
ought to prepare ourselves to meet it.
I am no coward, Mr. Effingham.
In one sense I know you are not, for I have seen you
proved. I hope you will not be one in any sense. You
are now in a situation in which manhood will avail you
nothing
:
your dependence should be placed altogether on
God.
I know it, sirI try to feel thus; but I do not wish to
die.
The love of Christ is illimitable, said John Effingham,
powerfully affected by the other's hopeless misery.
I know itI hope itI wish to believe it. Have
you
a
mother, Mr. Effingham?
She has been dead many years.
A wife?
John Effingham gasped for breath, and one might have
mistaken him, at the moment, for the sufferer.
None: I am without parent, brother, sister, wife, or
child. My nearest relatives are in this ship.
I am of little value; but, such as I am, my mother will
miss me. We can have but one mother, sir.
This is very true. If you have any commission or
message for your mother, Mr. Monday, I shall have great
satisfaction in attending to your wishes.
I thank you, sir; I know of none. She has her notions
on religion, andI think it would lessen her sorrow to hear
that I had a Christian burial.
Set your heart at rest on that subject: all that our
situation
will allow, shall be done.
Of what account will it all be, Mr. Effingham? I wish
I had drunk less, and thought more.
John Effingham could say nothing to a compunction that
was so necessary, though so tardy.
I fear we think too little of this moment in our health
and strength, sir.
The greater the necessity, Mr. Monday, of turning our
thoughts towards that divine mediation which alone can avail
us, while there is yet opportunity.
But Mr. Monday was startled by the near approach of
death, rather than repentant. He had indurated his feelings
by the long and continued practice of a deadening
self-in-dulgence
,
and he was now like a man who unexpectedly
finds himself in the presence of an imminent and
overwhelming
danger, without any visible means of mitigation or
escape
.
He groaned and looked around him, as if he sought
something to cling to, the spirit he had shown in the pride
of his strength availing nothing. All these, however, were
but passing emotions, and the natural obtusity of the man
returned.
I do not think, sir, he said, gazing intently at John
Effingham, that I have been a very great sinner.
I hope not, my good friend; yet none of us are so free
from spot as not to require the aid of God to fit us for his
holy presence.
Very true, sirvery true, sir. I was duly baptized and
properly confirmed.
Offices which are but pledges that we are expected to
redeem.
By a regular priest and bishop, sir;orthodox and
dignified
clergymen!
No doubt: England wants none of the forms of religion.
But the contrite heart, Mr. Monday, will be sure to meet
with mercy.
I feel contrite, sir; very contrite.
A pause of half an hour succeeded, and John Effingham
thought at first that his patient had again slumbered; but,
looking more closely at his situation, he perceived that his
eyes often opened and wandered over objects near him.
Unwilling
to disturb this apparent tranquillity, the minutes were
permitted to pass away uninterrupted, until Mr. Monday
spoke again of his own accord.
Mr. EffinghamsirMr. Effingham, said the dying
man.
I am near you, Mr. Monday, and will not leave the
room.
Bless you, bless you, do not
you
desert me!
I shall remain: set your heart at rest, and let me know
your wants.
I want life, sir!
That is the gift of God, and its possession depends
solely on his pleasure. Ask pardon for your sins, and
remember
the mercy and love of the blessed Redeemer.
I try, sir. I do not think I have been a
very
great
sinner
.
I hope not: but God can pardon the penitent, however
great their offences.
Yes, sir, I know itI know it. This affair has been
so unexpected. I have even been at the communion-table,
sir: yes, my mother made me commune. Nothing was
neglected
,
sir.
John Effingham was often proud and self-willed in his
communications with men, the inferiority of most of his
fellow-creatures
to himself, in principles as well as mind, being
too plainly apparent not to influence the opinions of one who
did not not too closely study his own failings; but, as
respects
God, he was habitually reverent and meek. Spiritual
pride formed no part of his character, for he felt his own
deficiency in the Christian qualities, the main defect arising
more from a habit of regarding the infirmities of others than
from dwelling too much on his own merits. In comparing
himself with perfection, no one could be more humble; but
in limiting the comparison to those around him, few were
prouder, or few more justly so, were it permitted to make
such a comparison at all. Prayer with him was not habitual,
or always well ordered, but he was not ashamed to pray;
and when he did bow down his spirit in this manner, it was
with the force, comprehensiveness, and energy of his
character
.
He was now moved by the feeble and
common-place
consolations that Mr. Monday endeavoured to extract
from his situation. He saw the peculiarly deluding and
cruel substitution of forms for the substance of piety that
distinguishes the policy of all established churches, though,
unlike many of his own countrymen, his mind was superior
to those narrow exaggerations that, on the other hand, too
often convert innocence into sin, and puff up the votary with
the conceit of a sectarian and his self-righteousness.
I will pray with you, Mr. Monday, he said, kneeling at
the side of the dying man's bed: we will ask mercy of God
together, and he may lessen these doubts.
Mr. Monday made a sign of eager assent, and John
Effingham
prayed in a voice that was distinctly audible to the
other. The petition was short, beautiful, and even lofty
in language, without a particle of Scripture jargon, or of
the cant of professed devotees; but it was a fervent, direct,
comprehensive, and humble appeal to the Deity for mercy
on the being who now found himself in extremity. A child
might have understood it, while the heart of a man would
have melted with its affecting and meek sincerity. It is to
be hoped that the Great Being, whose Spirit pervades the
universe, and whose clemency is commensurate with his
power, also admitted the force of the petition, for Mr.
Monday
smiled with pleasure when John Effingham arose.
Thank you, sira thousand thanks, muttered the
dying
man, pressing the hand of the other. This is better
than all.
After this Mr. Monday was easier, and hours passed away
in nearly a continued silence. John Effingham was now
convinced that his patient slumbered, and he allowed himself
to fall into a doze. It was after the morning watch was
called, that he was aroused by a movement in the berth.
Believing
his patient required nourishment, or some fluid to
moisten his lips, John Effingham offered both, but they were
declined. Mr. Monday had clasped his hands on his breast,
with the fingers uppermost, as painters and sculptors are apt
to delineate them when they represent saints in the act of
addressing the Deity, and his lips moved, though the words
were whispered. John Effingham kneeled, and placed his
ear so close as to catch the sounds. His patient was uttering
the simple but beautiful petition transmitted by Christ
himself
to man, as the model of all prayer.
As soon as the other had done, John Effingham repeated
the same prayer fervently and aloud himself, and when he
opened his eyes, after this solemn homage to God, Mr.
Monday
was dead.
CHAPTER XIV.
Let me alone:dost thou use to write
Thy name? or hast thou a mark to thyself, like an
Honest, plain-dealing man?
Jack Cade
.
At
a later hour, the body of the deceased was consigned
to the ocean with the forms that had been observed the
previous
night at the burial of the seaman. These two
ceremonies
were sad remembrancers of the scene the travellers
had passed through; and, for many days, the melancholy
that they naturally excited pervaded the ship. But, as no
one connected by blood with any of the living had fallen,
and it is not the disposition of men to mourn always, this
feeling gradually subsided, and at the end of three weeks
the deaths had lost most of their influence, or were recalled
only at moments by those who thought it wise to dwell on
such solemn subjects.
Captain Truck had regained his spirits; for, if he felt
mortified at the extraordinary difficulties and dangers that
had befallen his ship, he also felt proud of the manner in
which he had extricated himself from them. As for the
mates and crew, they had already returned to their
ordinary
habits of toil and fun, the accidents of life making but
brief and superficial impressions on natures accustomed to
vicissitudes and losses.
Mr. Dodge appeared to be nearly forgotten during the
first week after the ship succeeded in effecting her escape;
for he had the sagacity to keep himself in the back-ground,
in the hope that all connected with himself might be
overlooked
in the hurry and excitement of events. At the end
of that period, however, he resumed his intrigues, and was
soon actively engaged in endeavouring to get up a public
opinion, by means of which he proposed to himself to
obtain
some reputation for spirit and courage. With what
success this deeply-laid scheme was likely to meet, as well
as the more familiar condition of the cabins, may be
gathered
by a conversation that took place in the pantry, where
Saunders and Toast were preparing the hot punch for the
last of the Saturday nights that Captain Truck expected to
be at sea. This discourse was held while the few who
chose to join in jollification that peculiarly recalled the
recollection
of Mr. Monday, were slowly assembling round
the great table at the urgent request of the master.
Well, I must say, Mr. Toast, the steward commenced,
as he kept stirring the punch, that I am werry much
rejoiced
Captain Truck has resuscertated his old nature, and
remembers the festivals and fasts, as is becoming the
master
Vol. II.  17
of a liner. I can see no good reason because a ship is
under jury-masts, that the passengers should forego their
natural rest and diet. Mr. Monday made a good end, they
say, and he had as handsome a burial as I ever laid eyes
on at sea. I don't think his own friends could have
interred
him more efficaciously, or more piously, had he been
on shore.
It is something, Mr. Saunders, to be able to reflect
beforehand
on the respectable funeral that your friends have
just given you. There is a great gratification to
contemplate
on such an ewent.
You improve in language, Toast, that I will allow; but
you sometimes get the words a little wrong. We suspect
before a thing recurs, and reflect on it after it has
ewentuated
.
You might have suspected the death of poor Mr.
Monday after he was wounded, and reflected on it after he
was interred in the water. I agree with you that it is
consoling
to know we have our funeral rights properly
delineated
.
Talking of the battle, Mr. Toast, I shall take this
occasion to express to you the high opinion I entertain of
your own good conduct. I was a little afraid you might
injure Captain Truck in the conflict; but, so far as I have
ascertained, on close inwestigation, you hurt nobody. We
coloured people have some prejudices against us, and I
always
rejoice when I meet with one who assists to put them
down by his conduck.
They say Mr. Dodge didn't do much harm, either,
returned
Toast. For my part I saw nothing of him after I
opened my eyes; though I don't think I ever stared about
me so much in my life.
Saunders laid a finger on his nose, and shook his head
significantly.
You may speak to me with confidence and mistrust,
Toast, he said, for we are friends of the same colour,
besides being officers in the same pantry. Has Mr. Dodge
conwersed with you concerning the ewents of those two or
three werry ewentful days?
He has insinevated considerable, Mr. Saunders; though
I do not think Mr. Dodge is ever a werry free talker.
Has he surgested the propriety of having an account of
the whole affair made out by the people, and sustained by
affidavits?
Well, sir, I imagine he has. At all ewents, he has been
much on the forecastle lately, endeavouring to persuade the
people that
they
retook the ship, and that the passengers
were so many encumbrancers in the affair.
And, are the people such
non composses
as to believe
him, Toast?
Why, sir, it is agreeable to humanity to think well of
ourselves. I do not say that anybody actually
believes
this; but, in my poor judgment, Mr. Saunders, there are
men in the ship that would find it
pleasant
to believe it, if
they could.
Werry true; for that is natural. Your hint, Toast, has
enlightened my mind on a little obscurity that has lately
prewailed over my conceptions. There are Johnson, and
Briggs, and Hewson, three of the greatest skulks in the ship,
the only men who prewaricated in the least, so much as by
a cold look, in the fight; and these three men have told me
that Mr. Dodge was the person who had the gun put on the
box; and that he druv the Arabs upon the raft. Now, I
say, no men with their eyes open could have made such a
mistake, except they made it on purpose. Do you
corroborate
or contrawerse this statement, Toast?
I contrawerse it, sir; for in my poor judgment it was
Mr. Blunt.
I am glad we are of the same opinion. I shall say
nothing till the proper moment arrives, and then I shall
exhibit
my sentiments, Mr. Toast, without recrimination or
anxiety, for truth is truth.
I am happy to observe that the ladies are quite relaxed
from their melancholy, and that they now seem to enjoy
themselves ostensibly.
Saunders threw a look of envy at his subordinate, whose
progress in refinement really alarmed his own sense of
superiority
;
but suppressing the jealous feeling, he replied
with dignity,
The remark is quite just, Mr. Toast, and denotes
penetration
.
I am always rejoiced when I perceive you elewating
your thoughts to superior objects, for the honour of the
colour.
Mister Saunders, called out the captain from his seat
in the arm-chair, at the head of the table.
Captain Truck, sir.
Let us taste your liquors.
This was the signal that the Saturday-night was about to
commence, and the officers of the pantry presented their
compounds in good earnest. On this occasion the ladies
had quietly, but firmly declined being present, but the
earnest
appeals of the well-meaning captain had overcome the
scruples of the gentlemen, all of whom, to avoid the
appearance
of disrespect to his wishes, had consented to appear.
This is the last Saturday night, gentlemen, that I shall
probably ever have the honour of passing in your good
company, said Captain Truck, as he disposed of the
pitchers and glasses before him, so that he had a perfect
command of the appliances of the occasion, and I feel it
to be a gratification with which I would not willingly
dispense
.
We are now to the westward of the Gulf, and,
according
to my observations and calculations, within a
hundred
miles of Sandy Hook, which, with this mild
southwest
wind, and our weatherly position, I hope to be able to
show you some time about eight o'clock to-morrow
morning
.
Quicker passages have been made certainly, but forty
days, after all, is no great matter for the westerly run,
considering
that we have had a look at Africa, and are walking
on crutches.
We owe a great deal to the trades, observed Mr.
Effingham
;
which have treated us as kindly towards the
end of the passage, as they seemed reluctant to join us in
the commencement. It has been a momentous month, and
I hope we shall all retain healthful recollections of it as
long as we live.
No one will retain as
grateful
recollections of it as
myself
,
gentlemen, resumed the captain. You had no
agency in getting us into the scrape, but the greatest
possible
agency in getting us out of it. Without the knowledge,
prudence, and courage that you have all displayed, God
knows what would have become of the poor Montauk, and
from the bottom of my heart I thank you, each and all,
while I have the heartfelt satisfaction of seeing you around
me, and of drinking to your future health, happiness and
prosperity.
The passengers acknowledged their thanks in return, by
bows, among which, that of Mr. Dodge was the most
elaborate
and conspicuous. The honest captain was too much
touched, to observe this little piece of audacity, but, at that
moment, he could have taken even Mr. Dodge in his arms
and pressed him to his heart.
Come, gentlemen, he continued; let us fill and do
honour to the night. God has us all in his holy keeping,
and we drift about in the squalls of life, pretty much as he
orders the wind to blow. `Sweethearts and wives!' and,
Mr. Effingham, we will not forget beautiful, spirited,
sensible
,
and charming daughters.
After this piece of nautical gallantry, the glass began to
circulate. The captain, Sir George Templemoreas the
false baronet was still called in the cabin, and believed to
be by all but those who belonged to the
coterie
of Eve
and Mr. Dodge, indulged freely, though the first was too
careful of the reputation of his ship, to forget that he was
on the American coast in November. The others partook
more sparingly, though even they submitted in a slight
degree
to the influence of good cheer, and for the first time
since their escape, the laugh was heard in the cabin as was
wont before to be the case. An hour of such indulgence
produced again some of the freedom and ease which mark
the associations of a ship, after the ice is fairly broken, and
even Mr. Dodge began to be tolerated. This person,
notwithstanding
his conduct on the occasion of the battle, had
contrived to maintain his ground with the spurious baronet,
by dint of assiduity and flattery, while the others had rather
felt pity than aversion, on account of his abject cowardice.
The gentlemen did not mention his desertion at the critical
moment, (though Mr. Dodge never forgave those who
witnessed
it,) for they looked upon his conduct as the result of
a natural and unconquerable infirmity, that rendered him
as much the subject of compassion as of reproach.
Encouraged
by this forbearance, and mistaking its motives, he
had begun to hope his absence had not been detected in the
confusion of the fight, and he had even carried his audacity
17*
so far, as to make an attempt to persuade Mr. Sharp that
he had actually been one of those who went in the launch
of the Dane, to bring down the other boat and raft to the
reef, after the ship had been recaptured. It is true, in this
attempt, he had met with a cold repulse, but it was so
gentlemanlike
and distant, that he had still hopes of
succeeding
in persuading the other to believe what he affirmed; by
way of doing which, he endeavoured all he could to believe
it himself. So much confusion existed in his own faculties
during the fray, that Mr. Dodge was fain to fancy others
also might not have been able to distinguish things very
accurately
.
Under the influence of these feelings, Captain Truck,
when the glass had circulated a little freely, called on the
Editor of the Active Inquirer, to favour the company with
some more extracts from his journal. Little persuasion
was necessary, and Mr. Dodge went into his state-room to
bring forth the valuable records of his observations and
opinions, with a conviction that all was forgotten, and that
he was once more about to resume his proper place in the
social relations of the ship. As for the four gentlemen who
had been over the ground the other pretended to describe,
they prepared to listen, as men of the world would be apt
to listen to the superficial and valueless comments of a tyro,
though not without some expectations of amusement.
I propose that we shift the scene to London, said
Captain Truck, in order that a plain seaman, like myself,
may judge of the merits of the writerwhich, I make no
doubt, are very great; though I cannot now swear to it
with as free a conscience as I could wish.
If I knew the pleasure of the majority, returned Mr.
Dodge, dropping the journal, and looking about him
inquiringly
,
I would cheerfully comply with it; for I think the
majority should always rule. Paris, or London, or the Rhine,
are the same to me; I have seen them all, and am just as
well qualified to describe the one as to describe the other.
No one doubts it, my dear sir; but I am not as well
qualified to understand one of your descriptions as I am to
understand another. Perhaps, even you, sir, may express
yourself more readily, and have better understood what was
said to you, in English, than in a foreign tongue.
As for that, I do not think the value of my remarks is
lessened by the one circumstance, or enhanced by the other,
sir. I make it a rule always to be right, if possible; and
that, I fancy, is as much as the natives of the countries
themselves can very well effect. You have only to decide,
gentlemen, whether it shall be England, or France, or the
Continent.
I confess an inclination to the
Continent
, said John
Effingham; for one could scarcely wish to limit a
comprehensiveness
like that of Mr. Dodge's to an island, or
even to France.
I see how it is, exclaimed the captain; we must
put the traveller through all his paces, and have a little of
both; so Mr. Dodge will have the kindness to touch on all
things in heaven and earth, London and Paris inclusive.
On this hint the journalist turned over a few pages
carelessly
,
and then commenced:
`Reached
Bruxelles
(Mr. Dodge pronounced this word
Brucksills) at seven in the evening, and put up at the best
house in the place, called the Silver Lamb, which is quite
near the celebrated town-house, and, of course in the very
centre of the
beau
quarter. As we did not leave until after
breakfast next morning, the reader may expect a description
of this ancient capital. It lies altogether on a bit of low,
level land'
Nay, Mr. Dodge, interrupted the
soi-disant
Sir George,
I think
that
must be an error. I have been at Brussels,
and I declare, now, it struck me as lying a good deal on
the side of a very steep hill!
All a mistake, sir, I do assure you. There is no more
hill at
Brucksills
than on the deck of this ship. You have
been in too great a hurry, my dear Sir George; that is the
way with most travellers; they do not give themselves time
to note particulars. You English especially, my dear Sir
George, are a little apt to be precipitate; and I dare say,
you travelled post, with four horses, a mode of getting on
by which a man may very well transfer a hill, in his
imagination
,
from one town to another. I travelled chiefly in
a
voitury
, which afforded leisure for remarks.
Here Mr. Dodge laughed; for he felt that he had got the
best of it.
I think you are bound to submit,
Sir George
Templemore
,
said John Effingham, with an emphasis on the name
that raised a smile among his friends; Brussels certainly
lies on a flat; and the hill you saw has, doubtless, been
brought up with you from Holland in your haste. Mr.
Dodge enjoyed a great advantage in his mode of travelling;
for, by entering a town in the evening, and quitting it only
in the morning, he had the whole night to look about him.
That was just my mode of proceeding, Mr. John
Effingham
;
I made it a rule to pass an entire night in every large
town I came to.
A circumstance that will give a double value to your
opinions with our countrymen, Mr. Dodge, since they very
seldom give themselves half that leisure when once in
motion
.
I trust you have not passed over the institutions of
Belgium, sir; and most particularly the state of society in
the capital, of which you saw so much?
By no means; here are my remarks on these subjects:
`Belgium, or
The Belges
, as the country is now called,
is one of the upstart kingdoms that have arisen in our
times; and which, from signs that cannot be mistaken, is
fated soon to be overturned by the glorious principles of
freedom. The people are ground down, as usual, by the
oppression of hard task-masters, and bloody-minded priests.
The monarch, who is a bigoted Catholic of the House of
Saxony, being a son of the king of that country, and a
presumptive heir to the throne of Great Britain, in right of
his first wife, devoting all his thoughts to miracles and
saints. The nobles form a class by themselves, indulging
in all sorts of vices.'I beg pardon, Sir George, but the
truth must be told in our country, or one had better never
speak.`All sorts of vices, and otherwise betraying the
monstrous tendencies of the system.'
Pray, Mr. Dodge, interrupted John Effingham, have
you said nothing as to the manner in which the inhabitants
relieve the eternal
ennui
of always walking on a level
surface
?
I am afraid not, sir My attention was chiefly given
to the institutions, and to the state of society, although I
can readily imagine they must get to be heartily tired of a
dead flat.
Why, sir, they have contrived to run a street up and
down the roof of the cathedral; and up and down this
street they trot all hours of the day.
Mr. Dodge looked distrustful; but John Effingham
maintained
his gravity. After a pause the former continued:
`The usages of
Brucksills
are a mixture of Low Dutch
and High Dutch habits, as is the language. The king being
a Polander, and a grandson of Augustus, king of Poland, is
anxious to introduce the customs of the Russians into his
court; while his amiable young queen, who was born in
New Jersey when her illustrious father kept the school at
Haddonfield, early imbibed those notions of republicanism
which so eminently distinguish his Grace the Honourable
Louis Philippe Orleans, the present King of the French.'
Nay, Mr. Dodge, said Mr. Sharp, you will have all
the historians ready to cut your throat with envy!
Why, sir, I feel it a duty not to throw away the great
opportunities I have enjoyed; and America is a country in
which an editor may never hope to mystify his readers.
We deal with them in facts, Mr. Sharp; and, although this
may not be your English practice, we think that truth is
powerful and will prevail. To continue,`The kingdom
of
the Belges
is about as large as the north-east corner of
Connecticut, including one town in Rhode Island; and the
whole population may be about equal to that of
our
tribe of
Creek Indians, who dwell in the wilder parts of
our
state
of Georgia.'
This particularity is very convincing, observed Paul;
and then it has the merit, too, of coming from an
eyewitness
.
I will now, gentlemen, return with you to Paris, where
I stayed all of three weeks, and of the society of which my
knowledge of the language will, of course, enable me to
give a still more valuable account.
You mean to publish these hints, I trust, sir? inquired
the captain.
I shall probably collect them, and enlarge them in the
way of a book; but they have already been laid before the
American public in the columns of the Active Inquirer. I
can assure you, gentlemen, that my colleagues of the press
have spoken quite favourably of the letters as they appeared.
Perhaps you would like to hear some of their opinions?
Hereupon Mr. Dodge opened a pocket-book, out of which
he took six or eight slips of printed paper, that had been
preserved with care, though obviously well thumbed.
Opening
one, he read as follows:
`Our friend Dodge, of the Active Inquirer, is instructing
his readers, and edifying mankind in general, with some
very excellent and pungent remarks on the state of Europe,
which part of the world he is now exploring with some such
enterprise and perseverance as Columbus discovered when
he entered on the unknown waste of the Atlantic. His
opinions meet with our unqualified approbation, being sound,
American, and discriminating. We fancy these Europeans
will begin to think in time that Jonathan has some pretty
shrewd notions concerning themselves, the critturs!' This
was extracted from the People's Advocate, a journal edited
with great ability, by Peleg Pond, esquire, a thoroughgoing
republican, and a profound observer of mankind.
In his own parish in particular, quaintly added John
Effingham. Pray, sir, have you any more of these
critical
morceaux?
At least a dozen, beginning to read again. `
Steadfast
Dodge, esquire, the editor of the Active Inquirer, is now
travelling in Europe, and is illuminating the public mind at
home by letters that are Johnsonian in style, Chesterfieldian
in taste and in knowledge of the world, with the redeeming
qualities of nationality, and republicanism, and truth. We
rejoice to perceive by these valuable contributions to
American
literature, that Steadfast Dodge, esquire, finds no reason
to envy the inhabitants of the Old World any of their
boasted civilization; but that, on the contrary, he is
impressed
with the superiority of our condition over all
countries
,
every post that he progresses. America has produced
but few men like Dodge; and even Walter Scott might not
be ashamed to own some of his descriptions. We hope he
may long continue to travel.'
Voitury
, added John Effingham gravely. You
perceive
,
gentlemen, how modestly these editors set forth their
intimacy with the traveller  `our friend Dodge, of the
Active Inquirer,' and `Steadfast Dodge, esquire!'a mode
of expression that speaks volumes for their own taste, and
their profound deference for their readers!
We always speak of each other in this manner, Mr.
John Effinghamthat is our
esprit du corps
.
And I should think that there would be an
esprit de
corps
in the public to resist it, observed Paul Blunt.
The distinction was lost on Mr. Dodge, who turned over
to one of his most elaborate strictures on the state of society
in France, with all the self-complacency of besotted
ignorance
and provincial superciliousness. Searching out a
place to his mind, this profound observer of men and
manners
,
who had studied a foreign people, whose language
when spoken was gibberish to him, by travelling five days
in a public coach, and living four weeks in taverns and
eating-houses, besides visiting three theatres, in which he
did not understand a single word that was uttered,
proceeded
to lay before his auditors the results of his
observations
.
`The state of female society in France is truly awful,'
he resumed, `the French Revolution, as is universally
known, having left neither decorum, modesty, nor beauty
in the nation. I walk nightly in the galleries of the Palais
Royal, where I locate myself, and get every opportunity of
observing the peculiarities of ladies of the first taste and
fashion in the metropolis of Europe. There is one duchess
in particular, whose grace and
embonpoint
have, I confess,
attracted my admiration. This lady, as my
lacquais de
place
informs me, is sometimes termed
la mre du peuple
,
from her popularity and affability. The young ladies of
France, judging from the specimens I have seen here
which must be of the highest class in the capital, as the
spot is under the windows of one of the royal palacesare
by no means observable for that quiet reserve and modest
diffidence that distinguish the fair among our own young
countrywomen; but it must be admitted they are
remarkable
for the manner in which they walk alone, in my
judgment
a most masculine and unbecoming practice. Woman
was not made to live alone, and I shall contend that she
was not made to walk alone. At the same time, I confess
there is a certain charm in the manner in which these ladies
place a hand in each pocket of their aprons, and balance
their bodies, as they move like duchesses through the
galleries
.
If I might humbly suggest, the American fair might
do worse than imitate this Parisian step; for, as a traveller,
I feel it a duty to exhibit any superior quality that other
nations possess. I would also remark on the general
suavity
of manners that the ladies of quality' (this word Mr.
Dodge pronounced
qua-a-lity
,) `observe in their promenades
in and about this genteel quarter of Paris.'
The French ladies ought to be much flattered with this
notice of them, cried the captain, filling Mr. Dodge's glass.
In the name of truth and penetration, sir, proceed.
`I have lately been invited to attend a ball in one of
the first families of France, which resides in the Rue St.
Jaques, or the St. James' of Paris. The company was
select, and composed of many of the first persons in the
kingdom of
des Franais
. The best possible manners
were to be seen here, and the dancing was remarkable for
its grace and beauty. The air with which the ladies turned
their heads on one side, and inclined their bodies in
advancing
and retiring, was in the first style of the court of
Terpsichore. They were all of the very first families of
France. I heard one excuse herself for going away so
early, as
Madame la Duchesse
expected her; and another
observed that she was to leave town in the morning with
Madame la Vicomtesse
. The gentlemen, with few
exceptions
,
were in fancy dresses, appearing in coats, some of
sky-blue, some green, some scarlet, and some navy-blue, as
fancy dictated, and all more or less laced on the seams;
much in the manner as was the case with the Honourable
the King the morning I saw him leave for
Nully
. This
entertainment was altogether the best conducted of any I
ever attended, the gentlemen being condescending, and
without
the least pride, and the ladies all grace.'
Graces would be more expressive, if you will excuse
my suggesting a word, sir, observed John Effingham, as
the other paused to take breath.
`I have observed that the people in most monarchies
are abject and low-minded in their deportment. Thus the
men take off their hats when they enter churches, although
the minister be not present; and even the boys take off
their hats when they enter private houses. This is
commencing
servility young. I have even seen men kneeling
on the cold pavements of the churches in the most abject
manner, and otherwise betraying the feeling naturally
created by slavish institutions.
Lord help 'em! exclaimed the captain, if they
begin so young, what a bowing and kneeling set of
blackguards
they will get to be in time.
It is to be presumed that Mr. Dodge has pointed out
the consequences in the instance of the abject old men
mentioned, who probably commenced their servility by
entering houses with their hats off, said John Effingham.
Just so, sir, rejoined the editor. I throw in these
little popular traits because I think they show the
differences
between nations.
From which I infer, said Mr. Sharp, that in your
part of America boys do not take off their hats when they
enter houses, nor men kneel in churches?
Certainly not, sir. Our people get their ideas of
manliness
early; and as for kneeling in churches, we have
some superstitious sectsI do not mention them; but, on
the whole, no nation can treat the house of God more
rationally
than we do in America.
That I will vouch for, rejoined John Effingham;
for the last time I was at home I attended a concert in
one of them, where an
artiste
of singular nasal merit
favoured the company with that admirable piece of
conjoined
sentiment and music entitled `Four-and-twenty
fiddlers
all in a row!
I'll engage for it, cried Mr. Dodge, swelling with
national
pride; and felt all the time as independent and
easy as if he was in a tavern. Oh! superstition is quite
extinct in
Ameriky!
But I have a few remarks on the
church in my notes upon England: perhaps you would
like to hear them?
Let me intreat you to read them, said the true Sir
George Templemore, a little eagerly.
Now, I protest against any illiberality, added the
false Sir George, shaking his finger.
Vol. II.  18
Mr. Dodge disregarded both; but, turning to the place,
he read aloud with his usual self-complacency and unction.
`To-day, I attended public worship in St.  church,
Minories. The congregation was composed of many of
the first people of England, among whom were present Sir
Solomon Snore, formerly HIGH sheriff of London, a
gentleman
of the first consideration in the empire, and the
celebrated Mr. Shilling, of the firm of Pound, Shilling, and
Pence. There was certainly a fine air of polite life in the
congregation, but a little too much idolatry. Sir Solomon
and Mr. Shilling were both received with distinction, which
was very proper, when we remember their elevated rank;
but the genuflexions and chaunting met with my very
unqualified
disapprobation.'
Sir Solomon and the other personage you mention
were a little
pursy
, perhaps, observed Mr. Sharp, which
destroyed their grace.
I disapprove of all kneeling, on general principles,
sir. If we kneel to one, we shall get to kneel to another,
and no one can tell where it will end. `The exclusive
manner in which the congregation were seated in pews,
with sides so high that it was difficult to see your nearest
neighbour; and these pews' (Mr. Dodge pronounced this
word
poohs
,) `have often curtains that completely enclose
their owners, a system of selfishness that would not be
long tolerated in
Ameriky
.'
Do individuals own their pews in America? inquired
Mr. Sharp.
Often, returned John Effingham; always, except in
those particular portions of the country where it is deemed
invidious, and contrary to the public rights, to be better off
than one's neighbour, by owning any thing that all the
community
has not a better claim to than its proprietor.
And cannot the owner of a pew curtain it, with a view
to withdraw into himself at public worship?
America and England are the antipodes of each other
in all these things. I dare say, now, that you have come
among us with an idea that our liberty is so very licentious,
that a man may read a newspaper by himself?
I confess, certainly, to that much, returned Mr. Sharp,
smiling.
We shall teach him better than this, Mr. Dodge, before
we let him depart. No, sir, you have very contracted ideas
of liberty, I perceive. With us every thing is settled by
majorities. We eat when the majority eats; drink, when the
majority drinks; sleep, when the majority sleeps; pray,
when the majority prays. So far from burying ourselves in
deep wells of pews, with curtains round their edges, we have
raised the floors, amphitheatre fashion, so that every body
can see every body; have taken away the sides of the pews,
which we have converted into free and equal seats, and have
cut down the side of the pulpit so that we can look at the
clergyman; but I understand there is actually a project on
foot to put the congregation into the pulpit, and the parson
into the aisle, by way of letting the latter see that he is no
better than he should be. This would be a capital
arrangement
,
Mr. Dodge, for the `Four-and-twenty fiddlers all in a
row.'
The editor of the Active Inquirer was a little distrustful of
John Effingham, and he was not sorry to continue his
extracts
,
although he was obliged to bring himself still further
under the fire of his assailant.
`This morning,' Mr. Dodge resumed, I stepped into the
coffee-room of the `Shovel and Tongs,' public-house, to read
the morning paper, and, taking a seat by the side of a
gentleman who was reading the `Times,' and, drawing to
me the leaves of the journal, so that it would be more
convenient
to peruse, the man insolently and arrogantly
demanded
of me, `What the devil I meant?' This intolerance
in the English character is owing to the narrowness of the
institutions, under which men come to fancy liberty applies
to persons instead of majorities.'
You perceive, Mr. Sharp, said John Effingham, how
much more able a stranger is to point out the defects of
national
character than a native. I dare say that in indulging
your individuality, hitherto, you have imagined you were
enjoying liberty.
I fear I have committed some such weakness  but Mr.
Dodge will have the goodness to proceed.
The editor complied as follows: `Nothing has
surprised
me more than the grovelling propensities of the
English
on the subject of names. Thus this very inn, which
in America would be styled the `Eagle Tavern,' or the
`Oriental or Occidental Hotel,' or the `Anglo-Saxon
Democratical
Coffee-house,' or some other equally noble and
dignified
appellation, is called the `Shovel and Tongs.' One
tavern, which might very appropriately be termed `The
Saloon of Peace,' is very vulgarly called `Dolly's
Chophouse
.'
All the gentlemen, not excepting Mr. Sharp, murmured
their disgust at so coarse a taste. But most of the party
began
now to tire of this pretending ignorance and provincial
vulgarity, and, one by one, most of them soon after left the
table. Captain Truck, however, sent for Mr. Leach, and
these two worthies, with Mr. Dodge and the spurious baronet,
sat an hour longer, when all retired to their berths.
CHAPTER XV.
I'll meet thee at Philippi.
Shakspeare
.
Happy
is the man who arrives on the coast of New York,
with the wind at the southward, in the month of November.
There are two particular conditions of the weather, in which
the stranger receives the most unfavourable impressions of
the climate that has been much and unjustly abused, but
which two particular conditions warrant all the evil that has
been said of it. One is a sweltering day in summer, and
the other an autumnal day, in which the dry north wind
scarce seems to leave any marrow in the bones.
The passengers of the Montauk escaped both these evils,
and now approached the coast with a bland southwest breeze,
and a soft sky. The ship had been busy in the night, and
when the party assembled on deck in the morning, Captain
Truck told them, that in an hour they should have a sight
of the long-desired western continent. As the packet was
running in at the rate of nine knots, under topmast and
top-gallant
studding-sails, being to windward of her port, this
was a promise that the gallant vessel seemed likely enough
to redeem.
Toast! called out the captain, who had dropped into
his old habits as naturally as if nothing had occurred, bring
me a coal; and you, master steward, look well to the
breakfast
this morning. If the wind stands six hours longer, I
shall have the grief of parting with this good company, and
you the grief of knowing you will never set another meal
before them. These are moments to awaken sentiment, and
yet I never knew an officer of the pantry that did not begin
to grin as he drew near his port.
It is usually a cheerful moment with every one, I
believe
,
Captain Truck, said Eve, and most of all, should
it be one of heartfelt gratitude with us.
Ay, ay, my dear young lady; and yet I fancy Mr.
Saunders will explain it rather differently. Has no one sung
out `land,' yet, from aloft, Mr. Leach? The sands of New
Jersey ought to be visible before this.
We have seen the haze of the land since daylight, but
not land itself.
Then, like old Columbus, the flowered doublet is mine
land, ho!
The mates and the people laughed, and looking ahead,
they nodded to each other, and the word land passed from
mouth to mouth, with the indifference with which
mariners
first see it in short passages. Not so with the rest.
They crowded together, and endeavoured to catch a glimpse
of the coveted shore, though, with the exception of Paul,
neither could perceive it.
We must call on you for assistance, said Eve, who
now seldom addressed the handsome young seaman without
a flush on her own beautiful face; for we are all so
lubberly
that none of us can see that which we so earnestly
desire.
Have the kindness to look over the stock of that anchor,
said Paul, glad of an excuse to place himself nearer to
Eve; and you will discover an object on the water.
I do, said Eve, but is it not a vessel?
18*
It is; but a little to the right of that vessel, do you not
perceive a hazy object at some elevation above the sea?
The cloud, you meana dim, ill-defined, dark body
of vapour?
So it may seem to you, but to me it appears to be the
land. That is the bluff-like termination of the celebrated
high lands of Navesink. By watching it for half an hour,
you will perceive its form and surface grow gradually more
distinct.
Eve eagerly pointed out the place to Mademoiselle
Viefville
and her father, and from that moment, for near an
hour, most of the passengers kept it steadily in view. As
Paul had said, the blue of this hazy object deepened; then
its base became connected with the water, and it ceased to
resemble a cloud at all. In twenty more minutes, the faces
and angles of the hills became visible, and trees started
out of their sides. In the end a pair of twin lights were
seen perched on the summit.
But the Montauk edged away from these highlands, and
shaped her course towards a long low spit of sand, that
lay several miles to the northward of them. In this
direction
,
fifty small sail were gathering into, or diverging from
the pass, their high, gaunt-looking canvas resembling so
many church towers on the plains of Lombardy. These
were coasters, steering towards their several havens. Two
or three outward-bound ships were among them, holding
their way in the direction of China, the Pacific Ocean, or
Europe.
About nine, the Montauk met a large ship standing on a
bowline, with every thing set that would draw, and heaping
the water under her bows. A few minutes after, Captain
Truck, whose attention had been much diverted from the
surrounding objects by the care of his ship, came near the
group of passengers, and once more entered into
conversation
.
Here we are, my dear young lady, he cried, within
five leagues of Sandy Hook, which lies hereaway, under
our lee bow; as pretty a position as heart could wish. This
lank, hungry-looking schooner in-shore of us, is a
news-vessel
,
and, as soon as she is done with the brig near her,
we shall have her in chase, when there will be a good
opportunity
to get rid of all our spare lies. This little fellow
to leeward, who is clawing up towards us, is the pilot; after
whose arrival, my functions cease, and I shall have little to
do but to rattle off Saunders and Toast, and to feed the
pigs.
And who is this gentleman ahead of us, with his
main-topsail
to the mast, his courses in the brails, and his helm
a-lee? asked Paul.
Some chap who has forgotten his knee-buckles, and has
been obliged to send a boat up to town to hunt for them,
coolly rejoined the captain, while he sought the focus of the
glass, and levelled it at the vessel in question. The look
was long and steady, and twice Captain Truck lowered the
instrument to wipe the moisture from his own eye. A
length, he called out, to the amazement of every body,
Stand by to in all studding-sails, and to ware to the
eastward. Be lively, men, be lively! The eternal Foam, as
I am a miserable sinner!
Paul laid a hand on the arm of Captain Truck, and
stopped him, as the other was about to spring towards the
forecastle, with a view to aid and encourage his people.
You forget that we have neither spars nor sails suited
to a chase, said the young man. If we haul off to
sea-ward
on any tack we can try, the corvette will be too much
for us now, and excuse me if I say that a different course
will be advisable.
The captain had learned to respect the opinion of Paul
and he took the interference kindly.
What choice remains, but to run down into the very
jaws of the lion, he asked, or to wear round, and stand
to the eastward?
We have two alternatives. We may pass unnoticed,
the ship being so much altered; or we may haul up on the
tack we are on, and get into shallow water.
He draws as little as this ship, sir, and would follow.
There is no port short of Egg Harbour, and into that I
should be bashful about entering with a vessel of this size;
whereas, by running to the eastward, and doubling
Montauk
,
which would owe us shelter on account of our name,
I might get into the Sound, or New London, at need, and
then claim the sweepstakes, as having won the race.
This would be impossible, Captain Truck, allow me to
say. Dead before the wind, we cannot escape, for the land
would fetch us up in a couple of hours; to enter by Sandy
Hook, if known, is impossible, on account of the corvette,
and, in a chase of a hundred and twenty miles, we should
be certain to be overtaken.
I fear you are right, my dear sir, I fear you are right.
The studding-sails are now in, and I will haul up for the
highlands, and anchor under them, should it be necessary.
We can then give this fellow Vattel in large quantities, for
I hardly think he will venture to seize us while we have an
anchor fast to good American ground.
How near dare you stand to the shore?
Within a mile ahead of us; but to enter the Hook, the
bar must be crossed a league or two off.
The latter is unlucky; but, by all means, get the
vessel
in with the land; so near as to leave no doubt as to our
being in American waters.
We'll try him, sir, we'll try him. After having escaped
the Arabs, the deuce is in it, if we cannot weather upon
John Bull! I beg your pardon, Mr. Sharp; but this is a
question that must be settled by some of the niceties of the
great authorities.
The yards were now braced forward, and the ship was
brought to the wind, so as to head in a little to the
northward
of the bathing-houses at Long Branch. But for this
sudden change of course, the Montauk would have run
down dead upon the corvette, and possibly might have
passed her undetected, owing to the change made in her
appearance by the spars of the Dane. So long as she
continued
bows on, standing towards them, not a soul on
board the Foam suspected her real character, though, now
that she acted so strangely, and offered her broadside to
view, the truth became known in an instant. The
main-yard
of the corvette was swung, and her sails were filled
on the same course as that on which the packet was
steering
.
The two vessels were about ten miles from the land,
the Foam a little ahead, but fully a league to leeward.
The latter, however, soon tacked and stood in-shore. This
brought the vessels nearly abreast of each other, the
corvette
a mile or more, dead to leeward, and distant now some
six miles from the coast. The great superiority of the
corvette's
sailing was soon apparent to all on board both
vessels
,
for she apparently went two feet to the packet's one.
The history of this meeting, so unexpected to Captain
Truck, was very simple. When the gale had abated, the
corvette, which had received no damage, hauled up along
the African coast, keeping as near as possible to the
supposed
track of the packet, and failing to fall in with her
chase, she had filled away for New York. On making the
Hook she took a pilot, and inquired if the Montauk had
arrived. From the pilot she learned that the vessel of
which she was in quest had not yet made its appearance,
and she sent an officer up to the town to communicate with
the British Consul. On the return of this officer, the
corvette
stood away from the land, and commenced cruising
in the offing. For a week she had now been thus occupied,
it being her practice to run close in, in the morning, and to
remain hovering about the bar until near night, when she
made sail for an offing. When first seen from the Montauk,
she had been lying-to, to take in stores sent from the town,
and to communicate with a news-boat.
The passengers of the Montauk had just finished their
breakfast, when the mate reported that the ship was fast
shoaling her water, and that it would be necessary to alter
the course in a few minutes, or to anchor. On repairing to
the deck, Captain Truck and his companions perceived the
land less than a mile ahead of them, and the corvette about
half that distance to the leeward, and nearly abeam.
That is a bold fellow, exclaimed the captain, or he
has got a Sandy Hook pilot on board him.
Most probably the latter, said Paul: he would scarcely
be here on this duty, and neglect so simple a precaution.
I think this would satisfy Mr. Vattel, sir, returned
Captain
Truck, as the man in the chains sung out, `and a half
three!' Hard up with the helm, and lay the yards square,
Mr. Leach.
Now we shall soon know the virtue of Vattel, said
John Effingham, as ten minutes will suffice to raise the
question very fairly.
The Foam put her helm down, and tacked beautifully to
the south-east. As soon as the Montauk, which vessel was
now running along shore, keeping in about four fathoms
water, the sea being as smooth as a pond, was a-beam, the
corvette wore round, and began to close with her chase,
keeping on her eastern, or outer board.
Were we an enemy, and a match for that sloop, said
Paul, this smooth water and yard-arm attitude would make
quick work.
Her captain is in the gangway, taking our measure,
observed Mr. Truck: here is the glass; I wish you to
examine his face, and tell me if you think him a man with
whom the law of nations will avail anything. See the
anchor clear, Mr. Leach, for I'm determined to bring up all
standing, if the gentleman intends to renew the old tricks of
John Bull on our coast. What do you make of him, Mr.
Blunt?
Paul did not answer, but laying down the glass, he paced
the deck rapidly with the manner of one much disturbed.
All observed this sudden change, though no one presumed
to comment on it. In the mean time the sloop-of-war came
up fast, and in a few minutes her larboard fore-yard-arm
was within twenty feet of the starboard main-yard-arm of
the Montauk, the two vessels running on parallel lines. The
corvette now hauled up her fore-course, and let her
top-gallant
sails settle on the caps, though a dead silence reigned
in her.
Give me the trumpet, said Captain Truck, stepping to
the rail; the gentleman is about to give us a piece of his
mind.
The English captain, who was easily known by his two
epaulettes, also held a trumpet; but neither of the two
commanders
used his instrument, the distance being sufficiently
near for the natural voice.
I believe, sir, commenced the man-of-war's-man, that
I have the pleasure to see Captain Truck, of the Montauk,
London packet?
Ay, ay; I'll warrant you he has my name alongside of
John Doe and Richard Roe, muttered Mr. Truck, spelt
as carefully as it could be in a primer.I am Captain
Truck, and this is the Montauk. May I ask the name of
your vessel, and your own, sir?
This is his Britannic Majesty's ship, the Foam, Captain
Ducie.
The Honourable Captain Ducie! exclaimed Mr. Sharp.
I thought I recognised the voice: I know him intimately
well.
Will he stand Vattel? anxiously demanded Mr. Truck.
Nay, as for that, I must refer you to himself.
You appear to have suffered in the gale, resumed
Captain Ducie, whose smile was very visible, as he thus
addressed them like an old acquaintance. We fared better
ourselves, for I believe we did not part a rope-yarn.
The ship pitched every stick out of her, returned
Captain Truck, and has given us the trouble of a new
outfit.
In which you appear to have succeeded admirably.
Your spars and sails are a size or two too small; but every
thing stands like a church.
Ay, ay, now we have got on our new clothes, we are
not ashamed to be seen.
May I ask if you have been in port to do all this?
No, sir; picked them up along-shore.
The Honourable Captain Ducie thought he was quizzed,
and his manner became a little more cold, though it still
retained its gentlemanlike tone.
I wish much to see you in private, sir, on an affair of
some magnitude, and I greatly regret it was not in my power
to speak you the night you left Portsmouth. I am quite
aware you are in your own waters, and I feel a strong
reluctance
to retain your passengers when so near their port;
but I shall feel it as a particular favour if you will permit
me to repair on board for a few minutes.
With all my heart, cried Captain Truck: if you will
give me room, I will back my main-topsail, but I wish to
lay my head off shore. This gentleman understands Vattel,
and we shall have no trouble with him. Keep the anchor
clear, Mr. Leach, for `fair words butter no parsnips.' Still,
he is a gentleman;and, Saunders, put a bottle of the old
Madeira on the cabin table.
Captain Ducie now left the rigging in which he had stood,
and the corvette luffed off to the eastward, to give room to
the packet, where she hove-to with her fore-topsail aback.
The Montauk followed, taking a position under her lee. A
quarter-boat was lowered, and in five minutes its oars were
tossed at the packet's lee-gangway, when the commander of
the corvette ascended the ship's side, followed by a
middleaged
man in the dress of a civilian, and a chubby-faced
midshipman.
No one could mistake Captain Ducie for anything but a
gentleman. He was handsome, well-formed, and about
five-and-twenty
.
The bow he made to Eve, with whose beauty
and air he seemed instantly struck, would have become a
drawing-room; but he was too much of an officer to permit
any further attention to escape him until he had paid his
respects to, and received the compliments of, Captain Truck.
He then turned to the ladies and Mr. Effingham, and
repeated
his salutations.
I fear, he said, my duty has made me the unwilling
instrument of prolonging your passage, for I believe few
ladies love the ocean sufficiently, easily to forgive hose who
lengthen its disagreeables.
We are old travellers, and know how to allow for the
obligations of duty, Mr. Effingham civilly answered.
That they do, sir, put in Captain Truck; and it was
never my good fortune to have a more agreeable set of
passengers
.
Mr. Effingham, the Honourable Captain Ducie;
the Honourable Captain Ducie, Mr. Effingham;Mr. John
Effingham, Mam'selle V. A. V. endeavouring always to
imitate Eve's pronunciation of the name;Mr. Dodge,
the Honourable Captain Ducie; the Honourable Captain
Ducie, Mr. Dodge.
The Honourable Captain Ducie and all the others, the
editor of the Active Inquirer excepted, smiled slightly,
though they respectively bowed and curtseyed; but Mr.
Dodge, who conceived himself entitled to be formally
introduced
to every one he met, and to know all he saw,
whether introduced or not, stepped forward promptly, and
shook Mr. Ducie very cordially by the hand.
Captain Truck now turned in quest of some one else to
introduce; Mr. Sharp stood near the capstan, and Paul had
retired as far aft as the hurricane-house.
I am happy to see you in the Montauk, added Captain
Truck, insensibly leading the other towards the capstan,
and am sorry I had not the satisfaction of meeting you
in England. The Honourable Captain Ducie, Mr. Sharp;
Mr. Sharp, the Honourable Captain
George Templemore! exclaimed the commander of the
corvette, looking from one to the other.
Charles Ducie! exclaimed the
soi-disant
Mr. Sharp.
Here then is an end of part of my hopes, and we have
been on a wrong scent the whole time.
Perhaps not, Ducie: explain yourself.
You must have perceived my endeavours to speak you,
from the moment you sailed?
To
speak
us! cried Captain Truck. Yes, sir, we
did
observe your endeavours to
speak us
.
It was because I was given to understand that one
calling
himself Sir George Templemore, an impostor, however,
had taken passage in this ship; and here I find that we
have been misled, by the real Sir George Templemore's
having chosen to come this way instead of coming by the
Liverpool ship. So much for your confounded fashionable
caprices, Templemore, which never lets you know in the
morning whether you are to shoot yourself or to get
married
before night.
And is this gentleman Sir George Templemore?
pithily
demanded Captain Truck.
For that I can vouch, on the knowledge of my whole
life.
And we know this to be true, and have known it since
the day we sailed, observed Mr. Effingham.
Captain Truck was accustomed to passengers under false
names, but never before had he been so completely
mystified
.
And pray, sir, he inquired of the baronet, are you a
member of Parliament?
I have that honour.
And Templemore Hall is your residence, and you have
come out to look at the Canadas?
Vol. II.  19
I am the owner of Templemore Hall, and hope to look
at the Canadas before I return.
And, turning to Captain Ducie, you sailed in quest
of another Sir George Templemorea false one?
That is a part of my errand, returned Captain Ducie,
smiling.
Nothing else?you are certain, sir, that this is the
whole of your errand?
I confess to another motive, rejoined the other, scarce
knowing how to take Captain Truck's question; but this
one will suffice for the present, I hope.
This business requires frankness. I mean nothing
disrespectful
;
but I am in American waters, and should be
sorry, after all, to be obliged to throw myself on Vattel.
Let me act as mediator, interrupted Sir George
Templemore
.
Some one has been a defaulter, Ducie; is it
not so?
This is the simple truth; an unfortunate, but silly
young man, of the name of Sandon. He was intrusted
with a large sum of the public money, and has absconded
with quite forty thousand pounds.
And this person, you fancy, did me the honour to travel
under my name?
Of that we are certain. Mr. Green here, motioning
to the civilian, comes from the same office, and traced the
delinquent, under your name, some distance on the
Portsmouth
road. When we heard that a Sir George
Templemore
had actually embarked in the Montauk, the admiral
made no scruple in sending me after the packet. This has
been an unlucky mistake for me, as it would have been a
feather in the cap of so young a commander to catch the
rogue.
You may choose your feather, sir, returned Captain
Truck, for you will have a right to wear it. The
unfortunate
young man you seek is, out of question, in this
ship.
Captain Truck now explained that there was a person
below who had been known to him as Sir George
Templemore
,
and who, doubtless, was the unhappy delinquent
sought. But Captain Ducie did not betray the attention or
satisfaction that one would have expected from this
information
,
his eye being riveted on Paul, who stood beneath
the hurricane-house. When the latter saw that he attracted
attention he advanced slowly, even reluctantly, upon the
quarter-deck. The meeting between these two gentlemen
was embarrassed, though each maintained his
self-possession
.
Mr. Powis, I believe? said the officer bowing haughtily.
Captain Ducie, if I am not mistaken? returned the
other, lifting his hat steadily, though his face became
flushed.
The manner of the two, however, was but little noticed
at the moment, though all heard the words. Captain Truck
drew a long wheeew! for this was rather more
than even he was accustomed to, in the way of masquerades.
His eye was on the two gentlemen as they walked aft
together
,
and alone, when he felt a touch upon his arm. It
was the little hand of Eve, between whom and the old
seaman
there existed a good deal of trifling, blended with the
most entire good-will. The young lady laughed with her
sweet eyes, shook her fair curls, and said mockingly,
Mr. Sharp, Mr. Blunt; Mr. Blunt, Mr. Sharp!
And were you in the secret all this time, my dear young
lady?
Every minute of it; from the buoys of Portsmouth to
this very spot.
I shall be obliged to introduce my passengers all over
again!
Certainly; and I would recommend that each should
show a certificate of baptism, or a passport, before you
announce his or her name.
You
are, at least, the beautiful Miss Effingham, my dear
young lady?
I'll not vouch for that, even, said Eve, blushing and
laughing.
That is Mr. John Effingham, I hope!
For that I
can
vouch. There are not
two
cousin Jacks
on earth.
I wish I knew what the other business of this
gentleman
is! He seems amicably disposed, except as regards
Mr. Blunt. They looked coldly and suspiciously at each
other.
Eve thought so too, and she lost all her desire for
pleasantry. Just at this moment Captain Ducie quitted his
companion, both touching their hats distantly, and returned
to the group he had so unceremoniously left a few minutes
before.
I believe, Captain Truck, you now know my errand,
he said, and can say whether you will consent to my
examining the person whom you have mentioned?
I know
one
of your errands, sir; you spoke of having
two
.
Both will find their completion in this ship, with your
permission.
Permission! That sounds well, at least, my dear young
lady. Permit me to inquire, Captain Ducie, has either of
your errands the flavour of tobacco about it?
The young man looked surprised, and he began to
suspect
another mystification.
The question is so singular that it is not very
intelligible
.
I wish to know, Captain Ducie, if you have anything
to say to this ship in the way of smuggling?
Certainly not. I am not a custom-house officer, sir,
nor on the revenue duty; and I had supposed this vessel a
regular packet, whose interest is too plain to enter into
such a pursuit.
You have supposed nothing but the truth, sir; though
we cannot always answer for the honesty or discretion of
our people. A single pound of tobacco might forfeit this
noble ship; and, observing the perseverance with which
you have chased me, I was afraid all was not right with
the excise.
You have had a needless alarm, then, for my two
objects in coming to America are completely answered by
meeting with Mr. Powis and the Mr. Sandon, who, I have
been given to understand, is in his state-room below.
The party looked at each other, but nothing was said.
Such being the facts, Captain Ducie, I beg to offer you
every facility so far as the hospitality of my ship is
concerned
.
You will permit us to have an interview with Mr
Sandon?
Beyond a doubt. I see, sir, you have read Vattel, and
understand the rights of neutrals, or of independent nations.
As this interview most probably will be interesting, you
may desire to have it held in private, and a state-room will
be too small for the purpose. My dear young lady, will
you have the complaisance to lend us your cabin for half
an hour?
Eve bowed assent, and Captain Truck then invited the
two Englishmen below.
My presence at this interview is of little moment,
observed Captain Ducie; Mr. Green is master of the
whole affair, and I have a matter of importance to arrange
with Mr. Powis. If one or two of you gentlemen will have
the kindess to be present, and witnesses of what passes
between
Mr. Sandon and Mr. Green, it would be a great
favour. Templemore, I may claim this of you?
With all my heart, though it is an unpleasant office to
see guilt exposed. Should I presume too much by asking
Mr. John Effingham to be of our party?
I was about to make the same request, put in the
captain. We shall then be two Englishmen and two
Yankees,if Mr. John Effingham will allow me so to style
him?
Until we get within the Hook, Captain Truck, I am a
Yankee; once
in
the country, I belong to the Middle
States, if you will allow me the favour to choose.
The last speaker was stopped by a nudge from Captain
Truck, who seized an opportunity to whisper,
Make no such distinction between outside and inside, I
beg of you, my dear sir. I hold that the ship is, at this
identical moment, in the United States of America in a
positive sense, as well as by a legal fiction; and I think
Vattel will bear me out in it.
Let it pass for that, then. I will be present at your
interview with the fugitive. If the case is not clear against
him, he shall be protected.
Things were now soon arranged; it being decided that
Mr. Green, who belonged to one of the English offices,
accompanied
by the gentlemen just named, should descend to
19*
the cabin of Miss Effingham, in order to receive the
delinquent
;
while Captain Ducie should have his interview with
Paul Powis in the state-room of the latter.
The first party went below immediately; but Captain
Ducie remained on deck a minute or two to give an order
to the midshipman of his boat, who immediately quitted the
Montauk, and pulled to the corvette. During this brief
delay Paul approached the ladies, to whom he spoke with a
forced indifference, though it was not possible to avoid
seeing his concern.
His servant, too, was observed watching his movements
with great interest; and when the two gentlemen went
below in company, the man shrugged his shoulders, and
actually held up his hands, as one is wont to do at the
occurrence
of any surprising or distressing circumstance.
CHAPTER XVI.
Norfolk, for thee remains a heavy doom,
Which I with some unwillingness pronounce.
Shakspeare
.
The
history of the unfortunate young man, who, after
escaping all the hazards and adventures of the passage,
was now so unexpectedly overtaken as he was about to
reach what he fancied an asylum, was no more than one
of those common-place tissue of events that lead, through
vanity and weakness, to crime. His father had held an
office under the British government. Marrying late, and
leaving a son and daughter just issuing into life at the time
of his decease, the situation he had himself filled had been
given to the first, out of respect to the unwearied toil of a
faithful servant.
The young man was one of those who, without
principles
or high motives, live only for vanity. Of prominent
vices he had none, for there were no salient points in his
character on which to hang any quality of sufficient
boldness
to encourage crime of that nature. Perhaps he owed
his ruin to the circumstance that he had a tolerable
person
,
and was six feet high, as much as to any one other
thing. His father had been a short, solid, square-built
little man, whose ambition never towered above his stature,
and who, having entered fairly on the path of industry and
integrity early in life, had sedulously persevered in it to the
end. Not so with the son. He read so much about
aristocratic
stature, aristocratic ears, aristocratic hands,
aristocratic
feet, and aristocratic air, that he was delighted to
find that in all these high qualities he was not easily to be
distinguished from most of the young men of rank he
occasionally
saw riding in the parks, or met in the streets;
and, though he very well knew he was not a lord, he began
to fancy it a happiness to be thought one by strangers, for
an hour or two in a week.
His passion for trifles and toys was inherent, and it had
been increased by reading two or three caricatures of
fashionable
men in the novels of the day, until his happiness
was chiefly centered in its indulgence. This was an
expensive
foible; and its gratification ere long exhausted his
legitimate means. One or two trifling and undetected
peculations favoured his folly, until a large sum happening
to lie at his sole mercy for a week or two, he made such
an inroad on it as compelled a flight. Having made up his
mind to quit England, he thought it would be as easy to
escape with forty thousand pounds as with the few
hundreds
he had already appropriated to himself. This capital
mistake was the cause of his destruction; for the magnitude
of the sum induced the government to take unusual steps
to recover it, and was the true cause of its having
despatched
the cruiser in chase of the Montauk.
The Mr. Green who had been sent to identify the
fugitive
,
was a cold, methodical man, every way resembling
the delinquent's father, whose office-companion he had
been, and in whose track of undeviating attention to
business
and negative honesty he had faithfully followed. He
felt the peculation, or robbery, for it scarce deserved a
milder term, to be a reproach on the corps to which he
belonged
,
besides leaving a stigma on the name of one to
whom he had himself looked up as to a model for his own
imitation and government. It will readily be supposed,
therefore, that this person was not prepared to meet the
delinquent in a very forgiving mood.
Saunders, said Captain Truck in the stern tone with
which he often hailed a-top, and which implied that instant
obedience was a condition of his forbearance, go to the
state-room of the person who has
called
himself Sir George
Templemoregive him my complimentsbe very
particular
,
Mr. Saundersand say Captain Truck's compliments,
and then tell him I expect the honour of his company in
this cabinthe
honour
of his company, remember, in this
cabin. If that don't bring him out of his state-room, I'll
contrive something that shall.
The steward turned up the white of his eyes, shrugged
his shoulders, and proceeded forthwith on the errand. He
found time, however, to stop in the pantry, and to inform
Toast that their suspicions were at least in part true.
This elucidates the circumstance of his having no
attendant
with him, like other gentlemen on board, and a
wariety
of other incidents, that much needed dewelopement.
Mr. Blunt, I do collect from a few hints on deck, turns out
to be a Mr. Powis, a much genteeler name; and as they
spoke to some one in the ladies' cabin as `Sir George,' I
should not be overcome with astonishment should Mr. Sharp
actually eventuate as the real baronite.
There was time for no more, and Saunders proceeded to
summon the delinquent.
This is the most unpleasant part of the duty of a
packet-master
between England and America, continued Captain
Truck, as soon as Saunders was out of sight. Scarce a
ship sails that it has not some runaway or other, either in
the steerage or in the cabins, and we are often called on to
aid the civil authorities on both sides of the water.
America seems to be a favourite country with our
English
rogues, observed the office-man, drily. This is the
third that has gone from our own department within as
many years.
Your department appears to be fruitful of such
characters
,
sir, returned Captain Truck, pretty much in the spirit
in which the first remark had been given.
Mr. Green was as thorough-going an Englishman as any
of his class in the island. Methodical, plodding,
industrious
,
and regular in all his habits, he was honest by rule,
and had no leisure or inclination for any other opinions than
those which were obtained with the smallest effort. In
consequence
of the limited sphere in which he dwelt, in a
moral sense at least, he was a mass of the prejudices that
were most prevalent at the period when he first obtained his
notions. His hatred of France was unconquerable, for he
had early learned to consider her as the fast enemy of
England; and as to America, he deemed her to be the
general asylum of all the rogues of his own countrythe
possession of a people who had rebelled against their king,
because the restraints of law were inherently disagreeable
to them. This opinion he had no more wish to proclaim
than he felt a desire to go up and down declaring that Satan
was the father of sin; but the fact in the one case was just
as well established in his mind as in the other. If he
occasionally
betrayed the existence of these sentiments, it was
as a man coughs; not because he particularly wishes to
cough, but because he cannot help it. Finding the subject
so naturally introduced, therefore, it is no wonder if some
of his peculiar notions escaped him in the short dialogue
that followed.
We have our share of bad men, I presume, sir, he
rejoined to the thrust of Captain Truck; but the thing
that has most attracted comment with us, is the fact that
they all go to America.
And we receive our share of rogues, I presume, sir;
and it is the subject of animadversion with
us
that they all
come from England.
Mr. Green did not feel the force of this retort; but he
wiped his spectacles as he quietly composed his features into
a look of dignified gravity.
Some of your most considerable men in America, I
believe, sir, he continued, have been Englishmen, who
preferred a residence in the colonies to a residence at home.
I never heard of them, returned the captain; will
you have the goodness to name just one?
Why, to begin, there was your Washington. I have
often heard my father say that he went to school with him
in Warwickshire, and that he was thought anything but
very clever, too, while he lived in England.
You perceive, then, that we made something of him
when we got him over on this side; for he turned out in
the end to be a very decent and respectable sort of person.
Judging from the language of some of your prints, sir, I
should suppose that King William enjoyed the reputation
of being a respectable man in your country?
Although startled to hear his sovereign spoken of in this
irreverent manner, Mr. Green answered promptly,
He is a king, sir, and comports himself as a king.
And all the better, I dare say, for the thrashing he got
when a youngster, from the Vermont tailor.
Now Captain Truck quite as religiously believed in
this vulgar tale concerning the prince in question, as Mr.
Green believed that Washington had commenced his career
as one no better than he should be, or as implicitly as Mr.
Steadfast Dodge gave credit to the ridiculous history of the
schoolmaster of Haddonfield; all three of the legends
belonging
to the same high class of historical truths.
Sir George Templemore looked with surprise at John
Effingham, who gravely remarked,
Elegant extracts, sir, from the vulgar rumours of two
great nations. We deal largely in these legends, and you
are not quite guiltless of them. I dare say, now, if you
would be frank, that you yourself have not always been
deaf to the reports against America.
You surely do not imagine that I am so ignorant of the
career of Washington?
Of that I fully acquit you; nor do
I
exactly suppose
that your present monarch was flogged by a tailor in
Vermont
,
or that Louis Phillipe kept school in New-Jersey.
Our position in the world raises us beyond these elegancies;
but do you not fancy some hard things of America, more
especially concerning her disposition to harbour rogues, if
they come with full pockets.
The baronet laughed, but he coloured. He wished to be
liberal, for he well knew that liberality distinguishes the
man of the world, and was an indispensable requisite for a
gentleman; but it is very hard for an Englishman to
manifest
true liberality towards the
ci-devant
colonies, and this
he felt in the whole of his moral system, notwithstanding
every effort to the contrary.
I will confess that case of Stephenson made an
unfavourable
impression in England, he said with some
reluctance
.
You mean the absconding member of Parliament,
returned
John Effingham, with emphasis on the four last
words. You cannot mean to reproach us with his
selection
of a place of refuge; for he was picked up at sea by
a foreign ship that was accidentally bound to America.
Certainly not with that circumstance, which, as you
say, was purely an accident. But was there not something
extraordinary in his liberation from arrest!
Sir George Templemore, there are few Englishmen with
whom I would dwell an instant on this subject, said John
Effingham gravely; but you are one of those who have
taught me to respect you, and I feel a strong regret
whenever
I trace any of these mistaken notions in a man of your
really generous disposition. A moment's reflection will show
you that no civilized society could exist with the disposition
you hint at; and as for the particular case you have
mentioned
,
the man did not bring money of any moment with
him, and was liberated from arrest on a principle common
to all law, where law is stronger than political power, and
which principle we derive directly from Great Britain.
Depend on it, so far from there being a desire to receive rich
rogues in America from other countries, there is a growing
indisposition to receive emigrants at all; for their number is
getting to be inconvenient to the native population.
Why does not America pass reciprocal laws with us,
then, for the mutual delivery of criminals.
One insuperable objection to such a reciprocity arises
from the nature of our government, as a confederation, since
there is no identity in our own criminal jurisprudence: but
a chief reason is the exceedingly artificial condition of your
society, which is the very opposite of our own, and
indisposes
the American to visit trifling crimes with so heavy
punishments. The American, who has a voice in this
matter
,
you will remember, is not prepared to hang a
half-starved
wretch for a theft, or to send a man to Botany Bay
for poaching. The facility with which men obtain a
livelihood
in America has hitherto converted most rogues into
comparatively honest men when they get there; though I
think the day is near, now your own police is so much
improved
,
when we shall find it necessary in self-defence to
change our policy. The common language, as I am told,
induces many knaves, who now find England too hot to hold
them, to migrate to America.
Captain Ducie is anxious to know whether Mr. Truck
will quietly permit this criminal to be transferred to the
Foam.
I do not think he will permit it at all without being
overpowered, if the request be urged in any manner as a
right. In that case, he will very properly think that the
maintenance of his national character is of more
importance
than the escape of a dozen rogues.
You
may put a
harsh construction on his course; but
I
shall think him right
in resisting an unjust and an illegal invasion of his rights.
I had thought Captain Ducie, however, more peaceably
disposed
from what has passed.
Perhaps I have expressed myself too strongly. I know
he would wish to take back the criminal; but I scarce think
that he meditates more than persuasion. Ducie is a fine
fellow, and every way a gentleman.
He appears to have found an acquaintance in our young
friend, Powis.
The meeting between these two gentlemen has surprised
me, for it can scarcely be termed amicable: and yet it
seems to occupy more of Ducie's thoughts just now than
the affair of the runaway.
Both now became silent and thoughtful, for John
Effingham
had too many unpleasant suspicions to wish to speak,
and the baronet was too generous to suggest a doubt
concerning
one whom he felt to be his rival, and whom, in
truth, he had begun sincerely to respect, as well as to like.
In the mean time, a discussion, which had gradually been
growing more dogged and sullen on the part of Mr. Green,
and more biting and caustic on that of Captain Truck, was
suddenly terminated by the reluctant and tardy appearance
of Mr. Sandon.
Guilt, that powerful vindicator of the justice of
Providence
,
as it proves the existence of the inward monitor,
conscience
,
was painfully impressed on a countenance that, in
general, expressed little beyond a vacant vanity. Although
of a tall and athletic person, his limbs trembled in a way to
refuse to support him, and when he saw the well-known face
of Mr. Green, the unhappy young man sank into a seat,
from a real inability to stand. The other regarded him
sternly through his spectacles, for more than a minute.
This is a melancholy picture, Henry Sandon! he at
length said. I am, at least, glad that you do not affect to
brazen out your crime, but that you show a proper sense of
its enormity. What would your upright and pains-taking
father have said, had he lived to see his only son in this
situation?
He is dead! returned the young man, hoarsely. He
is dead, and never can know any thing about it.
The unhappy delinquent experienced a sense of frightful
pleasure as he uttered these words.
It is true, he is dead; but there are others to suffer by
your misconduct. Your innocent sister is living, and feels
all your disgrace.
She will marry Jones, and forget it all. I gave her a
thousand pounds, and she is married before this.
In that you are mistaken. She has returned the money,
for she is, indeed, John Sandon's daughter, and Mr. Jones
refuses to marry the sister of a thief.
The delinquent was vain and unreflecting, rather than
selfish, and he had a natural attachment to his sister, the
only other child of his parents. The blow, therefore, fell on
his conscience with double force, coming from this quarter.
Julia can compel him to marry her, said the startled
brother; he is bound by a solemn engagement, and the law
will protect her.
No law can make a man marry against his will, and
your poor unfortunate sister is too tender of your feelings,
whatever you may have been of hers, to wish to give Mr.
Vol. II.  20
Jones an opportunity of defending himself by exposing your
crime. But this is wasting words, Mr. Sandon, for I am
wanted in the office, where I have left things in the hands of
an inexperienced substitute. Of course you are not prepared
to defend an act, that your conscience must tell you is
inexcusable
.
I am afraid, Mr. Green, I have been a little thoughtless;
or, perhaps, it would be better to say, unlucky.
Mr. Sandon had fallen into the general and delusive
mistake
of those who err, in supposing himself unfortunate
rather than criminal. With an ingenuity, that, exercised in
a better cause, would have made him a respectable man, he
had been endeavouring to excuse his crime to himself, on
various
pleas of necessity, and he had even got at last to justify
his act, by fancying that some trifling wrong he had received,
or which he fancied he had received in the settlement of his
own private account, in some measure excused his fraud,
although
his own denied claim amounted merely to the sum of
twenty pounds, and that which he had taken was so large.
It was under the influence of such feelings that he made the
answer just given.
A little thoughtless! unlucky! And is this the way,
Henry Sandon, that you name a crime that might almost
raise your upright father from his grave? But I will speak
no more of feelings that you do not seem to understand.
You confess to have taken forty thousand pounds of the
public
money, to which you have no right or claim?
I certainly have in my hands some money, which I do
not deny belongs to government.
It is well; and here is my authority to receive it from
you. Gentlemen, will you have the kindness to see that my
powers are regular and authentic?
John Effingham and others cast their eyes over the
papers
,
which seemed to be in rule, and they said as much.
Now, sir, resumed Mr. Green, in the first place, I
demand
the bills you received in London for this money, and
your regular endorsement in my favour.
The culprit appeared to have made up his mind to this
demand, and, with the same recklessness with which he had
appropriated the money to his own use, he was now ready
to restore it, without proposing a condition for his own safety.
The bills were in his pocket, and seating himself at a table,
he made the required endorsement, and handed them to Mr.
Green.
Here are bills for thirty-eight thousand pounds, said
that methodical person, after he had examined the drafts,
one by one, and counted their amount; and you are
known to have taken forty thousand. I demand the
remainder
.
Would you leave me in a strange country penniless?
exclaimed the culprit, in a tone of reproach.
Strange country! penniless! repeated Mr. Green,
looking
over his spectacles, first at Mr. Truck, and then at Mr.
Sandon. That to which you have no claim must be
restored
,
though it strip you to the skin. Every pound you
have belongs to the public, and to no one else.
Your pardon, Mr. Green, and green enough you are, if
you lay down that doctrine, interrupted Captain Truck, in
which neither Vattel, nor the revised statutes will bear you
out. A passenger cannot remove his effects from a ship,
until his passage be first paid.
That, sir, I dispute, in a question affecting the king's
revenues. The claims of government precede all others,
and the money that has once belonged to the crown, and
which has not been regularly paid away by the crown, is the
crown's still.
Crowns and coronations! Perhaps, Master Green,
you think you are in Somerset House at this present
speaking
?
Now Mr. Green was so completely a star of a confined
orbit, that his ideas seldom described a tangent to their
ordinary
revolutions. He was so much accustomed to hear
of England ruling colonies, the East and the West, Canada,
the Cape, and New South Wales, that it was not an easy
matter for him to conceive himself to be without the
influence
of the British laws. Had he quitted home with the
intention to emigrate, or even to travel, it is probable that his
mind would have kept a more equal pace with his body, but
summoned in haste from his desk, and with the office
spectacles
on his nose, it is not so much a matter of wonder
that he hardly realized the truths of his present situation. The
man-of-war, in which everything was His Majesty's,
sustained
this feeling, and it was too sudden a change to expect
such a man to abandon all his most cherished notions at a
moment's warning. The irreverent exclamation of Captain
Truck shocked him, and he did not fail to show as much by
the disgust pictured in his countenance.
I am in one of His Majesty's packets, sir, I presume,
where, you will permit me to say, a greater deference for
the high ceremonies of the kingdom ought to be found.
This would make even old Joe Bunk laugh. You are
in a New York liner, sir, over which no majesty has any
control, but their majesties John Griswold and Co. Why,
my good sir, the sea has unsettled your brain!
Now, Mr. Green did know that the United States of
America had obtained their independence, but the whole
proceeding was so mixed up with rebellion, and a French
alliance, in his mind, that he always doubted whether the
new republic had a legal existence at all, and he had been
heard to express his surprise that the twelve judges had not
long since decided this state of things to be unconstitutional,
and overturned the American government by
mandamus
. His disgust increased, accordingly, as Captain Truck's
irreverence
manifested itself in stronger terms, and there was
great danger that the harmony, which had hitherto prevailed
between the parties, would be brought to a violent
termination
.
The respect for the crown in a truly loyal subject, sir,
Mr. Green returned sharply, is not to be unsettled by the
sea; not in my case, at least, whatever it might have been
in your own.
My own! why, the devil, sir, do you take me for a
subject?
A truant one, I fear, though you may have been born
in London itself.
Why, my dear sir, said Captain Truck, taking the
other by a button, as if he pitied his hallucination, you
don't breed such men in London. I came from the river,
which never had a subject in it, or any other majesty, than
that of the Saybrook Platform. I begin to understand you,
at last; you are one of those well-meaning men who fancy
the earth but a casing to the island of Great Britain. Well
I suppose it is more the fault of your education than of your
nature, and one must overlook the mistake. May I ask
what is your farther wish, in reference to this unhappy young
man?
He must refund every pound of the public money that
remains in his possession.
That is just, and I say yea.
And all who have received from him any portion of this
money, under whatever pretences, must restore it to the
crown.
My good sir, you can have no notion of the quantity of
champaigne and other good things this unfortunate young
man has consumed in this ship. Although but a sham
baronet
,
he has fared like a real lord; and you cannot have
the heart to exact from the owners the keeping of your
rogues.
Government makes no distinction, sir, and always
claims its own.
Nay, Mr. Green, interrupted Sir George Templemore,
I much question if government would assert a right to
money that a peculator or a defaulter fairly spends, even in
England; much less does it seem to me it can pretend to
the few pounds that Captain Truck has lawfully earned.
The money has not been lawfully earned, sir. It is
contrary to law to assist a felon to quit the kingdom, and I
am not certain there are no penalties for that act alone; and
as for the public money, it can never legally quit the
Treasury
without the proper office forms.
My dear Sir George, put in the captain, leave me to
settle this with Mr. Green, who, no doubt, is authorized to
give a receipt in full. What is to be done with the
delinquent
,
sir, now that you are in possession of his money?
Of course he will be carried back in the Foam, and, I
mourn to be compelled to say, that he must be left in the
hands of the law.
What, with or without my permission?
Mr. Green stared, for his mind was precisely one of those
which would conceive it to be a high act of audacity in a
20*
ci-devant
colonist to claim the rights of an old country, even
did he really understand the legality and completeness of the
separation.
He has committed forgery, sir, to conceal his peculation.
It is an awful crime; but they that commit it cannot hope
to escape the consequences.
Miserable impostor! is this true? Captain Truck sternly
demanded of the trembling culprit.
He calls an oversight forgery, sir, returned the
latter
huskily. I have done nothing to affect my life or
liberty.
At this moment Captain Ducie, accompanied by Paul
Powis, entered the cabin, their faces flushed, and their
manner
to each other a little disturbed, though it was formally
courteous. At the same instant, Mr. Dodge, who had been
dying to be present at the secret conference, watched his
opportunity to slip in also.
I am glad you have come, sir, said Mr. Green, for
here may be occasion for the services of his Majesty's
officers
.
Mr. Sandon has given up these bills, but two
thousand
pounds remain unaccounted for, and I have traced
thirty-five, quite clearly, to the master of this ship, who
has received it in the way of passage-money.
Yes, sir, the fact is as plain as the high-lands of
Navesink
from the deck, drily added Captain Truck.
One thousand of this money has been returned by the
defaulter's sister, observed Captain Ducie.
Very true, sir; I had forgotten to give him credit for
that.
The remainder has probably been wasted in those silly
trifles of which you have told me the unhappy man was so
fond, and for which he has bartered respectability and peace
of mind. As for the money paid this ship for the passage
it has been fairly earned, nor do I know that government
has any power to reclaim it.
Mr. Green heard this opinion with still greater disgust
than he had felt towards the language of Captain Truck,
nor could he very well prevent his feelings escaping him
in words.
We truly live in perilous times, he muttered, speaking
more particularly to John Effingham, out of respect to his
appearance, when the scions of the nobility entertain
notions
so loose. We have vainly fancied in England that
the enormities of the French revolution were neutralized
by Billy Pitt; but, sir, we still live in perilous times, for
the disease has fairly reached the higher classes. I hear
that designs are seriously entertained against the wigs of
the judges and bishops, and the next thing will be the
throne! All our venerable institutions are in danger.
I should think the throne might indeed be in danger,
sir, returned John Effingham, gravely, if it reposes on
wigs.
It is my duty, Captain Truck, continued Captain Ducie,
who was a man so very different from his associate that he
scarcely seemed to belong to the same species, to request
you will deliver to us the person of the culprit, with his
effects, when we can relieve you and your passengers from
the pain of witnessing any more of this unpleasant scene.
At the sound of the delivery of his person, all the danger
of his situation rushed forcibly before the imagination of
the culprit. His face flushed and became pale, and his
legs refused to support him, though he made a desperate
effort to rise.
After an instant of silence, he turned to the commander
of the corvette, and, in piteous accents, appealed to him for
mercy.
I have been punished severely already, he continued,
as his voice returned, for the savage Arabs robbed me of
everything I had of any value. These gentlemen know
that they took my dressing-case, several other curious and
valuable articles for the toilet, and nearly all my clothes.
This man is scarcely a responsible being, said John
Effingham, for a childish vanity supplies the place of
principles, self-respect, and duty. With a sister scorned on
account of his crimes, conviction beyond denial, and a dread
punishment staring him in the face, his thoughts still run
on trifles.
Captain Ducie gave a look of pity at the miserable young
man, and, by his countenance, it was plain to see that he
felt no relish for his duty. Still he felt himself bound to
urge on Captain Truck a compliance with his request. The
master of the packet was a good deal divided by an
inherent
dislike of seeming to yield anything to a British naval
officer, a class of men whom he learned in early life most
heartily to dislike; his kind feelings towards this particular
specimen of the class; a reluctance to give a man up to a
probable death, or some other severe punishment; and a
distaste to being thought desirous of harbouring a rogue.
In this dilemma, therefore, he addressed himself to John
Effingham for counsel.
I should be pleased to hear your opinion, sir, on this
matter, he said, looking at the gentleman just named, for
I own myself to be in a category. Ought we, or not, to
deliver up the culprit?
Fiat justitia ruat clum
, answered John Effingham,
who never fancied any one could be ignorant of the meaning
of these familiar words.
That I believe indeed to be Vattel, said Captain Truck;
but exceptions alter rules. This young man has some
claims on us on account of his conduct when in front of the
Arabs.
He fought for himself, sir, and has the merit of
preferring
liberty in a ship to slavery in the desert.
I think with Mr. John Effingham, observed Mr. Dodge,
and can see no redeeming quality in his conduct on that
occasion. He did what we all did, or, as Mr. John
Effingham
has so pithily expressed it, he preferred liberty in our
company to being an Arab's slave.
You will not deliver me up, Captain Truck! exclaimed
the delinquent. They will hang me, if once in their power.
Oh! you will not have the heart to let them hang me!
Captain Truck was startled at this appeal, but he sternly
reminded the culprit that it was too late to remember the
punishment, when the crime was committed.
Never fear, Mr. Sandon, said the office-man with a
sneer; these gentlemen will take you to New York, for
the sake of the thousand pounds, if they can. A rogue is
pretty certain of a kind reception in America, I hear.
Then, sir, exclaimed Captain Truck, you had better
go in with us.
Mr. Green, Mr. Green, this is indiscreet, to call it by
no worse a term, interposed Captain Ducie, who, while he
was not free from a good deal of the prejudices of his
companion
,
was infinitely better bred, and more in the habit of
commanding himself.
Mr. John Effingham, you have heard this wanton
insult
,
continued Captain Truck, suppressing his wrath as
well as he could: in what manner ought it to be resented?
Command the offender to quit your ship instantly, said
John Effingham firmly.
Captain Ducie started, and his face flushed; but
disregarding
him altogether, Captain Truck walked deliberately up to
Mr. Green, and ordered him to go into the corvette's boat.
I shall allow of neither parley nor delay, added the
exasperated old seaman, struggling to appear cool and
dignified
,
though his vocation was little for the latter. Do
me the favour, sir, to permit me to see you into your boat,
sir. Saunders, go on deck, and tell Mr. Leach to have the
side mannedwith
three
side boys, Saunders;and now I
ask it as the greatest possible favour, that you will walk on
deck with me, orordamn me, but I'll drag you there,
neck and heels!
It was too much for Captain Truck to seem calm when
he was in a towering passion, and the outbreak at the close
of this speech was accompanied by a gesture with a hand
which was open, it is true, but from which none of the arts
of his more polite days could erase the knobs and hue that
had been acquired in early life.
This is strong language, sir, to use to a British officer,
under the guns of a British cruiser, exclaimed the
commander
of the corvette.
And his was strong language to use to a man in his
own country and in his own ship. To you, Captain Ducie,
I have nothing to say, unless it be to say you are welcome.
But your companion has indulged in a coarse insult on my
country, and damn me if I submit to it, if I never see St.
Catherine's Docks again. I had too much of this when a
young man, to wish to find it repeated while an old one.
Captain Ducie bit his lip, and he looked exceedingly
vexed. Although he had himself blindly imbibed the notion
that America would gladly receive the devil himself if he
came with a full pocket, he was shocked with the
coarseness
that would throw such an innuendo into the very faces
of the people of the country. On the other hand, his pride
as an officer was hurt at the menace of Captain Truck, and
all the former harmony of the scene was threatened with a
sudden termination. Captain Ducie had been struck with
the gentlemanlike appearance of both the Effinghams, to
say nothing of Eve, the instant his foot touched the deck
of the Montauk, and he now turned with a manner of
reproach to John Effingham, and said,
Surely, sir,
you
cannot sustain Mr. Truck in his
extraordinary
conduct!
You will pardon me if I say I do. The man has been
permitted to remain longer in the ship than I would have
suffered.
And, Mr. Powis, what is your opinion?
I fear, said Paul, smiling coldly, that I should have
knocked him down on the spot.
Templemore, are you, too, of this way of thinking?
I fear the speech of Mr. Green has been without
sufficient
thought. On reflection he will recall it.
But Mr. Green would sooner part with life than part with
a prejudice, and he shook his head in the negative in a way
to show that his mind was made up.
This is trifling, added Captain Truck. Saunders,
go on deck, and tell Mr. Leach to send down through the
skylight a single whip, that we may whip this polite
personage
on deck; and, harkee, Saunders, let there be another
on the yard, that we may send him into his boat like an
anker of gin!
This is proceeding too far, said Captain Ducie. Mr.
Green, you will oblige me by retiring; there can be no
suspicion
cast on a vessel of war for conceding a little to an
unarmed ship.
A vessel of war should not insult an unarmed ship,
sir! rejoined Captain Truck, pithily.
Captain Ducie again coloured; but as he had decided on
his course, he had the prudence to remain silent. In the
mean time Mr. Green sullenly took his hat and papers, and
withdrew into the boat; though, on his return to London,
he did not fail to give such a version of the affair as went
altogether to corroborate all his own, and his friends'
previous
notions of America; and, what is equally singular,
he religiously believed all he had said on the occasion.
What is now to be done with this unhappy man?
inquired
Captain Ducie when order was a little restored.
The misunderstanding was an unfortunate affair for the
culprit. Captain Truck felt a strong reluctance to deliver
him up to justice after all they had gone through together;
but the gentlemanlike conduct of the English commander,
the consciousness of having triumphed in the late conflict,
and a deep regard for the law, united on the other hand to
urge him to yield the unfortunate and weak-minded offender
to his own authorities.
You do not claim a right to take him out of an
American
ship by violence, if I understand you, Captain Ducie?
I do not. My instructions are merely to demand him.
That is according to Vattel. By demand you mean, to
request, to ask for him?
I mean to request, to ask for him, returned the
Englishman
,
smiling.
Then take him, of God's name; and may your laws
be more merciful to the wretch than he has been to himself,
or to his kin.
Mr. Sandon shrieked, and he threw himself abjectly on
his knees between the two captains, grasping the legs of
both.
Oh! hear me! hear me! he exclaimed in a tone of
auguish. I have given up the money, I will give it all
up! all to the last shilling, if you will let me go! You,
Captain Truck, by whose side I have fought and toiled,
you will not have the heart to abandon me to these
murderers
!
It's dd hard! muttered the captain, actually wiping
his eyes; but it is what you have drawn upon yourself,
I fear. Get a good lawyer, my poor fellow, as soon as
you arrive; and it's an even chance, after all, that you go
free!
Miserable wretch! said Mr. Dodge, confronting the
still kneeling and agonized delinquent, Wretch! these are
the penalties of guilt. You have forged and stolen, acts
that meet with my most unqualified disapprobation, and you
are unfit for respectable society.I saw from the very first
what you truly were, and permitted myself to associate with
you, merely to detect and expose you, in order that you
might not bring disgrace on our beloved country. An
impostor
has no chance in America; and you are fortunate in
being taken back to your own hemisphere.
Mr. Dodge belonged to a tolerably numerous class, that
is quaintly described as being law honest; that is to say,
he neither committed murder nor petty larceny. When he
was guilty of moral slander, he took great care that it should
not be legal slander; and, although his whole life was a
tissue of mean and baneful vices, he was quite innocent of
all those enormities that usually occupy the attention of a
panel of twelve men. This, in his eyes, raised him so far
above less prudent sinners as to give him a right to address
his quondam associate as has been just related. But the
agony of the culprit was past receiving an increase from
this brutal attack; he merely motioned the coarse-minded
sycophant and demagogue away, and continued his appeals
to the two captains for mercy. At this moment Paul Powis
stepped up to the editor, and in a low but firm voice ordered
him to quit the cabin.
I will pray for yoube your slavedo all you ask, if
you will not give me up! continued the culprit, fairly
writhing in his agony. Oh! Captain Ducie, as an
English
nobleman, have mercy on me.
I must transfer the duty to subordinates, said the
English commander, a tear actually standing in his eye.
Will you permit a party of armed marines to take this
unhappy being from your ship, sir.
Perhaps this will be the best course, as he will yield
only to a show of force. I see no objection to this, Mr.
John Effingham?
None in the world, sir. It is your object to clear your
ship of a delinquent, and let those among whom he
committed
the fault be the agents.
Ayay! this is what Vattel calls the comity of
nations
.
Captain Ducie, I beg you will issue your orders.
The English commander had foreseen some difficulty
and, in sending away his boat when he came below, he had
sent for a corporal's guard. These men were now in a
cutter, near the ship, lying off on their oars, in a rigid
respect
to the rights of a stranger, however,as Captain
Truck was glad to see, the whole party having gone on
deck as soon as the arrangement was settled. At an order
from their commander the marines boarded the Montauk
and proceeded below in quest of their prisoner.
Mr. Sandon had been left alone in Eve's cabin; but as
soon as he found himself at liberty, he hurried into his own
state-room. Captain Truck went below, while the marines
were entering the ship; and, having passed a minute in
his own room, he stepped across the cabin, to that of the
culprit. Opening the door without knocking, he found the
unhappy man in the very act of applying a pistol to his
head, his own hand being just in time to prevent the
catastrophe
.
The despair portrayed in the face of the criminal
prevented reproach or remonstrance, for Captain Truck
was a man of few words when it was necessary to act.
Disarming the intended suicide, he coolly counted out to
him thirty-five pounds, the money paid for his passage,
and told him to pocket it.
I received this on condition of delivering you safe in
New York, he said; and as I shall fail in the bargain,
I think it no more than just to return you the money. It
may help you on the trial.
Will they hang me? asked Mr. Sandon hoarsely,
and with an imbecility like that of an infant.
The appearance of the marines prevented reply, the
prisoner
was secured, his effects were pointed out, and his
person was transferred to the boat with the usual military
promptitude. As soon as this was done the cutter pulled
away from the packet, and was soon hoisted in again on
the corvette's deck. That day month the unfortunate
victim
of a passion for trifles committed suicide in London,
just as they were about to transfer him to Newgate; and
six months later his unhappy sister died of a broken heart.
Vol. II.  21
CHAPTER XVII.
We'll attend you there:
Where, if you bring not Marcius, we'll proceed
In our first way.
Coriolanus
.
Eve
and Mademoiselle Viefville had been unwilling
spectators of a portion of the foregoing scene, and Captain
Ducie felt a desire to apologise for the part he had been
obliged to act in it. For this purpose he had begged his
friend the baronet to solicit a more regular introduction
than that received through Captain Truck.
My friend Ducie is solicitous to be introduced, Miss
Effingham, that he may urge something in his own behalf
concerning the commotion he has raised among us.
A graceful assent brought the young commander
forward
,
and as soon as he was named he made a very
suitable
expression of his regret to the ladies, who received it,
as a matter of course, favourably.
This is a new duty to me, the arrest of criminals,
added Captain Ducie.
The word
criminals
sounded harsh to the ear of Eve,
and she felt her cheek becoming pale.
Much as we regret the cause, observed the father,
we can spare the person you are about to take from us
without much pain; for
we
have known him for an
impostor
from the moment he appeared.Is there not some
mistake
?
That is the third trunk that I have seen passed
into the boat marked P. P.
Captain Ducie smiled, and answered,
You will call it a bad pun if I say P. P. see, pointing
to Paul, who was coming from the cabin attended by Captain
Truck. The latter was conversing warmly, gesticulating
towards the corvette, and squeezing his companion's hand.
Am I to understand, said Mr. Effingham earnestly,
that Mr. Powis, too, is to quit us?
He does me the favour, also,Captain Ducie's lip
curled a little at the word
favour
,to accompany me to
England.
Good breeding and intense feeling caused a profound
silence
,
until the young man himself approached the party.
Paul endeavoured to be calm, and he even forced a smile as
he addressed his friends.
Although I escape the honours of a marine guard, he
said,and Eve thought he said it bitterly, I am also to be
taken out of the ship. Chance has several times thrown me
into your society, Mr. EffinghamMiss Effinghamand,
should the same good fortune ever again occur, I hope I
may be permitted to address you at once as an old
acquaintance
.
We shall always entertain a most grateful recollection
of your important services, Mr. Powis, returned the father;
and I shall not cease to wish that the day may soon
arrive
when I can have the pleasure of receiving you under
my own roof.
Paul now offered to take the hand of Mademoiselle
Viefville
,
which he kissed gallantly. He did the same with
Eve's, though she felt him tremble in the attempt. As these
ladies had lived much in countries in which this graceful
mode of salutation prevails among intimates, the act passed
as a matter of course.
With Sir George Templemore, Paul parted with every
sign of good-will. The people, to whom he had caused a
liberal donation to be made, gave him three cheers, for they
understood his professional merits at least; and Saunders,
who had not been forgotten, attended him assiduously to
the side of the ship. Here Mr. Leach called, the Foam's
away! and Captain Ducie's gig was manned. At the
gangway Captain Truck again shook Paul cordially by the
hand, and whispered something in his ear.
Every thing being now ready, the two gentlemen
prepared
to go into the boat. As Eve watched all that passed
with an almost breathless anxiety, a little ceremonial that
now took place caused her much pain. Hitherto the
manner
of Captain Ducie, as respected his companion, had
struck her as equivocal. At times it was haughty and
distant
,
while at others it had appeared more conciliatory and
kind. All these little changes she had noted with a jealous
interest, and the slightest appearance of respect or of
disrespect
was remarked, as if it could furnish a clew to the
mystery of the whole procedure.
Your boat is ready, sir, said Mr. Leach, stepping out
of the gangway to give way to Paul, who stood nearest to
the ladder.
The latter was about to proceed, when he was touched
lightly on the shoulder by Captain Ducie, who smiled, Eve
thought haughtily, and intimated a desire to precede him.
Paul coloured, bowed, and falling back, permitted the
English
officer to enter his own boat first.
Apparemment ce captaine Anglais est un peu sans fa
onVoil qui est poli!
whispered Mademoiselle
Viefville
.
These commanders of vessels of war are little kings,
quietly observed Mr. Effingham, who had unavoidably
noticed
the whole procedure.
The gig was soon clear of the ship, and both the
gentlemen
repeated their adieus to those on deck. To reach the
corvette, to enter her, and to have the gig swinging on her
quarter occupied but five minutes.
Both ships now filled away, and the corvette began to
throw out one sheet of cloth after another until she was
under a cloud of canvas, again standing to the
eastward
with studding-sails alow and aloft. On the other
hand, the Montauk laid her yards square, and ran down to
the Hook. The pilot from the corvette had been sent on
board the packet, and, the wind standing, by eleven o'clock
the latter had crossed the bar. At this moment the low
dark stern of the Foam resembled a small black spot on
the sea sustaining a pyramid of cloud.
You were not on deck, John, to take leave of our young
friend Powis, said Mr. Effingham, reproachfully.
I do not wish to witness a ceremony of this
extraordinary
nature. And yet it might have been better if I had.
Better, cousin Jack!
Better. Poor Monday committed to my care certain
papers that, I fancy, are of moment to some one, and these
I intrusted to Mr. Powis, with a view to examine them
together when we should get in. In the hurry of parting, he
has carried them off.
They may be reclaimed by writing to London, said
Mr. Effingham quietly. Have you his address?
I asked him for it; but the question appeared to
embarrass
him.
Embarrass, cousin Jack!
Embarrass, Miss Effingham.
The subject was now dropped by common consent. A
few moments of awkward silence succeeded, when the
interest
inseparable from a return home, after an absence of
years, began to resume its influence, and objects on the land
were noticed. The sudden departure of Paul was not
forgotten
,
however; for it continued the subject of wonder with
all for weeks, though little more was said on the subject.
The ship was soon abreast of the Hook, which Eve
compared
,
to the disadvantage of the celebrated American haven,
with the rocky promontories and picturesque towers of the
Mediterranean.
This portion of our bay, at least, is not very
admirable
,
she said, though there is a promise of something
better above.
Some New-York cockney, who has wandered from the
crackling heat of his Nott stove, has taken it into his
poetical
imagination to liken this bay to that of Naples, said
John Effingham; and his fellow-citizens greedily swallow
the absurdity, although there is scarcely a single feature in
common to give the foolish opinion value.
But the bay above
is
beautiful!
Barely pretty: when one has seen it alone, for many
years, and has forgotten the features of other bays, it does
not appear amiss; but
you
, fresh from the bolder landscapes
of Southern Europe, will be disappointed.
Eve, an ardent admirer of nature, heard this with regret,
for she had as much confidence in the taste of her kinsman
as in his love of truth. She knew he was superior to the
vulgar vanity of giving an undue merit to a thing because
he had a right of property in it; was a man of the world,
and knew what he uttered on all such matters; had not a
particle of provincial admiration or of provincial weakness
in his composition; and, although as ready as another, and
far more able than most, to defend his country and her
institutions
from the rude assault of her revilers, that he seldom
made the capital mistake of attempting to defend a weak
point.
21*
The scenery greatly improved, in fact, however, as the
ship advanced; and while she went through the pass called
the Narrows, Eve expressed her delight. Mademoiselle
Viefville
was in ecstasies, not so much with the beauties of the
place as with the change from the monotony of the ocean to
the movement and liveliness of the shore.
You think this noble scenery? said John Effingham.
As far from it as possible, cousin Jack. I see much
meanness and poverty in the view, but at the same time it
has fine parts. The islands are not Italian, certainly; nor
these hills, nor yet that line of distant rocks; but, together,
they form a pretty bay, and a noble one in extent and uses
at least.
All this is true. Perhaps the earth does not contain
another port with so many advantages for commerce. In
this respect I think it positively unequalled; but I know a
hundred bays that surpass it in beauty. Indeed in the
Mediterranean it is not easy to find a natural haven that
does not.
Eve was too fresh from the gorgeous coast of Italy to be
in ecstasies with the meagre villages and villas that, more
or less, lined the bay of New-York; but when they
reached
a point where the view of the two rivers, separated by
the town, came before them, with the heights of Brooklyn,
heights comparatively if not positively, on one side, and the
receding wall of the palisadoes on the other, Eve insisted
that the scene was positively fine.
You have well chosen your spot, said John Effingham;
but even this is barely good. There is nothing surpassing
about it.
But it is home, cousin Jack.
It is
home
, Miss Effingham, he answered, gaping;
and as you have no cargo to sell, I fear you will find it
an exceedingly dull one.
We shall seewe shall see, returned Eve, laughing.
Then, looking about her for a few minutes, she added with
a manner in which real and affected vexation were prettily
blended, In one thing I do confess myself disappointed.
You will be happy, my dear, if it be in only one.
These smaller vessels are less picturesque than those
I have been accustomed to see.
You have hit upon a very sound criticism, and, by
going
a little deeper into the subject, you will discover a
singular
deficiency in this part of an American landscape.
The great height of the spars of all the smaller vessels of
these waters, when compared with the tame and level coast,
river banks, and the formation of the country in general,
has the effect to diminish still more the outlines of any
particular
scene. Beautiful as it is, beyond all competition, the
Hudson would seem still more so, were it not for these high
and ungainly spars.
The pilot now began to shorten sail, and the ship drew
into that arm of the sea which, by a misnomer peculiarly
American, it is the fashion to call the East River. Here
our heroine candidly expressed her disappointment, the
town seeming mean and insignificant. The Battery, of
which she remembered a little, and had heard so much,
although
beautifully placed, disappointed her, for it had neither
the extent and magnificence of a park, nor the
embellishments
and luxurious shades of a garden. As she had been
told that her countrymen were almost ignorant of the art
of landscape gardening, she was not so much disappointed
with this spot, however, as with the air of the town, and
the extreme filth and poverty of the quays. Unwilling to
encourage John Effingham in his diposition to censure, she
concealed her opinions for a time.
There is less improvement here than even I expected,
said Mr. Effingham, as they got into a coach on the wharf.
They had taught me, John, to expect great improvements.
And great, very great improvements have been made
in your absence. If you could see this place as you knew
it in youth, the alterations would seem marvellous.
I cannot admit this. With Eve, I think the place mean
in appearance, rather than imposing, and so decidedly
provincial
as not to possess a single feature of a capital.
The two things are not irreconcilable, Ned, if you will
take the trouble to tax your memory. The place
is
mean
and provincial; but thirty years since it was still meaner
and more provincial than it is to-day. A century hence it
will begin to resemble a large European town.
What odious objects these posts are! cried Eve.
They give the streets the air of a village, and I do not
see their uses.
These posts are for awnings, and of themselves they
prove the peculiar country character of the place. If you
will reflect, however, you will see it could not well be
otherwise
.
This town to-day contains near three-hundred
thousand
souls, two-thirds of whom are in truth emigrants from
the interior of our own, or of some foreign country; and
such a collection of people cannot in a day give a town any
other character than that which belongs to themselves. It is
not a crime to be provincial and rustic; it is only ridiculous
to fancy yourselves otherwise, when the fact is apparent.
The streets seem deserted. I had thought New York a
crowded town.
And yet this is Broadway, a street that every American
will tell you is so crowded as to render respiration
impossible
.
John Effingham excepted, said Mr. Effingham smiling.
Is
this
Broadway? cried Eve, fairly appalled.
Beyond a question. Are you not smothered?
Eve continued silent until the carriage reached the door of
her father's house. On the other hand, Mademoiselle
Viefville
expressed herself delighted with all she saw, a
circumstance
that might have deceived a native of the country,
who did not know how to explain her raptures. In the first
place she was a Frenchwoman, and accustomed to say
pleasant
things; then she was just relieved from an element she
detested, and the land was pleasant in her eyes. But the
principal reason is still in reserve: Mademoiselle Viefville,
like most Europeans, had regarded America not merely as
a provincial country, and this without a high standard of
civilization
for a province, as the truth would have shown, but
as a semi-barbarous quarter of the world; and the things
she saw so much surpassed her expectations, that she was
delighted, as it might be, by contrast.
As we shall have a future occasion to speak of the
dwelling
of Mr. Effingham, and to accompany the reader much
further in the histories of our several characters, we shall
pass over the feelings of Eve when fairly established that
night under her own roof. The next morning, however,
when she descended to breakfast, she was met by John
Effingham, who gravely pointed to the following paragraph
in one of the daily journals.
The Montauk, London packet, which has been a little
out of time, arrived yesterday, as reported in our marine
news. This ship has met with various interesting
adventures
,
that, we are happy to hear, will shortly be laid before
the world by one of her passengers, a gentleman every way
qualified for the task. Among the distinguished persons
arrived
in this ship is our contemporary, Steadfast Dodge,
Esquire
,
whose amusing and instructing letters from Europe
are already before the world.We are glad to hear that Mr.
Dodge returns home better satisfied than ever with his own
country, which he declares to be quite good enough for him.
It is whispered that our literary friend has played a
conspicuous
part in some recent events on the coast of Africa,
though his extreme and well known modesty renders him
indisposed
to speak of the affair; but we forbear ourselves,
out of respect to a sensibility that we know how to esteem!
His Britannic Majesty's ship, Foam, whose arrival we
noticed a day or two since, boarded the Montauk off the
Hook, and took out of her two criminals, one of whom, we
are told, was a defaulter for one hundred and forty thousand
pounds, and the other a deserter from the king's service,
though a scion of a noble house. More of this to-morrow.
The morrow never came, for some new incident took the
place of the premised narration. A people who do not give
themselves time to eat, and with whom go ahead has
got to be the substitute of even religion, little troubling
themselves to go back twenty-four hours in search of a
fact.
This must be a base falsehood, cousin Jack, said Eve,
as she laid down the paper, her brow flushed with an
indignation
that, for the moment, proved too strong for even
apprehension
.
I hope it may turn out to be so, and yet I consider the
affair sufficiently singular to render suspicion at least
natural
.
How Eve both thought and acted in the matter, will
appear
hereafter.
THE END.